Boundaries of the Mind
The Individual in the Fragile Sciences

Cognition
Where does the mind begin and end? Most philosophers and cognitive scientists take the view that the mind is bounded by the skull or
skin of the individual. Rob Wilson, in this provocative and challenging new book, provides the foundation for the view that the mind
extends beyond the boundary of the individual.

The approach adopted offers a unique blend of traditional philosophical analysis, cognitive science, and the history of psychology and
the human sciences. There are highly accessible discussions of the origin of psychology, nativism about the mind, contemporary views of
computation, mental representation, consciousness, the metaphysics
of mind, the idea of group minds, and how to think about the individual in the cognitive, biological, and social sciences, what Wilson
refers to as the fragile sciences. A companion volume Genes and the
Agents of Life explores this general theme in the biological sciences.

Written with verve and clarity, this ambitious book will appeal to
a broad swath of professionals and students in philosophy, psychology, cognitive science, and the history of the behavioral and human
sciences.

Robert A. Wilson was born in Broken Hill, Australia, and lives in
Edmonton, Canada. He is the author or editor of five other books,
including the award-winning The MIT Encyclopedia of the Cognitive Sciences (1999).

i
ii
Boundaries of the Mind
The Individual in the Fragile Sciences
Cognition
ROBERT A. WILSON
University of Alberta
iii
cambridge university press
Cambridge, New York, Melbourne, Madrid, Cape Town, Singapore, São Paulo
Cambridge University Press
The Edinburgh Building, Cambridge cb2 2ru, UK
Robert A. Wilson 2004
For Selina
Contents in Brief
part one: disciplining the individual
and the mind
part two: individualism and externalism in the
philosophy of mind and the cognitive sciences
part three: thinking through and beyond the body
part four: the cognitive metaphor in the biological
and social sciences
The Group Mind Hypothesis in Contemporary Biology
Contents
List of Tables and Figures page xiii
Acknowledgments xv
part one
disciplining the individual and the mind
ix
x Contents
part two
individualism and externalism in the philosophy
of mind and the cognitive sciences
5 Metaphysics, Mind, and Science: Two Views
Contents xi
part three
thinking through and beyond the body
xii Contents
part four
the cognitive metaphor in the biological
and social sciences
1 Group Minds and the Cognitive Metaphor in the Biological
6 Collective Psychology, Superorganisms, and Socially
12 The Group Mind Hypothesis in Contemporary Biology
List of Tables and Figures
tables
figures
5.1 (a) Constitutive Decomposition Involving Entity-bounded
Realization and (b) Integrative Synthesis Involving Wide
xiii
xiv
Acknowledgments
I began thinking about some of the material in this book in the mid-1990s
as work on three distinct projects progressed. Some of the metaphysical
issues concerning the mind, particularly what I think of as the hardnosed physicalist challenges to nonreductionist views posed by Jaegwon
Kim and David Lewis, had been passed by too quickly in my first book,
Cartesian Psychology and Physical Minds. These called for further reflection.

I had also started developing, slowly and through trial-and-error teaching,
some background in biology and the philosophy of biology. Finally, I was
being forced to think about the diversity of views within cognitive science
through my role as general editor for The MIT Encyclopedia of the Cognitive
Sciences. It took a few years for these interests and issues to coalesce, and
for the project of which this book is a part to be articulated.

The project itself was initiated while I held a fellowship at the Center
for Advanced Study at the University of Illinois, Urbana-Champaign, in
the spring of 1998. The center also played a broader supportive role for
me throughout my time at Illinois, for which I am grateful. Rough versions of the first chapter and those in Part Two were drafted in the fall
of 1999 while holding a fellowship courtesy of the Program for Liberal
Arts and Sciences Study in a Second Discipline at Illinois. During this
period, the Cognitive Science Group at the Beckman Institute at Illinois
provided a stimulating intellectual home that regularly transgressed disciplinary boundaries of all kinds. I thank my colleagues there and in
the Department of Philosophy – especially Gary Dell, Gary Ebbs, Steve
Levinson, Patrick Maher, Greg Murphy, and Fred Schmitt – for fostering a
constructive and welcoming academic environment in which a somewhat
open-ended project could be undertaken.

xv
xvi Acknowledgments
Most of the writing for the project has been done while I have been at
the University of Alberta these past two or three years, and with generous
release time provided by grant SSHRC 410-2001-0061 from the Social Sciences and Humanities Research Council of Canada. As the project developed, it became clear that it could not be completed within a single book.

Much of the last year has been spent making both this book and Genes
and the Agents of Life (Cambridge 2005), walk the line that independent
but related books must. I thank my departmental chair, Bernie Linsky,
for his flexibility in assigning my teaching load, giving me the whole of
calendar 2002 to concentrate on both books. My thanks also to my research assistants over the last two years – Ken Bond, Jennie Greenwood,
Li Li, and Patrick McGivern – and to members of an upper-division and
graduate course in the spring of 2003 who grappled with, and usefully
critiqued, material from both books.

For feedback and encouragement along the way, I would like to thank
Karen Bennett, Paul Bloom, Andy Clark, Lesley Cormack, Gary Ebbs,
Frances Egan, John Heil, Terry Horgan, Frank Keil, the late David Lewis,
Patrick Maher, Robert McKim, Ruth Millikan, Alex Rueger, Robert Smith,
Andrea Scarantino, Gabe Segal, Larry Shapiro, Sydney Shoemaker, Bob
Stalnaker, Kim Sterelny, Paul Teller, John Tienson, J. D. Trout, Peter
Vallentyne, Steve Wagner, David Sloan Wilson, and Steve Yablo. Greg
Murphy and Larry Shapiro provided detailed written comments on the
penultimate manuscript, for which I am grateful, and Michael Wade
did the same for the material that comprises Part Four. The editorial
and production team at Cambridge – Stephanie Achard, Jennifer Carey,
Shari Chappell, and Carolyn Sherayko – have been a pleasure to work
with throughout, and have improved the final manuscript considerably.

I would also like to thank four reviewers for Cambridge University Press
who provided feedback and guidance on the overall shape of the project,
and Terence Moore at Cambridge for his editorial leadership.

Many of the chapters draw on and develop material that I have published elsewhere. I would like to acknowledge publishers for permission
to include material drawn from the following publication sources:
Chapters 4 and 7:“Individualism,”in Stephen P. Stich and Ted A. Warfield
(eds.), The Blackwell Guide to Philosophy of Mind. Oxford: Blackwell Publishers, 2002, pp. 256–287.

(2001), pp. 1–30.  C 2001 Kluwer Academic Publishers.

Acknowledgments xvii
Chapter 6: “Some Problems for ‘Alternative Individualism,’ ” Philosophy
of Science, 67 (2000), pp. 671–679.  C 2000 Philosophy of Science Association. All rights reserved. The University of Chicago Press.

Chapters 7 and 8: “The Mind Beyond Itself,” in Dan Sperber (ed.),
Metarepresentations: A Multidisciplinary Perspective. Volume 10, Vancouver
Studies in Cognitive Science. New York: Oxford University Press, 2000,
pp. 31–52.

Chapter 8: “The Individual in Biology and Psychology,” in Valerie Gray
Hardcastle (ed.), Where Biology Meets Psychology: Philosophical Essays.

Cambridge, MA: MIT Press, 1999, pp. 357–374.

Chapter 10: “Intentionality and Phenomenology,” Pacific Philosophical
Quarterly, 84 (2003), pp. 413–431. Oxford: Blackwell Publishers.

Chapter 12: “Group-Level Cognition,” Philosophy of Science, 68 (2001),
pp. S262–S273.  C 2001 Philosophy of Science Association. All rights
reserved. The University of Chicago Press.

Edmonton, Alberta
June 2003
xviii
Boundaries of the Mind
The Individual in the Fragile Sciences
Cognition
xix
xx
part one
DISCIPLINING THE INDIVIDUAL AND THE MIND
1
2
1
The Individual in the Fragile Sciences
1 individuals and the mind
Where does the mind begin and end? We think of the mind as tied to
and delimited by individuals. Minds do not float free in the air or belong
to larger, amorphous entities, such as groups, societies, or cultures. No,
they are tightly coupled with individuals. Minds exist inside individuals,
and the particular mind that any individual has constitutes an important
part of what it is to be that individual. We may not know precisely when
during ontogenetic development the mind begins to exist and when it
ceases to exist. Indeed, we might think that there is no such precise time,
and that to think otherwise is to fall into some sort of conceptual muddle.

But that a particular mind’s temporal boundaries are delimited by the
life of the individual is reflected in both Western science and law.

Likewise, we might quibble about how far throughout the brain and
central nervous system the mind extends spatially. But again, the boundary of the mind is no greater than the boundary of the individual. If it
doesn’t stop further in, in the brain, it at least stops at the skin.

There are ways in which these ideas about the mind may appear to
be challenged by pervasive systems of thought beyond science. For example, on many religious views, at least something very like the mind is
neither temporally nor spatially bounded by the body by which we usually
identify an individual. Minds leave bodies when a person dies, and can
find themselves in places beyond Earth, or in other bodies on Earth. This
sort of view is even accommodated within analytic discussions of personal
identity in philosophy. The soul of a prince may end up in the body of
a pauper, or (in the modern version) a person’s mind might be stored
3
4 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
in a computer and downloaded in other matter, or teletransported Star
Trek-style to another spatial location.

In fact, such widespread views reflect and reinforce, rather than challenge, the tie between minds and individuals. For in effect what they do
is identify an individual in terms of his or her mind. It is that very same
individual who sins on Earth and is thus punished in the afterlife, and
the very same individual who emerges from the teletransporter as the one
who stepped into it. If this were not true, then Hell would deliver only
a Kafkaesque notion of justice and desert, and teletransportation would
be suicide and the creation of a new life all in one.

This book is about the boundaries of the mind. The preceding two
paragraphs aside, it has nothing directly to say about religious thought
or about work on personal identity. Rather, its focus is on the idea of
the individual as a boundary for the mind in the cognitive sciences and
the philosophy of mind. There are various strands to the idea that the
individual serves as a boundary for the mind in those sciences, and I
want to tease them apart, to probe and examine them, and to question
at least some of them. I take seriously the idea that there are important
senses in which the individual is not a boundary for the mind, but do
so from within the confines of the cognitive sciences. This will involve
saying much about what I think the mind is. And it will be hard to say
much of use on this topic without also entering into discussion of what
individuals are. That, I suggest, takes us immediately beyond the mind
and the cognitive sciences to a larger arena within science.

2 individuals and science
The concept of the individual is central to how we think about the mind,
about living things, and about the social world. The sciences that concern
each of these domains – the cognitive, biological, and social sciences –
have developed independently. Human agents are often taken to be
paradigms of individuals in each of these sciences, what I shall collectively
refer to as the fragile sciences. Yet there exists little systematic discussion
of the roles and conceptions of individuals across the cognitive, biological, and social sciences. Boundaries of the Mind focuses on the role that
the individual has played and continues to play in guiding our thinking
about the mind within cognitive science. It conceptualizes that science
(or, better, cluster of sciences) as part of a broader range of sciences, the
fragile sciences, that use individuals as a touchstone. It aims to contribute
and draw on the fragile sciences.

In everyday life human agents are our paradigm example of individuals. We take for granted human agents in our everyday lives, and they
feature centrally in our myths, histories, literature, and artistic representations. They are perhaps the most familiar part of our landscapes and our
memories. Individuals are not some theoretical abstraction or posit, but
perceived and known things. They are something that we can feel sure
about, something basic or foundational, something beyond question.

Individuals have also been taken for granted within the various explanatory enterprises that form part of contemporary science. But here
the sense of security and surety can begin to dissipate as we register some
of the variation that exists in just how human agents are thought of within
the domain of the human sciences. Within evolutionary biology, human
agents are conceived as animals with a phylogenetic history and a particular range of ecological niches. Within anthropology, human agents
are interpreters of meaning and creators of culture. Within cognitive science, they are the locus for computational programs and modules. Within
economics, rational decisionmakers, optimizers of utility. The claim that
individuals play a central role in these sciences is platitudinous. Yet recognition of the various roles that individuals have in these sciences, and of
the presuppositions and implications of such roles, have been limited
enough to warrant using the platitude as a focal theme for a broader
discussion of the individual in the fragile sciences.

So my first point about individuals and science is that while we can
readily accept human agents as paradigmatic individuals, how such individuals are conceptualized varies across different sciences. This should
occasion no real surprise, given that these sciences have developed with
considerable autonomy from one another, and the central role that “the
individual” plays in each. There are, however, various kinds of project
that might take this as a point of departure. For example, there are historical investigations of specific conceptions of the individual, detailed
comparisons of distinct traditions and thinkers across these disciplines,
and synthetic overviews that weave a narrative revealing affinities and
ruptures within these fields of thought. While the kind of project that I
am undertaking incorporates historical, comparative, and synthetic perspectives, the unifying structure to it lies in the interplay between the role
and conception of individuals and the way in which the corresponding
sciences have developed.

In both common sense and the sciences we have a firm grip on what
individuals are: They are individual human beings like you and me, and
by extension, individual thinkers, organisms, and agents. What warrants
6 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
reflection, however, are the various ways in which these thinkers, organisms, and agents have been construed, respectively, in psychology, biology,
and the social sciences. For these construals are pivotal to many of the
most important and controversial topics in those sciences and the sort of
sciences they become.

This brings me to a second point. How one conceives of individuals and
the role that one ascribes to individuals structure and constrain how any
“individual-focused” science is theorized and practiced. We can illustrate
both of these points with an example from the biological sciences, that
of the role of individuals in the theory of natural selection.

In the traditional Darwinian theory of natural selection, the individual
organism plays the central role as the agent on which natural selection
operates. Organisms are the individuals that bear phenotypic traits, that
vary in their fitness within a population, and that, as a result, are selected
for over evolutionary time. Organisms are the bearers of adaptations,
such as thick coats in cold climates, or porous leaves in humid climates.

They are the agents of selection. On Darwin’s own view, units larger than
the individual, such as the group, were (more or less) unnecessary, and
units smaller than the individual, such as the gene, unknown.

By contrast, in the postsynthetic view of evolution by natural selection
that is often glossed in terms of the concept of the selfish gene, individuals
play a very different role. On this view, it is genes rather than individuals
that are the agents of selection, and that come to play many of the roles
(and have many of the features) that are ascribed to organisms on the
traditional Darwinian view. On this view, individuals are not much more
than ways in which genes get to propagate themselves. In terms that
Richard Dawkins uses, they are the vehicles in which the real agents of
selection, genes, the replicators in the story of life, are lodged. Genes are
the bearers of adaptations, and the units between which variations in
fitness provide the basis for the process of natural selection. Furthermore,
not only is the individual organism no longer the agent of selection, but as
Dawkins has also argued, it is only an arbitrary boundary for phenotypes,
which should be seen as extending into the world beyond the organism.1
Each of these conceptions of the role of the individual in the theory
of natural selection carries with it implications for a number of issues to
which that theory is central. I shall mention just two here.

The first is what is usually called the problem of altruism. Altruistic
phenotypes and behaviors are those that decrease the relative fitness
of the organisms that bear them. On the traditional Darwinian view of
natural selection, focused as it is on organisms and their reproductive
success, the existence of altruism represents a puzzle. If organisms are
the agent on which natural selection operates, then natural selection will
select those organisms that have a relatively higher level of fitness. Thus,
organisms adapted to increase the relative fitness of other organisms,
that is, decrease their own relative fitness, could not evolve through this
process, except as incidental by-products. The problem of altruism, in
this view, is how to explain the existence of organism-level altruism.

On the gene-centered view of natural selection, by contrast, this problem does not exist. Or, rather, it is solved by showing how altruism,
so conceived, is a result of the process of natural selection operating
on genes and maximizing their reproductive success. For copies of the
same genes can exist in different organisms, and so altruistic behavior
would be predicted by a gene-centered view of natural selection where
organisms share significant proportions of their genes, such as when they
are kin.

A second issue for which the individual- and gene-centered views of
natural selection have implications is how important higher-level selection is in shaping the tree of life. Such selection operates on agents larger
than the individual, anything from temporary dyads, to demes, to species,
to whole clades. Both the traditional Darwinian and the gene-centered
view are skeptical about the need to posit higher-level selection, and posit
higher-level selection only when explanation at their preferred level is not
empirically adequate. On the traditional Darwinian view, these higherlevel agents are conceptualized very much as organisms in that they are
seen as sharing many properties ordinarily ascribed to organisms. But
on the gene-centered view, groups, species, and clades are simply larger
pools of genes, different sized vehicles, if you like, but never truly the
agents of selection.2
This example brings out another dimension to discussion of the individual in the cognitive, biological, and social sciences. Human agents
are the paradigmatic individuals in these sciences, but they are neither
the only entity that serves as an individual nor always the most central
such entity. Entities both smaller (for example, information-processing
modules) and larger (for example, whole species) than our paradigm individuals are sometimes conceptualized either as individuals or as having
many of the properties possessed by paradigmatic individuals, and thus
as being like individuals. Sometimes it is these entities that are central
to the relevant sciences, with our paradigm individuals receding to the
background. We can raise the same questions about the conception and
role of such entities as we have about our paradigm individuals. As I will
8 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
argue in the final chapters, this may be true even when our focus is on
cognition, and where the relevant individuals are groups of some kind.

3 the fragile sciences
I have introduced “the fragile sciences” as shorthand for the cognitive,
biological, and social sciences, and here I want to say something about the
neologism itself. Given that human agents are paradigmatic individuals
in these sciences, one might think that “human sciences” is descriptively
more informative. But like “behavioral sciences” or “special sciences,”
this is a term whose connotations are more misleading than helpful, and
whose extension differs from that of the range of sciences that I have in
mind.

The first respect in which this is true is that “the human sciences”
denotes simply those sciences that attempt to understand human nature
in one or more of its dimensions: biological, psychological, behavioral,
social. The term thus suggests continuities between humanistic studies of
human nature that precede the disciplinization of the psychological and
social sciences in the nineteenth century and subsequent, disciplinarybased research that I shall not discuss at all. Roger Smith’s The Norton
History of the Human Sciences is an excellent work with this focus, but
my concern is largely with conceptions of the individual that postdate
the formation of psychology and the various social sciences as distinct
disciplines.

A second but related reason for not speaking of the human sciences is
that even if human agents are paradigmatic individuals in the cognitive,
biological, and social sciences, their conceptualization here seldom even
attempts to capture the essence of humanity or to grapple with the loftier
goals of earlier inquiries, such as“man’s place in nature.” The conceptualization of the individual has become more partial and less encompassing,
but also more closely tied to models, techniques, and research strategies
in particular sciences. It is these ties, rather than the study of human
agency or human nature, that interest me.

A third reason to coin a term rather than make do with an existing one,
such as “the human sciences,” is that the greater part of the biological
sciences, as well as a sizable portion of the cognitive sciences, have at least
as much to say about nonhuman as about human agency. The scientific
study of intelligent capacities has sometimes been used as a brief characterization of cognitive science, to which artificial intelligence, the study
of such capacities in machines, has been, historically and substantially, a
major contributor. Human beings constitute one special object of study
within zoology. If “the human sciences” is taken, as it often is, to refer to
psychology plus the social sciences, then we need a term that refers to
these plus the biological sciences.

But why fragile sciences? Two brief reasons. The first is that it both parodies and transcends traditional divisions between the sciences: between
the natural and social sciences, hard and soft science, and the physical
and human sciences. As a sometimes philosopher of science, I have found
these dichotomies too often driving views of the nature of science, and as
inevitably privileging the natural, the hard, and the physical over the social, the soft, and the human.“Fragile sciences”serves as a partial counter
to these tendencies pervading not only philosophy but also education,
popular culture, and science itself. The second is the cluster of ideas that
fragility calls to mind. Fragile things can be easily broken, are often delicate and admirable in their own right, and their labeling as such carries
with it its own warning, which we sometimes make explicit: Handle with
care! But they are also both strong and weak at the same time, and their
fragility lies both in their underlying physical bases and in how it is that
we treat them. No doubt, “fragile sciences” triggers other meanings, and
should two reasons not be reason enough, let that be a third. Welcome
to the fragile sciences!
4 individualism in the cognitive, biological,
and social sciences
One way in which the role of the individual has been made prominent in
the fragile sciences is via the defense of one or another form of individualism. I have examined individualism in psychology in detail elsewhere,
concluding with the suggestion that the relationship between the various
individualistic theses in psychology, biology, and the social sciences deserved substantive exploration. While that exploration does not exhaust
the content of either Boundaries of the Mind or the broader project of
which it is a part, the relationship between these individualisms constitutes a reference point for discussion of individuals in the fragile sciences.

I shall begin to discharge the promissory note that there is something to
be gained by considering “the individual” across the fragile sciences by
sketching a common, simple framework in terms of which these forms of
individualism can all be understood.3
In psychology and the cognitive sciences, more generally, individualism is the thesis that psychological states should be construed without
10 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
reference to anything beyond the boundary of the individual who has
those states. This is the thesis that Jerry Fodor has called methodological solipsism, and it requires that one abstract away from an individual’s environment in taxonomizing or individuating her psychological
states. A more precise and common expression of individualism in psychology says that psychological states should be taxonomized so as to
supervene on the intrinsic, physical states of the individuals who instantiate those states. (A property, A, supervenes on another, B, just if
no two entities can differ with respect to A without also differing with
respect to B.) Those who deny individualism are externalists. In Parts
Two and Three I shall develop several varieties of externalism about
the mind. Individualism about mental states requires, and will there
receive, more detailed articulation. I briefly note three things about
it here.4
First, individualism is a normative thesis about how one ought to do
psychology: It proscribes certain views of our psychological nature – those
that are not individualistic. For this reason, I consider individualism in
psychology as a putative constraint on the sciences of cognition.

Second, this constraint itself is claimed to derive either from general
canons governing science and explanation or from entrenched assumptions about the nature of mental states themselves. It is not construed as
an a priori constraint on how one does psychology, but one derivative from
existing explanatory practices that have met with considerable success in
the past.5
Third, combining the previous two points, approaches to the cognitive
sciences that are not individualistic are both methodologically and metaphysically misguided. They go methodologically awry in that the most
perspicuous examples of explanatorily insightful research paradigms for
cognition or for science more generally have been individualistic in
the corresponding sense. Included here are computational approaches
to cognition and the taxonomy of entities in science more generally
by their causal powers. Given the successes that such individualistic approaches to the mind have had, those rejecting individualism are left in
methodological limbo.

Externalist approaches to the mind go metaphysically awry in two corresponding ways: Either they relinquish our only real insight into the
nature of mental causation – cognition is computational – or they imply
that the mind is not governed by principles that apply more generally to
the physical world – such as the supervenience of a thing’s properties on
its intrinsic, causal powers.

These three features of individualism in psychology are shared by individualistic theses in both the biological and social sciences. There are
various forms that individualism can take in the biological sciences. For
now I elaborate on an example that I have already mentioned, that concerning the agents of selection.

In evolutionary biology there has been a sustained and continuing debate over the agents of selection: At what level or levels in the biological
hierarchy – from the very small, such as cells and their constituents, to
the very large, such as whole species or larger taxonomic units, such as
genera or families – does the chief force of evolutionary change, natural
selection, operate? Three putative agents of selection have been most
frequently proposed and defended: the individual organism, with individual selection being what I have already referred to as the traditional
Darwinian view; the gene, a unit inspired by the rise of population genetics through the evolutionary synthesis, with genic selection associated
most often with George Williams and Richard Dawkins; and the group,
with discussion of the process of group selection experiencing a contemporary revival, due largely to the work of David Sloan Wilson and Elliott
Sober. While much of the debate over the agents of selection concerns the
relative strength and thus importance of each of these selective forces –
individual, genic, and group – there is a strand to the debate that has
concerned the level at which selection operates, and thus, which is less
pluralistic than is suggested by such a construal of that debate. It is this
strand that I want to focus on here.6
In the context of this debate over the agents of selection, individualism
is the view that the organism is the largest unit on which natural selection
operates. Thus, proponents of genic selection who claim that natural
selection can always be adequately represented as operating on genes or
small genetic fragments are individualists about the agents of selection,
as are those who adopt the traditional Darwinian view that allows for only
individual-level selection. Like individualism in psychology, individualism
in evolutionary biology is a putative normative constraint that derives
from existing explanatory practice, and whose violation, according to its
proponents, involves both methodological and metaphysical mistakes.

Let me explain.

Individualism about the agents of selection implies that individual organisms act as a boundary beyond which evolutionary biologists need not
venture when attempting to theorize in considering the nature of what
it is that competes and is subject to natural selection, and thus evolutionary change. By focusing on the individual and what lies within it, one
12 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
can best understand the dynamics of adaptive change within populations
of organisms, whether it be via population genetic models, through the
deployment of evolutionary game theory, or by means of the discovery
of the forms that individualistic selection takes. This constraint on how
to think about the operation of natural selection builds on the specific
explanatory successes of models of kin selection, reciprocal altruism, and
other processes that articulate strategies that individuals might adopt in
order to maximize their reproductive success.

Finally, those who go beyond the individual in postulating selective
processes that flout individualism create both methodological and metaphysical problems that individualistic approaches avoid. Methodologically, since the full range of observed behaviors can be explained in evolutionary terms by models of evolution that are individualistic about the
agents of selection (for example, via kin selection and reciprocal altruism), those who reject individualism are abandoning real explanatory
achievement. As we saw was the case with the rejection of individualism in psychology, precisely because the constraint of individualism in
evolutionary biology rests on a history of explanatory success, those advocating a nonindividualistic view of the agents of selection are faced (and
not unreasonably) with the question of what their perspective buys that
cannot be purchased with an established currency. The corresponding
metaphysical problem lies in the idea that natural selection – somehow –
transcends the level of the individual and goes to work directly on groups.

A common response to this sort of nonindividualistic suggestion is either
that the appropriate model of group selection really boils down to a variant on an existing individualistic model of selection, or that it requires
assumptions that rarely, if ever, hold in the actual world. In the former
case, we don’t, in fact, depart from individualism; in the latter, we are
committed to views about what there is that do not correspond to how
the world actually is.

Consider now the social sciences. In the social sciences, methodological individualism is a cluster of views that give some sort of priority to
individuals and their properties, particularly their psychological properties, in accounting for social phenomena. As with mental phenomena,
although there is a sense in which we have an intuitive grasp of what
social phenomena are, there are questions of how those phenomena fit
into the natural order of things, and of how we should go about studying them. Methodological individualism has sometimes been expressed
as the view that all social phenomena must be explained, ultimately, in
terms of the intentional states of individual agents. Like individualism
in psychology, it has also sometimes been formulated as a supervenience
thesis, the thesis that social phenomena supervene on the psychology of
individuals.7
These two formulations, what we might think of as the explanatory and
ontological formulations, are usefully seen as linked by viewing methodological individualism as a thesis about the taxonomy or individuation of
social phenomena, as I have suggested that individualism in psychology is
most usefully viewed. Methodological individualism is the view that social
phenomena should be taxonomized so as to supervene on the intrinsic, physical properties of the individuals who participate in or sustain
those phenomena. Thus, our explanations of social phenomena should
be restricted to positing states and processes that respect this normative,
individualistic constraint. This is what is thought to give the intentional
states of individuals both explanatory and ontological priority over social phenomena, just as, given individualism in psychology, the intrinsic,
physical states of individuals have explanatory and ontological priority
over mental phenomena.

Fueling the idea that methodological individualism is a constraint on
the social sciences is also a claim about a tradition of explanatory successes, although unlike the case of the cognitive and biological sciences,
this claim about an established track record for individualistic approaches
to the social sciences has a significantly slimmer evidential basis. This is in
large part because relatively uncontroversial explanatory success stories
are rare in the social sciences; it is also because the best-known defenses
of methodological individualism in the social sciences, such as those of
Karl Popper and John Watkins, predate most of those successes that we
can identify. Historically, it is more accurate to see the rise of methodological individualism in the social sciences as a gamble, a promissory
note about what approaches to understanding society would prove most
fruitful, though contemporary advocates of methodological individualism do, I think, share the “past success” view of their putative constraint
on the social sciences, listing to their credit, for example, a variety of
applications of rational choice theory in economics and schema theory
in cognitive anthropology.8
The parallel to the third feature of individualism in psychology that
I drew – the claim that violation of the constraint brings with it related
methodological and metaphysical problems – is, I think, relatively clear.

Individualists have claimed that approaches to and theories in the social
sciences that are non-individualistic, such as Emile Durkheim’s account
of suicide, or Karl Marx’s theory of capitalism, to take two well-known
14 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
examples, have proven to be methodological dead ends. As with claims
about individualistic success stories in the biological sciences, these claims
about explanatory failure are contentious. In any case, with respect to the
social sciences more emphasis has been given to the metaphysical pitfalls
of a denial of methodological individualism: social science that is nonindividualistic reifies social objects and categories, such as class interest
(sociology), markets (economics), and cultures (anthropology). It posits
an inflated social ontology of entities that have some type of sui generis
existence, and provides no promise of how to integrate the developing
social sciences with the natural sciences.9
There are questions about these three forms of individualism that
this brief comparative treatment of them leaves open, and we will return
to explore in detail those concerning cognition in Part Two. My main
point here has been to sketch a common framework in terms of which
these distinct individualistic theses can be viewed. The existence of such
a framework suggests that problems, challenges, solutions, and responses
that have arisen with respect to a given debate over individualism may also
exist or be lurking in the background of another debate over individuals and their role in explanation in the fragile sciences. This common
framework will thus function like a trampoline for some individualism
hopping across the fragile sciences.

Thus far I have attempted to show that three individualistic theses in
the cognitive, biological, and social sciences that have seldom been discussed together in fact share an important set of affinities. The natural
and further suggestion is that the debates into which an individualistic or externalist position in any of these sciences launch one can be
mutually informative. That in turn presupposes that each of these individualistic perspectives has important ramifications for central debates
in each of these fields. It is in part by way of supporting this claim that
I turn now to consider innateness hypotheses in the fragile sciences. I
shall propose a two-dimensional analysis of a range of nativist debates
both that shows what they share despite their distinct subject matter, and
that reveals the link between nativism and individualism. I begin with
the cognitive sciences, where nativism has received its most extensive
treatment.

5 inside the thinking individual
Nativists about the mind hold that the mind itself is an important source
of, and imposes a structure on, the nature of human knowledge and
when we discuss nativism about the mind at length, contemporary nativism about cognition in general has been inspired by nativism about
language more specifically. Language acquisition, and cognitive development more generally, are viewed as proceeding maturationally, rather
than through some type of environmentally driven process, such as learning. And these maturational processes are viewed by nativists as requiring
specialized, internal cognitive machinery, rather than general purpose,
one-size-fits-all mechanisms.

In the contemporary cognitive sciences, the chief antinativist cluster
of views are empiricist, holding that it is our sensory or perceptual apparatus, not something distinctly cognitive or mental, that structures human knowledge and mental representation. Both nativists and empiricists
recognize that there is a given, built-in organismic contribution to cognition. But since empiricists locate this contribution within perception,
“upstream” of the mind, what enters the mind proper is a function of
experience in the world. This experience may vary with one’s environment and shapes an organism’s particular cognitive structures. Cognitive
structures are thus not built into the design of the organism’s mind. In
this sense, its cognitive architecture is not innate but contingent on the
nature of its environment.

There are two distinct dimensions to contemporary debates over nativism about the mind. The first concerns the nature of an individual’s
internal structure, while the second concerns the causal role that an individual’s external environment plays in the acquisition and development
of a given cognitive process. These dimensions can be represented as two
theses about cognition as follows. Letting X stand in for some particular
cognitive ability, phenomenon, or behavior, these theses are:
The Internal Richness Thesis: Structures and processes internal to the individual
that are important to the acquisition and development of X are rich;
and
The External Minimalism Thesis: Structures and processes external to an individual
play at best a secondary causal role in the acquisition and development of X.

A cognitive structure is rich just if it is specialized, localized, internally
complex, and causally powerful. Intuitively, the internal richness thesis
says that there is a wealth of structure built into the individual that explains why it possesses a particular cognitive ability or manifests some
specific behavior.

16 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
Consider a strong candidate for an innate human cognitive capacity, such as the capacity to acquire language. Nativists about language
acquisition hold that language learners are equipped with a “language
acquisition device” that is rich in the sense I have specified. While they
acknowledge environmental input as essential, it clearly plays a secondary
causal role in language acquisition. By contrast, consider the ability to
do calculus, something usually acquired through classroom instruction.

Here whether one acquires the ability to do calculus depends in large
part on the structure of one’s environment, in particular, on whether it
contains a teacher who can transmit the relevant knowledge. Since calculus is a relatively recent human innovation, it is unlikely that the brain
contains structures specifically for calculus.

Paradigmatic nativists in the cognitive sciences, such as Chomsky and
Fodor, accept both the internal richness and the external minimalism
thesis about a range of cognitive capacities. Paradigmatic antinativists,
such as behaviorists and early connectionists, reject both of these theses.

One implication of the two-dimensional view of nativism is that we can understand such views as diametrically opposed to one another, as Figure 1.1
makes clear: In virtue of accepting both theses about cognition, Fodor
and Chomsky are what I shall call strong nativists about cognition, while
behaviorists and at least early connectionists, by virtue of rejecting both
theses, are strong antinativists. As Figure 1.1 makes clear, these strong positions do not exhaust the range of options in the debate over nativism
about the mind, a point to which I shall return in Chapter 3.

External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
Chomsky
Fodor
Y
E Internal
S
Richness
Behaviorists
Early Connectionism N Thesis
O
figure 1.1. Nativism and Cognition
Nativist views, particularly what I have been calling strong nativism, provide at least prima facie support for individualistic views of the mind. Consider the external minimalism thesis. If the environment plays a secondary
role in the acquisition and development of a given cognitive ability –
and in the extreme case is best viewed as little more than a trigger for
that ability – then there is a clear sense in which the environment can
be bracketed out when we formulate taxonomies and explanations for
mental phenomena. This strand to strong nativism suggests a “methodologically solipsistic” research strategy in psychology. And if one accepts
the internal richness thesis, then there is a sense in which cognitive structures for specific tasks are programmed within the organism, and so again
it would seem that bracketing out the environment for the purposes of
psychological taxonomy and explanation would be appropriate. In short,
if our innate cognitive machinery is rich in structure, and our psychological taxonomies aim to carve mental reality at its joints, then those
taxonomies should be individualistic.

There is more to be said not only about nativism about the mind, but
also about these putative relationships between nativism and individualism, and we will return to such issues in due course. This introduction of
the two-dimensional view of nativism is, however, intended primarily to
exemplify the trampoline hopping across the fragile sciences that I mentioned at the end of the previous section. Let’s hop, then, from cognition
to biology.

6 the beast within
Debates over nativism also have a well-worn history within the biological sciences. The two-dimensional view of the contemporary debate
over nativism within the cognitive sciences helps to illuminate these
debates.

One such debate concerns the role and conception of inheritance
and organismic development. How should we understand inheritance
and organismic development? Gross bodily traits in human beings, such
as number of arms and legs, eye color, and position of the mouth, are
typically considered to be innate, and this ascription of innateness fits
with the two-dimensional analysis of nativism. The environment plays a
secondary causal role in the development of such traits, with the primary role being played by rich structures internal to the organism. By
contrast, for traits that are typically viewed as acquired, such as height
or number of scars borne by age five, neither the external minimalism
18 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
nor the internal richness thesis is true. As in the cognitive case, the
two-dimensional view provides a way of demarcating paradigmatically
innate from paradigmatically acquired bodily traits.

The parallel with nativism about the mind runs deeper, however, in
that the two-dimensional view also specifies strong nativist and strong
antinativist views of inheritance and development. Within classical and
molecular genetics the prevalent view of the inheritance and development of phenotypic traits gives genes a preeminent role to play, holding that genes both code for and direct organismic development. Here
genes play much the role that modules do in nativist accounts of cognitive
development: They are internally rich structures that play the principal
role in guiding development. Thus, while an organism’s environment
plays a necessary role in inheritance and development, it is not the primary causal agent in those processes. This view of the nature and role of
genes in inheritance and development represents a strong nativist view
within the biological sciences.

Corresponding to the strong empiricist views about cognition is a
strong antinativist view of inheritance and development associated most
directly with Richard Lewontin, sometimes referred to as interactionism
or constructivism about development. To be clear, no one denies the existence of intracellular units, genes that play an important role in inheritance. What has been questioned, however, is (a) whether genes play
either a unique, universal, or asymmetrical role in the processes of inheritance and development with respect to other cellular (and extracellular)
components; and (b) whether the concept of a gene, and the roles that
it plays in our theories of inheritance and development, can be understood in an environment-independent way. To call (a) into question is to
imply that genes are not internally rich structures in the sense that I have
specified; to call (b) into question is to challenge the external minimalist
strand to strong nativism.10
Figure 1.2 shows both the opposition between these “strong” views and
the open space that is represented by less radical positions about nativism
and biology. As with nativism about the mind, here a strong nativist position, particularly acceptance of the external minimalism thesis, makes an
individualistic position in biology attractive. Even if claims about genes
as “master molecules” directing hereditary and developmental traffic are
relaxed in favor of a more encompassing view of the nature of those processes, so long as we remain within the organism, the environment of
that organism can, in effect, be bracketed off from our taxonomic and
explanatory practices.

External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
Classical and Molecular
Genetics
Y
E Internal
S
Richness
Interactionism or
Constructivism N Thesis
O
figure 1.2. Nativism and Inheritance and Development
I shall say more about this characterization of nativism in biology in
Chapter 3. As we will see there has been some recent skepticism within biology over whether the notion of innateness has outlived its usefulness.11
7 culture, nature, and the individual
In the social sciences, perhaps the most hotly contested arena in which
the nativism debate has been played out concerns culture, particularly
within anthropology. In the first half of the twentieth century the concept
of culture came to define the core domain that anthropologists studied,
just as biologists studied the domain of the living and psychologists the
domain of the mind. The anthropologist Adam Kuper has provided an
elegant history of the conception of culture within anthropology and
beyond it (within “cultural studies,” for example). It is only one strand
to the recent part of that history that is my concern here. Paralleling the
cases of cognition and biology, we can capture two opposed views of the
relationship between culture and what individuals are innately endowed
with by using the two-dimensional view of nativism.12
The prevalent view of culture within anthropology is strongly antinativist in rejecting both the external minimalism and internal richness
theses about culture. Culture is not a monolithic structure that all humans
share, but something that varies across different groups of people, who
socially construct their cultures through particular traditions, rituals, and
customs. Cultures, in all their rich detail, rather than some abstraction,
20 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
“culture,” are what shape up individual patterns of behavior and what
anthropologists study. Individuals come to acquire the ways of thinking
and behaving particular to their culture through various forms of social
transmission, and the particular structure to their environments determines what cultural traits they come to possess. While a certain internal
complexity, particularly mental complexity, is needed for groups of organisms to develop a culture, there are no built-in, specialized, mental
structures necessary for culture.

This view of culture and its acquisition by individuals has been challenged by recent evolutionarily inspired views, typified by John Tooby
and Leda Cosmides. Sociobiologists such as Edward O. Wilson had earlier argued for the in-principle extension of the ethologists’ treatment of
behaviors as part of an organism’s phenotype to the full range of human
social behaviors. Tooby and Cosmides have advocated a similar view of human cultures, emphasizing the particular cognitive adaptations that, they
claim, generate human cultures. On their view, there are a variety of cultural universals that derive from internally rich cognitive programs that
are built into our minds. The structures of an individual’s environment
explain only the particular cultural variants that he or she acquires, not
what lies at the heart of culture. This is a view of human cultures that parallels the linguistic nativist’s view of natural languages. Indeed, this strong
nativist view of culture derives from strong nativist views of language and
the mind. The cognitive scientist Steven Pinker has popularized these
views and the connections between them in a series of books.13
Clearly then, part of what is at issue in this debate over culture and
“what’s within” is the conception of the place of the mind within anthropology. Few (if any) strong antinativists would deny that the mind is
entirely irrelevant to culture. Rather, they propose that we understand the
mind through culture. The most influential expression of this view is the
anthropologist Clifford Geertz’s interpretationism, which holds that culture lies in the actions and artifacts of agents in the observable, physical
world rather than in any inner theater of the mind. The task of a cultural
anthropology is to interpret these actions and artifacts where this involves
uncovering their meaning, what they symbolize, and how they function
in a given society. In “Thick description,” the opening essay to Geertz’s
The Interpretation of Cultures, having said that “[c]ulture is public because
meaning is,” Geertz continues:
The generalized attack on privacy theories of meaning is, since early Husserl
and late Wittgenstein, so much a part of modern thought that it need not be
developed once more here. What is necessary is to see to it that the news of it
reaches anthropology; and in particular that it is made clear that to say that culture
consists of socially established structures of meaning in terms of which people do
such things as signal conspiracies and join them or perceive insults and answer
them, is no more to say that it is a psychological phenomenon, a characteristic
of someone’s mind, personality, cognitive structure, or whatever than to say that
Tantrism, genetics, the progressive form of the verb, the classification of wines,
the Common Law, or the notion of a ‘conditional curse’ ... is.14
“Socially established structures of meaning” are the meeting point of
mind and culture, the trading zone in which psychology and anthropology exchange their goods.

The fragment of the broader debate over culture and the mind that
I have recounted as one between strong nativists and antinativists about
culture (see Figure 1.3) suggests three points. The first is that views about
the nature of culture in anthropology are intimately entwined with views
about the nature of the mind. The second is that the two-dimensional
analysis of this debate here implies that, as in the cognitive and biological
sciences, there are positions that depart from both strong nativism and
strong antinativism that are worth exploring. The third is the possibility
that“taking culture seriously” may require thinking beyond the boundary
of the individual not only in how we think of culture itself, but also in
how we think of the mind.

In the cases of nativism about cognition and biology, I have suggested
that strong nativist views promote a corresponding form of individualism
External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
View of Culture from
Evolutionary Psychology
Y
E Internal
S
Richness
Interpretationism N Thesis
O
figure 1.3. Culture and the Individual Mind
22 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
in leading one to focus exclusively on what lies within the boundary of the
individual organism in investigating psychological or developmental processes. Perhaps unsurprisingly, none of the general views about culture
that I have demarcated are individualistic in this sense: It is not in dispute
that one must look beyond the head of individuals in order to describe
and explain culture. But those who have accepted strong nativist views
of culture have, I think, come close to expressing a methodologically individualistic view of culture as either reducible or explainable in terms,
ultimately, of the thoughts and actions of individuals. In traditional sociobiology, culture is simply the sum of individual behaviors; in evolutionary
psychology, it is sometimes construed as the sum of individual cognitive
programs. Thus again, strong nativist views of culture fit naturally with
the corresponding form of individualism, in this case methodological
individualism.

8 the metaphysical picture: smallism
I have thus far outlined the general framework shared by individualists
across the fragile sciences, tried to show the affinities that exist between
a cluster of nativist views in those sciences, and connected these nativist
views to corresponding forms of individualism. I want to round out this introductory chapter by suggesting that there is a metaphysical picture that
makes individualism and nativism and the methodologies they both invite
seem quite compelling. The metaphysics here is a twentieth-century generalization of seventeenth-century corpuscularianism, a view that played
a central role in the scientific views of some of the leading scientists of
that period, including Robert Boyle and Sir Isaac Newton.

This modern day generalization of corpuscularianism constitutes, in
my view, a form of metaphysical discrimination that has left its mark
on a range of sciences. In keeping with these politically correct times,
I shall refer to this form of discrimination as smallism, discrimination
in favor of the small, and so, against the not-so-small. Small things and
their properties are seen to be ontologically prior to the larger things
that they constitute, and this metaphysics drives both explanatory ideal
and methodological perspective. The explanatory ideal is to discover the
basic causal powers of particular small things, and the methodological
perspective is that of some form of reductionism.15
Corpuscularianism is the view that matter is ultimately made up of
simple corpuscles or atoms, which themselves possess a relatively small
number of intrinsic properties. It is these corpuscles and their associated
properties, the primary qualities, that explain all observable physical and
chemical phenomena. While corpuscularianism itself reached its height
at the end of the seventeenth century and is no longer taken seriously as a
hypothesis about the structure of the physical world, some of its features
have structured smallist views in the psychological, biological, and social
sciences. To see this, consider corpuscularianism itself.

This view was developed in seventeenth-century Europe chiefly in the
works of Galileo Galilei, Pierre Gassendi, and Robert Boyle. The sort
of atomism that it promoted in metaphysics and science can be found
throughout the works of many thinkers of the period, including those
of Thomas Hobbes and John Locke. While the list of primary qualities
has varied across these authors, an aggregated list includes the following properties: solidity, extension, figure, mobility, motion or rest, number, bulk, texture, motion, size, and situation. Most relevant for my purposes here are two features of corpuscularianism: The idea that primary
qualities are inherent in corpuscles, and the claim that all of an entity’s
properties could be explained in terms of corpuscles and their primary
qualities.16
Primary qualities are inherent in the sense that the things that have
them do so in and of themselves, without reference to any other thing
whatsoever. More generally and precisely, a quality Q is inherent to a
thing X just if X would have Q even if X were the only thing to exist
in the world at all. The idea that the real and ultimate properties that
a thing has are inherent in this sense plays an important role in the
compositional nature of corpuscularian metaphysics and explanation.

Corpuscles are (physical) parts of observable things, and parts of the parts
of observable things. It is properties of the parts of observable things, and
ultimately of the corpuscles themselves, that cause, and thus explain, the
observable properties of macroscopic objects. Given the inherentness of
primary qualities, this implies that the properties of the things that their
subjects constitute will be a function of these inherent properties, plus
the relations that hold between the things that have them.

It should be clear how this sort of corpuscularian metaphysics makes
individualism an inviting position to hold. If the ultimate properties that
are the causal movers and shakers in general are inherent in individuals,
then systematic explanations ought, in the long run, to make some sort
of appeal to those properties. We need, then, to constrain our higherlevel, fragile sciences in a way that will allow them to hook up with the
sciences that discover the primary qualities of the most basic material
things. Since these are inherent properties, the constraint should be one
24 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
that limits the higher-level sciences to positing inherent properties. This
is just what the individualistic constraints that I have outlined in this
chapter attempt to do: An entity’s properties must supervene on that
entity’s intrinsic, physical properties, where the most significant entity is
a paradigmatic individual. So the fragile sciences should focus on what’s
inside individuals, not what lies beyond their boundaries. This is true
whether we focus just on our paradigmatic individuals human agents, or
whether we think of units both larger and smaller than our paradigms as
individuals.

This emphasis on what is inside is the common point between individualistic and nativist views across the fragile sciences. What’s inside is
construed as being rich in structure and fixed despite any variation in
organism-environment interactions. Individuals are not just concentrations of especially important properties, but have those properties by
virtue of something about those individuals themselves: They have them
inherently.

One general problem for smallism is shared by individualistic (and I
think nativist) views in the fragile sciences. Many of the kinds of things that
there are in the world – modules, organisms, and species for example –
are relationally individuated. Thus, what they are cannot be understood
solely in terms of what they are constituted by. Moreover, regardless
of how the entities themselves are individuated, many of their most
salient properties – their functionality, fitness, and adaptedness, for
example – are relational properties. As such, since these properties do
not inhere in the entities that have them, they cannot be fully understood
by focusing exclusively on what falls inside the boundaries of those entities. This metaphysical point itself carries the methodological imperative
to look beyond the boundary of the individual in exploring the ways in
which individuals and their components function causally in the world.

The prima facie problem that relational properties and kinds pose for
smallist and individualist views requires further articulation, and it invites
some obvious responses. We will see several forms that this problem takes,
and explore some smallist responses, in Part Two.

9 a path through boundaries of the mind
This book has four parts. In the remainder of Part One, I aim to further round out the start made in this chapter in articulating the idea of
the individual as a boundary for the mind. In the next chapter, I shall
introduce the idea that both the mind and its scientific study, as well as
individuals, have been “disciplined” in Michel Foucault’s sense. Neither
the mind nor its study are givens, but are, in some sense, constructed
through genealogical processes. Thus, in this chapter, I want to convey
some sense of psychology’s recent history (even if not of its “long past”),
and the conception of minds and individuals within it. In Chapter 3, I
shall return to put some flesh on the bones of my discussion of nativism.

Rather than using the two-dimensional view of nativism illustratively, as
I have in the current chapter, in Chapter 3 I will aim to defend the twodimensional view of nativism about the mind, and to explore some of the
claims about its significance left undeveloped here.

Parts Two and Three form the core of the book, and focus exclusively
on individualism and externalism about the mind. The three chapters
in Part Two are foundational, with Chapter 4 discussing individualism in
the philosophy of mind in detail, and Chapters 5 and 6 moving to discuss
the metaphysical notion of realization. The idea that mental states are
realized by physical states of the brain is commonplace in the philosophy
of mind. Although realization is a technical notion within philosophy, it
is linked to the concepts of mechanisms and dispositions, each prevalent
within the cognitive sciences themselves. One of the key ideas in these
chapters is that the standard way of thinking about realization in the
philosophy of mind carries with it a smallist bias, and that recognizing
this opens the way to an externalist view of the mind. Chapter 7 begins to
develop such a view with reference to computational cognitive science.

So, Part Two contributes to the increasingly elaborate debate between
individualists and externalists about the mind conducted within the philosophy of mind and computational cognitive science. In Part Three,
the externalist view of the mind I defend is extended beyond these domains to areas of psychology that typically are less explicitly computational (Chapter 8) and to consciousness (Chapter 9). Chapter 8 both
points to existing work on memory, cognitive development, and folk psychology that can be viewed from an externalist point of view and suggests
how externalism may be extended further. Chapter 9 introduces what I
call the TESEE conception of consciousness: consciousness as temporally
extended, scaffolded, and embodied and embedded. In this pair of chapters my aim is to continue with the articulation of externalism undertaken
in Chapter 7 by reference to existing empirical work on the mind.17
In the final chapter in Part Three, I return to more “purely philosophical” work in exploring the relationship between intentionality and phenomenology. Much of the motivation for externalist views in the philosophy of mind has derived from reflection on the nature of intentionality,
26 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
and at least some of the resistance to externalism stems from views of consciousness and phenomenology. Chapter 10, in part, addresses this resistance through a critical examination of two recent proposals by philosophers for thinking about the relationship between intentionality and
phenomenology.

This chapter began with the idea that individuals and minds were
strongly connected in several ways. One of these connections manifests
itself in the innocent-sounding claim that individuals have minds, but that
groups, societies, and cultures do not. In the two chapters in Part Four, I
explore the claim, common enough a hundred years ago in the nascent
social sciences, that groups can be said to have minds. This group mind
hypothesis was important both at the interface of social psychology and
sociology, and in early systematic work on animal and plant communities,
including that on insect colonies as superorganisms. Chapter 11 discusses
these ideas in their historical context. It has, however, a philosophical
moral, one that, I shall argue in Chapter 12, is highly relevant to recent
revivals of the group mind hypothesis in both the biological and social
sciences. The biologist David Sloan Wilson has defended the group mind
hypothesis in the context of his broader defense of group selection in
evolutionary biology. The anthropologist Mary Douglas has suggested
that there is more to Ludwig Fleck’s notion of a Denkkollektiv or “thought
collective” than contemporary social scientists have recognized. As I shall
argue, there is something right about both of these claims – just what is
the topic of Part Four.18
2
Individuals, Psychology, and the Mind
1 psychology amongst the fragile sciences
In Chapter 1, I identified psychology as one of the fragile sciences. It is
the science of the mind. Historically, psychology developed as the institutional home for the scientific study of the mind in a variety of dimensions,
including cognitive, biological, and social dimensions. Along with these
distinct aspects to the mind, psychology has also encompassed many different organizing theories or paradigms. Consider just those that have
structured research within the cognitive dimension to psychology. These
range from introspectionism, Gestalt psychology, and behaviorism in the
first half of the recent history of psychology, to computationally based
paradigms, such as the “rules and representations” approach that began
the cognitive revolution in the 1950s, and connectionism and dynamic
systems theory that have challenged that approach more recently.

The contemporary discipline of psychology – sprawling, heterogeneous, and perhaps unitary in only the most attenuated of senses – is
the result of this ecumenical and paradigm-shifting history. Departments
of psychology in major research institutions are characteristically organized into divisions or subfields whose descriptive adjectives – such as
cognitive, developmental, social, perceptual, decision making, clinical,
quantitative, and personality – correspond to clusters of research interests, publication venues, and professional organizations. These divisions
frequently carry with them distinct courses, degree requirements, hiring
procedures, graduate admissions policies, and laboratory and seminar
meetings. In moderate to large psychology departments, it is common
for researchers to work exclusively within their division, and even to have
27
28 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
little or no professional contact with the majority of their departmental
colleagues in other divisions throughout their careers.

As well as being characterized as the science of the mind, “the science
of mental life,” as William James put it more than one hundred years
ago, psychology is also commonly viewed as being wedged between biology and the social sciences. This is so not only in representations of
hierarchies of sciences familiar from the logical positivist tradition within
the philosophy of science, but in characterizations of the methodologies
appropriate for the scientific study of mental life, which are drawn from
both the biological and the social sciences.

There is something right about both of these common views of psychology and the mind: The study of the mind is psychology’s prerogative, even
illustrated, the study of the mind can be directly relevant to, indeed, a
part of, the social sciences. Consider areas of the social sciences that are
concerned primarily with the operation of institutions or large-scale social changes rather than the minds of individuals. These operations and
changes are mediated by the actions of individuals. Accounts of them
typically propose or presuppose some principles governing the minds of
those individuals, whether this be rational choice theory (in economics)
or schema theory (in anthropology).

Aspects of the mind and mental life are also claimed by the biological
and medical sciences as their operational domain. Pathological development of the mind, such as that leading to mental retardation or a variety
of syndromes typically named after a person instrumental in their isolation and demarcation (for example, Williams, Asperger, and Down’s
syndromes), is often studied by geneticists and by medical doctors. Institutionally, psychiatry is a specialization within medicine, rather than
a field of psychology. This is motivated in part by the idea that mental
disorder should be assimilated to bodily disease. Moreover, techniques
developed within the biological sciences, such as single-cell recording or
positron-emission tomography (PET), have found widespread use in the
last twenty years in studying distinctively mental abilities and traits.

Despite contemporary psychology being a house of many mansions,
at its core is a focus on distinctly mental processes of individuals, human
agents. Minds belong to individuals, and the processes that constitute
minds occur inside the boundary of those individuals. Core topics within
the study of cognition, such as memory, language, or learning, are construed in this individualistic way. But such a view permeates psychology
Psychology
Biological Sciences
Social Sciences
mind-laden
interpersonal
figure 2.1. Psychology amongst the Fragile Sciences
more generally. How does what is inside an individual, particularly what
is inside her head, enable her to act on her environment, interact with
others, and dynamically adapt her behavior? Without distinctly mental
processes, we are in the realm of mere biology. And if we move on to encompass an exploration of the relationship between individuals, of processes and actions that extend beyond the boundary of the individual,
we move from psychology to the social sciences. We might encapsulate
this idea by saying that psychology is both mind laden (rather than mind
free) and individual bound (rather than interpersonal) and depict the
place of psychology within the fragile sciences through Figure 2.1: Since
psychology leaks into the rest of the fragile sciences, we should properly
locate some of its sub- (or related) disciplines, such as neurophysiology and psychophysics somewhere along the axis linking psychology to
the biological sciences, and others, such as social psychology and parts
of clinical psychology, along the axis linking psychology to the social
sciences.

Neither psychology as a discipline nor mind-laden individuals as the
subject matter of that discipline are givens. The discipline has not always
existed, and there is a history or a genealogy to the formation of the discipline that has involved construing individuals and minds in different ways
at different times. This chapter takes the historical contingency of psychology seriously, and attempts to draw several genealogical lines from its
early history to current presumptions about the boundaries of the mind.

I begin in the next section with some brief, general comments about the
disciplining of psychology before moving on in the following sections to
30 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
discuss how individuals and the mind were construed as psychology was
disciplined.

2 the disciplining of psychology
In The Order of Things, Michel Foucault provided a sweeping analysis of the
emergence of the disciplines of biology, economics, and philology in the
eighteenth century. Foucault’s analysis was aimed, in part, at illustrating
how both subject areas and individuals were disciplined in what I am calling the fragile sciences. This theme of the way in which the formation of
areas of discourse and knowledge is intertwined with the construction of
particular types or kinds of individuals became central to his more widely
read works, such as Discipline and Punish and The History of Sexuality.

1
Disciplines have a contingent rather than necessary existence. They
come into existence through a complex process with conceptual, social,
political, technical, and methodological aspects, and construct, rather
than simply discover, their subject area in the process. When their subject area concerns the individual, as it does for the most part in the fragile
sciences, that means constructing individuals in certain ways: identifying
some of their properties rather than others as important for this particular discipline, emphasizing some categories and kinds and not others as
those needed to classify individuals. Not just discourse and knowledge is
disciplined; so too are individuals.

Thus, the disciplining of psychology is intimately connected to the
disciplining of the individuals it studies. In part, this is because both processes are subject to the same historical contingencies, but also because
the individual and what lies inside it has become central to the very conception of the psychological. Certain construals of the individual, and
ways of studying the mind of the individual, are entrenched within the
discipline of psychology, and those construals are good for extracting
some types of knowledge, and bad for others.

Ebbinghaus’s famous remark that psychology has a short history but
a long past, made as the distinct disciplinary pathways of psychology and
philosophy were being sculptured in the late nineteenth century, has a
certain charm to it. Philosophers and psychologists alike regard it with
some fondness – in my view, with too much fondness. Although philosophers have offered various accounts of the mind and its place in nature
since at least the Greeks over 2,400 years ago, it was only in the nineteenth
century that the conceptual, methodological, and institutional prerequisites for a distinct science of psychology coalesced and the disciplining
of psychology began. No point in time, of course, demarcates the beginning of the scientific discipline of psychology from either prescientific
psychological thought or scientific nonpsychological investigation. Yet
two landmark events have been claimed as marking the beginning of psychology in the origin myths that contemporary psychologists often tell
themselves, a myth that I will rely on in what follows.2
The first is Wilhelm Wundt’s foundation of the first experimental laboratory devoted to the study of psychological phenomena in Leipzig in
1879. Wundt’s designation of his laboratory space as “psychological” was
preceded by a number of significant steps down the path to the formation
of a discipline. Included here are several decades of experimental work in
perceptual physiology and what Gustav Fechner had called psychophysics,
work headed by Hermann von Helmholtz, Eward Hering, and Fechner, as
well as Wundt’s own publication of the widely used and cited Foundations of
Physiological Psychology in 1874. The second is the publication of William
James’s Principles of Psychology in 1890, the book that James began by
identifying psychology as the “science of mental life, both of its phenomena and their conditions.” James’s Principles sought to integrate the rich,
philosophical tradition of work on the mind that ascribed a central place
to inward reflection on one’s conscious mental life with the developing
physiology of the nervous system. While both Wundt and James recognized the debt that psychology, conceived as a distinct science, owed to
physiology and psychophysics, both also characterized its distinctiveness
in terms of the nature of the phenomena that it investigated. These were
distinctly mental, and such phenomena could not be exhaustively understood in terms of existing physiological and psychophysical theory and
practice.3
As the origin myth implies, Wundt and James clearly did play important
roles in the disciplining of psychology from physiology and philosophy. In
the next section I shall spell out these roles more precisely before turning
to the question of the disciplining of psychology from the social sciences.

Individuals come to be conceptualized differently in different parts of
the fragile sciences, and this has left a legacy concerning how psychologists conceptualize individuals, minds, and the relationships between
them.

3 from physiology and philosophy: wundt and james
Physiology is the science that studies the structure and function of bodily
systems, including the nervous system. Like psychology, it did not always
32 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
exist. It was disciplined and emerged from anatomy as a distinctly experimental science in the first half of the nineteenth century, both in Germany
under Johannes Muller and more particularly his students, such as Emil ¨
Du Bois-Reymond and Helmholtz in the 1840s, and in France initially
under Francois Margendie and then later Claude Bernard in the ¸ 1850s.

Previous to this period, physiology had been secondary to anatomy, and as
such had focused on the identification and operation of physically localized biological structures, paradigmatically bones, muscles, and organs.

Physiology then was concerned principally with the internal organization
of the organism, rather than its dynamic functioning. As a systematic attempt to explain not just biological structures but also biological functions in physical terms, the beginnings of experimental physiology were
instrumental for those of psychology in an indirect and in a direct way.

Indirectly, the focus on function itself allowed physiologists to abstract
from particular, observable structures and explore the putative systems
performing those functions of which those structures formed a part. By
experimentally intervening in the operation of these systems, they could
reveal some of the complexity to the dynamics of physiological systems
without antecedently having to identify and characterize all of the component parts of those systems. Or, to put it in terms that will feature centrally
in my discussion of realization in Part Two, experimental physiology constituted a form of integrative synthesis. Here anatomically identified organs
were located within some broader, functional system, with integration
replacing localization as the corresponding technique of investigation.

Thus, experimental physiology carried with it the general idea that there
could be a properly scientific investigation of an organism that was, in a
certain sense, autonomous of detailed anatomy and further decompositional analysis.4
More directly, since some of the functions had a mental aspect to them
in that they involved the reactions and registrations of conscious beings,
experimental physiology could be directly applied to understanding the
mind, or at least parts of it. This was not least because the mind itself was
increasingly conceived as being realized in the brain and nervous system,
and this system was subject to increasing functional analysis throughout
the nineteenth century, beginning with the positing of distinct mental
functions in different parts of the brain by phrenologists in the early part
of the century. The first widely accepted evidence for the localization of
a specific mental ability – that of speech – in the cerebral cortex was Paul
Broca’s description of patients with damage in their left frontal lobes in
1861, patients who suffered from what is now known as “Broca’s aphasia.”
I have said that both Wundt and James viewed psychology in terms of its
concern with a distinctly mental life. This characterization of psychology
not only distinguished it from physiology, as I noted there, but also allied
it with traditional philosophical discussions of the mind that can be found
throughout the history of Western philosophy. This is one sense in which
psychology emerged between physiology and philosophy, between the
empirical and experimental exploration of the material world and the
a priori investigation of the mental world. It is perhaps worth reflecting
further on the gulf that existed between these two worlds, and so on
what sort of bridgework was done in the formation of psychology as a
discipline.

The dichotomy between mind and body has pervaded both common
sense and scientific thinking for the last 400 years. The study of the
mind was traditionally the province of philosophers, either as that branch
of “metaphysics” concerned with nonmaterial (but earthly) reality, the
mind, or as a branch of “morals” concerned with human nature and the
aptitudes contained within human agents. As the material world became
the subject of various disciplinary projects through the scientific revolution in the seventeenth century, questions concerning the nonmaterial
part of reality became more pressing. What was the reach of the corpuscularian, mechanical philosophy? Where did the immaterial parts of reality
fit into this worldview? How did these two worlds, that of the mind and
that of matter, connect?
Body and mind, and the relationship between them, constituted the
most obvious locus for the discussion of such questions. Bodies were
material. Individual human bodies became the subject of scientific investigation not only through the development of the practice of medical dissection, but also with corpuscular theory as an overarching metaphysics
for all material things, including bodies. Everything material, including
bodies, was made up, ultimately, of corpuscles, and could be understood
in principle in terms of their properties. If such a view pointed to the
way in which bodily activity could be understood, then the question of
whether this form of materialism could be extended to the mind itself
became a real one. Rene Descartes took his mechanical view of the world ´
to extend partly to what we might think of as the mind – to sensation and
reflexive movements, for example – but claimed that the most important
aspects of mind, typically reified as Reason and the Will, could not be understood through this kind of science. This general view remained widely
shared in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries by both rationalists
and empiricists, both within and beyond the corpuscularian framework.

34 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
This was a legacy in part of dualism about mind and body, and in part of
a concern with how far the knowledge new in the seventeenth century
could extend.

In Chapter 1, I claimed that this corpuscularian metaphysics has underwritten a quite general, pervasive attitude in the fragile sciences in the
twentieth century – that of smallism, discrimination in favor of the small
and so against the not-so-small. The application of corpuscular thinking
to the body constituted a way to extend a smallist metaphysics into the
realm of individuals, as did the positing of the “mental atoms” of sensation in the hands of British empiricists and their nineteenth-century
positivist successors. If dualism about mind and body preserved at least
aspects of the mind as exceptions to the reach of corpuscularianism, the
physiological basis to psychology whittled away this exceptionalism. Experimental psychology emerged in the nineteenth century in the grip of
the smallist visions that corpuscularianism had inspired.

Here, then, is the picture of the late nineteenth-century emergence of
the discipline of psychology that I am sketching. As physiology consolidated as a distinctive science, systematic accounts of sensory phenomena,
such as haptic and auditory discrimination, were developed, and seemingly more and more of the mind admitted of a physiological or physical
explanation. Combining the general point from physiology – that an
organism’s functions could be experimentally investigated independent
of a detailed knowledge of that organism’s physical anatomy – with the
legacy of dualism – that not all of the mind could be understood via the
dominant scientific paradigms – created space for an autonomous experimental science of the mind that went beyond “mere” philosophy. This
was the science of psychology.

The method of this new science was, like that of physiology, experimental. Complementary to the idea that psychology was the science
of mental life was the development of an experimental methodology
that was also introspective in nature. The combination of introspection
and the experimental method was the crux of Wundt’s contribution
to the emergence of psychology. Wundt was critical of the reliance on
what we might think of as unconstrained (that is, nonexperimental) introspection in studying the mind (what he called innere Wahrnehmung
[inner perception]), distinguishing this from the objective, controlled
self-observation (Selbstbeobachtung) around which he built his conception of psychology. Both the emergence of the discipline of psychology
from those of physiology and philosophy and its continuing connections
with those disciplines, and thus the fluidity of disciplinary boundaries at
the founding of psychology, are reflected in the careers of Wundt and
James.5
Wundt began teaching physiology at Heidelberg in the late 1850s after
having taken a doctorate there in medicine. He held professorships in
both anthropology and medical psychology at Heidelberg in the mid-
1860s, and then in the mid-1870s moved to Leipzig where he held
the position of professor of philosophy. Wundt remained influenced by
the philosophical work of Immanuel Kant and Arthur Schopenhauer
throughout his life, and published more purely philosophical works in
logic and ethics as well as those for which he is better remembered. Although Wundt’s Foundations was the best known and the most widely read
of his works during his lifetime, his conception of psychology is better
represented by the earlier publication of a pair of books: his Contributions
to the Theory of Sensory Perception in 1862, which concentrated on perceptual phenomena, and Lectures on Human and Animal Psychology in 1863,
a more wide-ranging and longer work that encompassed culture, society, emotion, and aesthetics. As both of these works indicate, Wundt’s
publication of his ten-volume “folk psychology” between 1900 and 1920
did not represent a shift from his earlier conception of psychology as a
methodologically introspective, experimental discipline, as is sometimes
claimed, but, rather, reflects Wundt’s initial conception of a discipline
with two faces: one experimental and concerned with in-the-head mental
processes, the other observational and focused on complicated mental
processes that involved external cultural representations.6
James had taken a medical degree at Harvard in 1869 and began his
teaching career there in the early 1870s in anatomy and physiology, moving on to teach physiological psychology in 1875, and finally giving his
first lectures in philosophy in 1879. In conjunction with the course in
physiological psychology, James had established a minor psychology laboratory prior to Wundt in the late-1870s, but unlike Wundt, James did
not use it as a base for recruiting and training graduate students. ( James
disliked doing laboratory work.) James’s professorial appointments at
Harvard were in physiology in 1876, philosophy in 1885, and then in psychology in 1889, shortly before the publication of his Principles in 1890.

Like Wundt, James formed part of a philosophical tradition, in James’s
case, the relatively recent and still developing tradition of American pragmatism, whose best known exponents, apart from James himself, were
Charles Sanders Pierce and John Dewey. And again like Wundt, after
forging a connection between physiology and psychology, James further
explored the mind in a nonexperimental context. In James’s case, the
36 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
focus was on psychical and supernatural phenomena, religious belief,
and pedagogy.

Psychology may have emerged from physiology and philosophy, but for
both Wundt and James it was never simply the extension of physiological
methodology to mental functions, nor merely the application of scientific techniques to resolve traditional philosophical questions about the
mind. It is not just that both Wundt and James had a more encompassing
conception of what the discipline of psychology was and to which other
fields it was allied than do the majority of contemporary psychologists, but
that they exploited the fluidity of the discipline in recognizing problems
with and limits to specific methodologies and assumptions. Perhaps this is
simply one way in which they both remained philosophers in establishing
the discipline of psychology.

4 disciplining the social aspects of the mind
If the object of study of psychology distinguished it from physiology as an
antecedently (but recently) established discipline within the university
system, and its experimental methodology distinguished it from philosophy, it was psychology’s concern with mental processes that occurred
within the individual that distinguished it from the later-developing field
of sociology. Social psychology is concerned largely with social aspects of
individual cognition, while sociologists are concerned with social systems
that are constituted by and influence the actions of individuals. This basic division remains in place today, with the field of social cognition, a
recent incarnation of how psychologists working within a cognitive and
often computational framework approach the social aspect to individual
cognition. Perhaps the most integrative perspectives within the two disciplines are to be found in the revival of symbolic interactionism within
both recent social psychology and sociology via a reappreciation of the
work of George Herbert Mead and Irving Goffman.7
August Comte has sometimes been represented as the founder of both
sociology and social psychology, and in characterizing sociology as a laterdeveloping discipline than psychology, I might be accused of overlooking
this or of ignoring the contribution of Comte to both disciplines. Comte’s
views themselves are interesting, especially in the context of thinking
about the later demarcation of sociology from psychology in terms of
what occurs within the boundary of an individual.

Comte coined the term sociologie as one of two species of “psychic” science. In doing so, Comte conceived of two aspects to the mind, leading
to two distinct paths to its study: the “static aspect,” leading to the study
of the organic, bodily basis for the mind, and the “dynamic aspect,” leading to sociology. According to Comte, this latter study “will simply amount
to tracing the course actually followed by the human mind in action,
through the examination of the methods really employed to obtain the
exact knowledge that it has already acquired.” That is, sociology, what
Comte also called “social physics,” would be a science based on the methods of natural science, these being those that have led to exact knowledge.

It would study complex relations between organisms in the way in which
physiology was beginning to study complex relations within organisms.8
This left no room for what would become the distinctive science of
psychology. Indeed, writing in the second quarter of the nineteenth century, Comte was skeptical of the idea that there could be a distinctive
psychological science, particularly one that made use of introspection,
on the grounds that this constituted a metaphysical rather than a positive
stage in the development of the science. Somewhat later, in his System
of Positive Polity, Comte foresaw the necessity of a science that integrated
physiology and sociology. Calling this science la morale, Comte claimed
that it would be “able to reduce to a system the special knowledge of
man’s individual nature, by duly combining the two points of view, the
Biologic, and the Sociologic, in which that nature must be necessarily
regarded.” But Comte died before this sort of suggestive comment was
developed more fully. Writing before psychology had been disciplined,
and given Comte’s own positivism about scientific inquiry, it is not clear
what shape la morale was to take.9
The interface between psychology and sociology qua disciplines in
the late nineteenth century was the nascent field of social psychology,
with both disciplines able to treat it from their own perspective. The
first textbook with “social psychology” in the title appeared in 1908, and
was written by the sociologist Edward A. Ross. Ross used the metaphors
of planes and currents of mental states to characterize social psychology, claiming that “[s]ocial psychology ...studies the psychic planes and
currents that come into existence among men in consequence of their
association.” Ross was concerned to explain the “planes of uniformity”
that one finds across individuals with respect to beliefs and actions as well
as the dynamics of the currents that sweep up individuals when they act
as members of a group at a particular time, such as during a lynching. As
a form of psychology, social psychology focuses on these planes and
currents as they act on individuals. This contrasts with sociology, which
focuses on human groups and structures themselves. What demarcates
38 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
social psychology from psychology more generally for Ross is that social
psychology is concerned to identify causes of individual human behavior that derive from outside the individual; these Ross calls suggestions,
and his focus is on social factors that influence the human psychological disposition to suggestibility. Note that for Ross, social psychology is a
discipline that theorizes exclusively about human beings.10
There is an interesting contrast between this perspective on social
psychology and that of the psychologist William McDougall, whose An
Introduction to Social Psychology also appeared in 1908. McDougall is chiefly
concerned to show that there is an area of psychology – social psychology –
that treats an individual’s psychology as more encompassing than simply
that individual’s consciousness or mental life, and that serves as the foundation for the social sciences. Put the other way around, McDougall seeks
to show, against sociologists such as Durkheim and Comte, that the social
sciences are not independent of psychology, since there is a conception
of psychology that is broader than the experimental introspectionism
that had been extracted from Wundt’s approach to scientific psychology. This aspect of psychology studies an individual’s innate instincts,
and McDougall identifies its appeal to evolutionary theory as the ground
for the expectation of psychological continuities between humans and
(other) animals. The first three-quarters of McDougall’s book (Section I)
is devoted to his instinct theory; only the last quarter (Section II) turns
to how some of these instincts operate to form the basis of human societies. Amongst McDougall’s list of instincts are flight, repulsion, curiosity,
pugnacity, self-abasement, and self-assertion – which play little role in his
account of human social organization – and the parental, reproductive,
and gregarious instincts – which play a more significant role here.

Here I want to register three points of contrast between Ross and
McDougall in terms of how they conceptualize the social aspect of psychology. First, while McDougall is particularly concerned to explain human
social life on the basis of a subset of his instincts, on his conception instinct
theory should also explain features of nonhuman social life. Thus, the
scope of social psychology is broader than it is under Ross’s conception.

Second, as a psychologist, McDougall begins with a rich conception of
what is within the individual and offers a much thinner characterization
of the social phenomena that his instincts purport to explain, while Ross,
as a sociologist, has just the opposite emphasis or bias. Third, McDougall
is wary not only of social science that ignores psychology but that which
builds on what he regards as a misleading psychology. Included here
would likely be Ross’s own appeal to suggestibility as a basic feature of
the human mind, it being little more than an attribution to individuals
of a psychological disposition that parallels a social phenomenon, that of
individuals whose actions are influenced by the suggestion of others.

In the previous section, I argued, in effect, that psychology overcame
a putative subsumptive challenge from both physiology and philosophy
by demarcating itself in terms, respectively, of its endorsement of experimental methodology and its articulation of a distinct level of organismic
abstraction. One might wonder, by contrast, whether the “within the individual” criterion really functioned (and functions) to demarcate social
psychology from sociology. In fact, sociology never posed a threat of subsumption to psychology; rather, from the outset, sociology itself was concerned to establish its own autonomy from other disciplines, including
psychology.

Perhaps best known here is Emile Durkheim’s statement that “a social
fact can be explained only by another social fact ... Sociology is, then, not
an auxiliary of any other science; it is in itself a distinct and autonomous
science.” This aspect to Durkheim’s thought is provokingly developed in
a classic discussion of the nature of representation in psychology. Writing after the foundations had been laid for the discipline of psychology,
Durkheim recognized an individual level of representation that governs
individual behavior, but claimed that in addition there are collective representations that are not in any sense reducible to or explainable by reference solely to what goes on in the heads of individuals. Just as individual
representations are no mere “echo” or epiphenomena of cerebral activity, claimed Durkheim, so too are collective representations not inherent
in or intrinsic to individual minds. Durkheim sought to distinguish such
collective representations from anything interior to individuals, and in so
doing was the first in a long line of social scientists to create or maintain
a space for social sciences, which relied little, if at all, on psychology. We
will return to discuss this idea of collective representations in Part Four.11
The foregoing historical reconstruction of the partial origins of psychology as a distinct discipline, brief as it is, takes us beyond the obvious
fact that psychology concerns first and foremost individual human agents
to the more interesting issue of the ways in which human agency has been
construed in psychology. For philosophers, physiologists, and sociologists
not only generalized and theorized about the individual: Each construed
the individual in a particular way. Philosophers concerned with the mind
thought of the individual as a receiver of sense impressions from the
world (in the empiricist tradition) or as the source of innate ideas (in the
rationalist tradition). Physiologists viewed individuals as complicated sets
of biological systems that were integrated into a functioning whole. And
sociologists saw the individual as a Janus-faced figure at the intersection
40 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
of the purely biological or physical world and the social world. Each of
these disciplines, of necessity, abstracted away from individuals in situ.

In the next two sections, and following the work of the historian of
psychology Kurt Danziger, I shall focus on the abstractions made within
psychology itself and the ways in which they have shaped the sort of
science that psychology has become, particularly the ways in which psychology was developed as an experimental science. In particular, I shall
discuss the conception of individuals in the psychological paradigms initiated by Wundt, and then turn to that within the Galtonian paradigm for
psychology. Both abstract individuals from their social and physical contexts in an attempt to make individuals scientifically and mathematically
tractable, but do so in very different ways.12
5 wundt’s individuals
For introspection to yield a repeatable, quantifiable result, not any old
inward-looking report under physical stimulation would do, and unregimented introspection yielded reports that varied in accord with the
theoretical proclivities of the laboratories in which they were produced.

Within Wundtian experimental psychology, one solution was to ensure
that the subject was someone with a sort of expertise in being able to
attend to and report on the contents of his or her consciousness correctly under experimental conditions. It is for this reason that Wundt
himself or one of his assistants typically played the role of subject in his
experiments; as Danziger says, “the experimental subject was the scientific observer, and the experimenter was really a kind of experimental
assistant.” The reliability of one’s findings was measured in the first instance by intrasubjective agreement over repeated trials, with replication
of this reliability across subjects being initially of less significance. As
Danziger puts it, in the Wundtian paradigm the individual subject was an
“exemplar of the generalized human mind,” and intersubjective replication of an experimental finding served simply to confirm an antecedently
established finding.13
As we have seen, Wundt himself thought that you could investigate
only elementary psychological processes through this method, with complex processes being studied in the broader social contexts in which
they were embedded, and through methods that linked psychology to
the humanities and social sciences. Whatever Wundt’s own intent, his
view amounted to a sort of bipartite view of the psychological, with the
experimental subject investigated individualistically and the individual’s
broader psychological features, such as his personality, his temporally extended consciousness, his sociality, divorced from this paradigm and studied largely beyond the laboratory. It was a relatively small step from such
a bipartite view of the psychological to full-scale psychological apartheid,
whereby only the individualistic construal of the individual survived as a
part of psychology proper.

Thus, even though the particular identity of the individual subject
was important to the success of the Wundtian experiment, this was a
thin identity, not one to which the person more fully considered was
relevant. This assumption about individuals – that specific aspects of their
mental processing can be experimentally investigated in isolation from
the broader psychological and social profiles of those individuals – has
been generalized in contemporary psychology and survived through the
behaviorist and cognitive revolutions of the twentieth century.

The Wundtian paradigm thus both relied on a thin construal of the
subject and recognized limitations of the scope of experimental psychology. These two aspects of the Wundtian construction of the individual
were corollaries of his attempt to study the “generalized human mind”
scientifically, and both promoted an individualistic view of the discipline
of psychology. The individualism within the experimental part of the
Wundtian paradigm – its bracketing off of the individual’s broader psychological and social life in order to focus on understanding elementary
psychological processes – might be thought to be a necessary corollary
of any experimental investigation of psychological processes that occur
within the head of an individual and that are not simply idiosyncratic
to that individual. The very point of experimentation, after all, is to isolate the specific factor responsible for a certain, observable effect: Bracketing off or controlling certain factors is necessary in order to investigate others. But while this general point about experimental control is
true, this leads to individualism about psychology only on the assumption
that embedded aspects to an individual’s mental states can always be (or
even are ideally) bracketed out through experimental control and leave
something of genuine psychological interest. In Parts Two and Three, I
shall argue that an individual’s mind may be more deeply socially and
physically embedded than this implies.

6 galton’s individuals
Sir Francis Galton, a first cousin of Charles Darwin, was an idiosyncratic
pioneer in a variety of areas of what was becoming psychology in the
42 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
late nineteenth century. Consider three of his better known initiatives,
all of which have left their trace on contemporary psychology. Galton
developed techniques of composite portraiture and applied them to the
study of judgments of beauty; he introduced statistical techniques for
generalizing about groups of subjects; and he initiated the use of twin
studies in studying the mind. In addition, Galton systematically explored
specific mental faculties (such as that for mental imagery), and placed
the scientific examination of mental qualities in an evolutionary and anthropological context. Unlike Wundt and James, Galton conducted most
of his psychological investigations as a gentleman scholar, rather than as
a university professor. Galton’s influence on the practice of psychology,
however, is at least as great as that of Wundt and James. This legacy is
manifest in much that is at the core of experimental methodology within
psychology, and was established in part through Galton’s influence on
“applied” areas of psychology, such as education and what we might think
of as public mental health.

The Galtonian paradigm arose to prominence with and through the
development of mental testing and has had more far-reaching effects
on the conduct of psychology than perhaps any other single approach.

Galton began by combining his belief in the heritability of traits of all
sorts with his adaptation of Adolphe Quetelet’s insights about statistical measurement in a population, originally with Hereditary Genius and
later in Inquiries into Human Faculty and its Development. At his notorious
“anthropometric laboratory” at the International Health Exhibition in
London in 1884, Galton sought to measure human psychological abilities by having many individuals perform certain tasks, and then applying
statistical analysis to the population of results obtained. These abilities
were quite general, characterlike intellectual dispositions that were close
to ordinary folk psychological ways of describing the stable mental life of
individuals.14
Galton’s interest in such abilities derived from two beliefs he held.

The first was that mental characteristics should be treated just like bodily
characteristics and other features of the natural world. The second was
that since mental traits were heritable they could either be selected for or
against in a population. Hence, the link between the Galtonian paradigm
and the eugenics movement. Galton’s interest was not so much in what
cluster of abilities his subjects possessed, but, rather, in the distribution of
abilities in a population of subjects, and thus by extrapolation, in the population more generally. Such a distribution was used to establish norms
that could be used to make judgments about particular individuals, where
what was being judged were the innate biological propensities of those
individuals. Thus, individuals remain the subject matter of psychological
attribution, but their role as subjects of experimentation is very different
than in the Wundtian paradigm. As Danziger puts it:
To make interesting and useful statements about individuals it was not necessary
to subject them to intensive experimental or clinical exploration. It was only necessary to compare their performance with that of others, to assign them a place in
some aggregate of individual performances. Individuals were now characterized
not by anything actually observed to be going on in their minds or organisms but
by their deviation from the statistical norm established for the population with
which they had been aggregated.

Thus, the individual experimental subject simply provides data used to
construct an aggregate or collective subject about which generalizations
are formed, and individuals are then judged relative to this collective
subject.15
In contrast to the regimentation of the individual that characterized
the Wundtian experimental paradigm, the Galtonian paradigm of psychology encouraged an almost playful interaction between investigator
and subject. This was not, however, because the Galtonian paradigm was
any less individualistic but because it developed a battery of measurements whose reliability did not depend on control of the precise conditions under which they were taken. Indeed, the Galtonian and experimental paradigms share the idea that psychological propensities inhere
in subjects and could be investigated without regard to the social backgrounds of those subjects. As with the Wundtian paradigm, the mental
abilities of individuals within the Galtonian paradigm are not simply in
the individual but are so in such a way as to imply that they can be adequately investigated in abstraction from that individual’s environment.

Consider the basic process leading to psychological judgment and generalization in the Galtonian paradigm. First, we begin with tasks that can
be understood with minimal explanation, attempted by anyone regardless of their particular background, and completed through the agency of
an individual person. Second, we devise a performance scale that we can
use to grade individual performance on these tasks, ideally one that can
be calibrated around a standard distribution curve. Third, we measure
the performance of a large number of individuals on these tasks. Fourth,
we statistically analyze the performance of this population of individuals
and use this to construct a collective subject. Fifth, we locate, rank, or
taxonomize particular individuals relative to this collective subject.

44 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
While I think that an individualistic perspective permeates all five
of these steps, I want to focus on Galton’s tasks and the testing situation invoked at the first step. As Danziger notes, performances on these
tasks “defined characteristics of independent, socially isolated individuals and these characteristics were designated ‘abilities.’”16 The governing
assumption of the testing situation itself, however, is that the psychological abilities of interest are those that can be assessed by probing an
individual in abstraction not only from her real life, social environment,
but from any substantial social environment. For Galton, this assumption
was underwritten by the search for heritable, biological factors governing
cognition. But the assumption itself is independent of Galton’s particular
motivation, and I want to ask why one might think that it is true.

One reason, one that I have found sometimes offered by psychologists
themselves in conversation, is that this is just what psychological abilities
are: They are dispositions that individuals carry around with them from
situation to situation. Psychological abilities are intrinsic dispositions,
and as such they do not rely in any substantive way on specific social
or other extraindividual circumstances. This is an individualistic view
of dispositions, and in Part Two, I shall introduce a framework in which
there is a place for an alternative understanding of dispositions, including
psychological dispositions. On this view, dispositions may be irreducibly
embedded in that they are not simply fixed or determined by the intrinsic,
physical properties of the individuals that have them. This view lays a
metaphysical foundation for developing an externalist psychology that
departs from both the Wundtian and Galtonian paradigms.

One might be both more metaphysically reserved about the nature
of psychological dispositions than encapsulated in the above line of argument, and more pluralistic about the place of heritable mental traits
in the study of the mind than was Galton himself. Suppose then that
there are just some psychological abilities that are intrinsic to individuals,
for whatever etiological reason. For these, at least, surely the Galtonian
paradigm of mental testing provides a way to meaningfully measure the
mind.

This seems to me to be likely to be true, although it stops short of
establishing the claim that such psychological abilities are, in some way,
more important than embedded abilities, or that they provide the key
to understanding such abilities and the individuals who have them. To
view the Galtonian paradigm from both a less individualistic and a more
pluralistic perspective is, I suspect, to assign it a more restricted role
within future psychology than it has had historically.

7 nativism and the continuity thesis
I would like to close the substantive part of this chapter by returning to
Ebbinghaus’s remark that psychology has a short history but a long past.

This chapter has focused on the short history and ignored the long past.

A substantive reason for this focus is my view that the disciplining of
the individual within psychology in the particular ways that continue to
pervade psychology are inextricably entwined with the disciplining of
psychology as an academic field in the late nineteenth century. But there
are also ways in which psychology’s long past can distort, and not just
dilute, our view of the individual, and I want to return to the debate over
nativism that we discussed in Chapter 1 in order to illustrate this claim.

The debate over nativism is typically considered as exemplifying the
sort of truth expressed by Ebbinghaus’s remark, with the long history
reaching back via the positions of classic rationalists and empiricists in
the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries all the way to Plato. This view
of the debate involves accepting what I shall call the continuity thesis, the
claim that contemporary positions in this debate are continuous with
thinkers of times long gone, particularly early modern “rationalists” and
“empiricists.” The continuity thesis is close to ubiquitous amongst cognitive scientists who glance back at the history of philosophy in locating
their views.17
While the broad sweep that the continuity thesis invites can be useful, I
think that we should be more cautious about its embrace than most have
been. There are important differences between the traditional and contemporary discussions. Using the two-dimensional analysis of the nativism
debate from Chapter 1 as a lens, I will focus on three related features of
the classical positions and debate that make for important differences
with the contemporary literature. These are the concern with justification and thus normativity, the (near) absence of a psychology, and the
commitment to a dualist view of the mind.

First, the traditional rationalist-empiricist debate is largely concerned
with investigating the foundations, scope, and limits of human knowledge. That is, it is a debate within epistemology in general and over the
nature of knowledge and justification in particular. This normative dimension is peripheral to contemporary discussions of nativism in the
cognitive sciences. Broadly speaking, early modern empiricists, such as
John Locke, George Berkeley, and David Hume, hold that all of our
knowledge derives from our sensory, experiential, or empirical interaction with the world, either in the sense that all knowledge is acquired,
46 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
ultimately, from the senses, or in the sense that the ultimate justifications
that there are for the knowledge we have are grounded in the senses.

Early modern rationalists, such as Rene Descartes, Gottfried Leibniz, and ´
Benedict Spinoza, by contrast, hold the negation of either or both of
these views, that is, either that there is some knowledge that does not derive from experience, or there is some knowledge that cannot be justified
by appeal to experience.

These claims about acquisition and justification were intimately connected in all of these writers in the classical rationalist-empiricist debate.

Their primary concern, however, was with the epistemological question
of whether certain knowledge claims were justified, and the nature of
that justification. For them, the threat of skepticism, the view that there
is no knowledge, loomed large. Claiming that certain ideas were or were
not acquired in a certain way established a position on this epistemological issue. For example, to claim that the notion of causation could not
be acquired through sense experience, as David Hume famously argued,
was a way of undermining whatever justification there was for relying on
that notion in our reasoning and theorizing about the world. To claim,
as Locke did at the outset of Book II of An Essay Concerning Human Understanding, that all ideas derive from experience, is to imply that one cannot
justify any ideas by appeal to their innateness. These links between the
acquisition and justification of ideas are largely absent in contemporary
debates over nativism – except when authors are attempting explicitly to
support the continuity thesis.

Suppose that we put this difference to one side and focus instead
on what might be thought to be a common preoccupation with the acquisition of knowledge and ideas. This brings me to a second reason for
resisting the continuity thesis. While at a superficial level there is a shared
interest in “where ideas come from,” both the external minimalism thesis and (more obviously) the internal richness thesis are claims about the
processes governing cognition. This concern with how cognition works is
all but absent in both classical rationalists and empiricists, who disagree
over the products of cognition, particularly over whether those products,
especially ideas, were acquired. This could be put (no doubt, too strongly)
by saying that there is no psychology in the classical tradition. Let me say
more about what I mean by this and the contrast I have in mind.

Since at least our paradigms of knowledge – knowledge of our immediate environments, of common physical objects, of scientific kinds –
seem obviously to be acquired through sense experience, empiricism
has some prima facie intuitive appeal. Why not suppose that all our
knowledge is like those paradigms? Rationalism, by contrast, requires
further motivation: minimally, a list of knowables that represent a putative challenge to the empiricist’s global claim about the foundations
of knowledge. Early modern rationalists included knowledge of God,
substance, and abstract ideas (such as that of a triangle, as opposed to
ideas of particular triangles), claiming that such knowledge and the corresponding ideas do not derive from sense experience but are part of
the mind’s innate endowment that is merely elicited by environmental
interaction. But there is no particular claim about the cognitive processes
and structures that underlie such innate ideas; indeed, this type of nativism is compatible with a consistent skepticism or agnosticism about our
ability to know about the structure of the mind at all. Hence, while early
modern rationalists share with contemporary nativists something similar
to the external minimalism thesis, they hold such a thesis with respect to
ideas, rather than the processes underlying those ideas; moreover, they
have nothing like an internal richness thesis on the table.

Likewise, while early modern empiricists deny something like the external minimalism thesis about the contents of the mind, they too have
little to say about the structure of the mind, and lack any view corresponding to a denial of the internal richness thesis. Given the currency
of the continuity thesis, particularly amongst those who see empiricism as
constituting a sustained tradition, this claim requires further discussion.

Some contemporary empiricists view our cognitive architecture as
structured by a relatively small number of general principles and mechanisms that govern all of our perceptual and cognitive abilities, with these
mechanisms being deployed in different ways in light of particular experiential inputs. Thus, in connectionist models, backpropagation constitutes
a general type of learning algorithm that is tailored by means of particular learning sets to guide performance in various perceptual, cognitive,
and linguistic tasks. Early modern empiricists might be thought to share
this same general view of the structure of the mind: It is governed by a
few global processes, such as association and similarity, and so constitutes
a domain-general device. Common as this view is, it paints a misleading
picture of early modern empiricism.

Common to all early modern empiricists is some version of the distinction between, to use Locke’s terms, simple ideas and complex ideas.

Global processes are introduced not to explain how original or simple
ideas are acquired (and thus justified), but how we move beyond these to
derived or complex ideas. The account of how we acquire our simple
ideas is extremely thin, discussion being focused instead on the simple
48 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
ideas themselves and how they are taxonomized. Locke, for example,
discusses simple ideas in terms of the ways in which they are acquired,
that is, by one sense, multiple senses, reflection, and both sensation and
reflection. But the focus here is on the ideas themselves, particularly on
what introspection can reveal about them, rather than on the processes
generating them. Furthermore, although Locke lists what he calls combination, association, and abstraction as the three chief ways in which
complex ideas are derived from simple ideas, there is little attention to
how these processes operate. The bulk of the remaining twenty or so
chapters in Book II are devoted, again, to the ideas themselves, not to
the processes putatively generating them.18
A third reason for denying the continuity thesis, or viewing it as of
limited significance, is that both rationalists and empiricists were, by and
large, dualists, either about the nature of substance or about the nature
of the properties that substances had. That is, since neither rationalists
nor empiricists were physicalists about the mind, their views of how the
mind was structured were views about the contents of minds, the products
of mental substance that could be examined through introspection. This
dualism also explains, I think, why within the traditional debate between
classical rationalists and empiricists there is not only no argument over the
internal richness thesis but little by way of a psychological story at all cast
in terms of the mechanisms governing the processes that generate our
ideas. Very few cognitive scientists are professed dualists about cognition.

In short, the continuity thesis minimizes the normative dimension
to the traditional debate between rationalists and empiricists, suggests a
concern with the nature of psychological processes where it does not exist,
and overlooks the significance of the difference between “psychology” as
conducted within dualist and physicalist frameworks.

8 overlaying the mind
I have been interested in this chapter in identifying some of the abstractions from what we might think of as full individuality that are made
within particular paradigms of psychology, and have done so via a very
partial treatment of aspects of the early history of psychology. I have focused on cognitive abilities (rather than, say, on personality traits), and
on abstractions in which an individual’s social, ecological, and physical
“contexts” are thought of as something into which an individual can be
inserted once we complete our characterization of that individual’s psychology. As the subject of psychological states, individuals have often been
construed individualistically in the specific sense that factors outside of
the boundary of the individual organism are bracketed off or treated
in some secondary way. This has meant that features of individuals
that seem intuitively to be important to how those individuals function
psychologically – such as their location in a particular set of cultural
practices, their thoughts having particular meaning, or their belonging
to groups with specific characteristics – have been viewed as peripheral
to psychology per se. As the psychologist Jerome Bruner has put it, they
have been viewed as overlays to, rather than constituents of, an individual’s
psychology.19
In drawing attention to this dimension of psychology, I hope at least to
have raised the question of whether psychology need be individualistic in
this sense, and whether some of the ways in which individuals have been
viewed within psychology are as innocuous as they might initially seem.

The externalist psychology developed in Parts Two and Three provides
a way, or a variety of ways, of developing cultural, social, and semantic
aspects to cognition within one’s psychology, rather than laid over on
top of it. This has implications, in turn, for how we conceptualize the
relationship between psychology and some of the disciplines with which
it shares a border zone.

3
Nativism on My Mind
1 nativist threads
The issue of nativism was used in Chapter 1 to illustrate two points. First,
adopting a shared framework for understanding various individualistic
theses across the cognitive, biological, and social sciences can be mutually
informative. Second, these individualistic perspectives have ramifications
for central debates across the fragile sciences. To make these points I
introduced a two-dimensional analysis of a range of nativist debates: about
the mind, biology, and culture. Here I develop and defend that analysis
in more detail with a particular focus on nativism about cognition and
the mind.

I begin in section 2 by tracing the most influential nativist lineage in
the cognitive sciences. This lineage begins with the Chomskyan revolution in linguistics, a revolution that is generalized to other aspects of cognition by philosophers and developmental and cognitive psychologists
and then further extended and given a Darwinian twist by evolutionary
psychologists. I then turn in section 3 to the chief alternative to such
nativist views, often characterized as “empiricist,” and briefly explain why
behaviorist and connectionist views of cognition are paradigms of such
alternatives. In sections 4–6, the heart of the chapter, I reintroduce, develop, and defend the two-dimensional account of the debate over nativism about the mind. There has been a recent revival of attempts to
analyze nativism about cognition in fewer and in more dimensions than
two, and part of my defense of the two-dimensional analysis will involve
showing its superiority to its contemporary competitors. Finally, in sections 7–9, I return to issues raised in considering nativism debates across
50
the fragile sciences: whether we need more than two dimensions in order
to understand some specific nativist views, and how to build on the application of the two-dimensional view to the biological sciences sketched in
Chapter 1.

1
2 from chomsky to fodor to pinker: a thumbnail
Nativist views of the mind came to prominence with the rise of the cognitive sciences through the revolution in linguistics led by Noam Chomsky.

The phonological and syntactic regularities to be found in spoken and
heard sentences in particular natural languages required explanation, as
did the apparent ease with which those languages were acquired, and the
flexibility of children as language learners. Chomsky pointed to an underlying cognitive complexity, one that arose from the mind itself, rather
than the “stimulus” that led to the acquisition of spoken language, as
lying at the root of a common explanation for these facts about natural languages. As tragic cases of extreme linguistic deprivation showed,
linguistic stimulation of some kind was necessary for the acquisition of
language. But the “poverty of the stimulus” suggested that the contribution of the mind to natural language was innate rather than learned or
in some other way a reflection of complexity in the environment. This
innate contribution, universal or generative grammar, is itself structured,
and encompasses an individual’s phonological, syntactic, and semantic
knowledge.

Many of the aspects to this Chomskyan paradigm for language and
their implications for cognition more generally are expressed succinctly
in the following passage from Chomsky’s work:
[H]uman cognitive systems, when seriously investigated, prove to be no less marvelous and intricate than the physical structures that develop in the life of the
organism. Why, then, should we not study the acquisition of a cognitive structure
such as language more or less as we study some complex bodily organ?... Even
knowing little of substance about linguistic universals, we can be quite sure that
the possible variety of languages is sharply limited. ... The language each person acquires is a rich and complex construction hopelessly underdetermined by
the fragmentary evidence available [to the child]. Nevertheless individuals in a
speech community have developed essentially the same language. This fact can be
explained only on the assumption that these individuals employ highly restrictive
principles that guide the construction of grammar.2
As the first half of this quotation says, the part of the mind responsible
for language should be viewed as complex bodily organs, such as kidneys
52 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
or hearts. Yet as suggested by the remainder of the quotation, what the
language organ produces is itself structurally complex. Linguistic complexity is to be explained by an appeal to complexity in the mind of the
organism. Thus, the language organ must have a structure that can be expressed as a series of principles generating the complexity in the natural
language it produces.

Although Chomsky focuses on language and how facts about its complexity, acquisition, and universality should be explained, as the reference above to “human cognitive systems”suggests, Chomsky sees his views
about language as having broader implications for how we should study
cognition and behavior more generally. The basic properties of cognitive
systems are innate in the mind, part of the human biological endowment, on a par with whatever determines the specific, internally directed
course of embryological development, or of sexual maturation in later
years.3
Jerry Fodor has been foremost in extending a number of aspects of
Chomskyan nativism to the mind more generally. In particular, he has
argued for two views that can be seen in this light. First Fodor has argued
that there is a general language of thought that is innate, a sort of universal grammar for thinking, whose atomic components (concepts) are
built into the structure of the mind. Second, Fodor views the cognitive
architecture of the mind as including a range of mental organs, each
operating in some particular domain.4
The first of these claims has been defended as part of Fodor’s computational theory of mind, and includes a radical form of nativism about
concepts. As Fodor says,
such cognitive theories as are currently available presuppose an internal language
in which the computational processes they postulate are carried out. ... [T]he
same models imply that that language is extremely rich (i.e., that it is capable
of expressing any concept that the organism can learn or entertain) and that its
representational power is, to all intents and purposes, innately determined.5
Fodor is skeptical of all extant accounts of concept acquisition, and he
views virtually all lexical concepts as innate. As Laurence and Margolis
note in a recent discussion, this radical concept nativism has won very
few converts in the cognitive sciences over the almost thirty-year period
during which Fodor has advocated it.6
By contrast, Fodor’s development of the idea of a mental organ has
been enthusiastically endorsed by perceptual, cognitive, and developmental psychologists. Indeed, this modularity thesis has been extended
beyond the bounds that Fodor originally set for it – sensory perception
plus language – to distinctly “central processes,” such as reasoning and
inference, an extension that Fodor remains critical of. The most enthusiastic application of the modularity thesis has been made by evolutionary
psychologists, who view the mind as composed of thousands of innately
specified modules that operate across the full range of cognitive domains,
not just those that are perceptual.7
Evolutionary approaches to understanding the mind start with Darwin
and Spencer themselves, but it is only via the notion of modularity that
such approaches have entered into the mainstream of thinking about
cognition. Evolutionary psychologists not only blend an evolutionary perspective on cognition together with a strong modular view of the mind,
but do so using the tools of experimental psychology that are central
to the cognitive sciences. Foundational here has been the work of Leda
Cosmides and John Tooby on social reasoning.8
Cosmides sought to understand the varying (and often dismal) performance on a standard, experimental reasoning task that involved subjects
deciding which of four double-sided cards to turn over in order to determine whether a given, simple rule had been adhered to or broken. The
task was initially devised in the 1960s by the psychologist Peter Wason
to explore Karl Popper’s ideas about the role of falsification in science,
and the literature that this paradigm had generated over a twenty-year
period was vast. Cosmides’s general idea was that we could best make
sense of basic performance on the task, where less than 10% of subjects
succeed, and that on modified versions of the task, by thinking of reasoning not as a general ability but as a domain-specific faculty that evolved to
solve social problems. Cosmides’s specific hypothesis is that the aspect of
this ability drawn on in the Wason tasks and its variants is the detection
of those who break social rules. In short, what happens in such tasks is
that a social reasoning module, equipped with a cheater-detection algorithm, is pressed into service beyond the reasoning domain in which it
evolved.

The basic metaphor that evolutionary psychologists have used for the
structure of the mind is that of the mind as a Swiss army knife, containing
many specialized pieces. These pieces, mental modules, can be pressed
into service for a range of tasks, but each evolved in the history of the
species (and beyond) to fulfill some particular cognitive task within some
specific domain. These tasks were set as evolutionarily significant problems, and they were solved through the evolution of specific mental modules. Amongst the many modules posited by evolutionary psychologists,
54 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
apart from those for social reasoning, are those that govern criteria for
mate selection and standards of beauty, eye direction detection and the
theory of mind, and principles of generalization. As Cosmides and Tooby
make clear in their thinking about the adapted mind more generally, and
as the psychologist Steve Pinker has emphasized, evolutionary psychology revolutionizes how we should think about the social sciences and the
relationship between the mind and culture.9
3 empiricist alternatives to nativism
Although nativist views of the mind have been influential within the cognitive sciences, they are far from having won ubiquitous support. The
chief antinativist views about cognition are empiricist. Nativists and empiricists share a commitment to the idea that there is at least some given,
built-in organismic contribution to cognition, but differ on the nature of
this contribution. In general terms, empiricists locate this contribution
in our perceptual or sensory apparatus, not in the mind itself, and hold
that the only genuinely cognitive structures and representations that are
innate are general purpose, of the one-size-fits-all variety. What ends up
in the mind, both content and structure, is a function of an organism’s
perceptual and sensory experience of the world. Cognitive structures and
representations are thus not hard wired in the design of the organism
but are contingent in some deep way on the nature of the interactions
between an organism and its environment across the sensory and perceptual interface.

In the dialectic between nativism and empiricism in the twentieth century study of cognition, behaviorism looms large. Classic behaviorism
dominated psychology from roughly 1920–60, and the cognitive revolution in both linguistics and psychology was very much directed at
overthrowing this paradigm, beginning with Noam Chomsky’s famous
critique of B.F. Skinner’s Verbal Behavior. And critiques of and recent
alternatives to the nativist views sketched in the preceding section are
often characterized as neo-behaviorist. There are many strands that run
through behaviorist views in psychology: the emphasis on observation
and empirical data, the corresponding skepticism about “theoretical”
posits, the priority given to laboratory studies of model organisms and
the putative generalizability of results from such organisms to human beings. However, it is not my intention here to provide a detailed survey of
behaviorism, but both to show the opposition between empiricism and
nativism and to explain why behaviorism is a paradigm of empiricism
about cognition.10
The two aspects of behaviorism most relevant for these purposes are
the primacy it accords perception and sensation and the central role that
learning plays as a mechanism for the acquisition of complex behaviors.

For behaviorists, sensory and perceptual abilities provide the developmental basis for the acquisition of all other psychological and behavioral
capacities, and organisms move from this sensory base to what might
be called cognition proper through one or another process of learning.

Learning involves a change in the capacities of an organism or system
in response to its interactions with the environment, where these capacities are cognitive in some broad and intuitive sense. (Building up your
muscles at the gym satisfies the chief clause, but not the qualification.)
This process may take various forms, including associative learning, where
two or more presented stimuli become linked together by the organism;
latent learning, where information about an environment (for example,
spatial layout) is gathered at some time but not manifest or deployed
until some subsequent occasion; or skill learning, where what is learned
is a particular skill, such as bicycle riding, reading, or the ability to play
chess. For behaviorists, the most important of these is associative learning, since it is a general process that, in principle, allows any perceptible
stimuli to be connected by the organism and leads to the modification
of its behavior. It is the means by which an organism, supposedly beginning just with sensory primitives and general psychological mechanisms,
acquires the variety of knowledge that it ends up possessing; it is how
environmental complexity leads to or produces organismic complexity.

The centrality of learning for behaviorists is reflected in their emphasis
on techniques of conditioning and in their attempted development of a
generalized learning theory that applies to any behavior that is cognitive
in a broad and intuitive sense.

If the twentieth-century nativist-empiricist dialectic begins with the
Chomskyan challenge to the empiricist paradigm of behaviorism, it has
been continued by a newer empiricist alternative, that provided by connectionism. Connectionism was developed in the early 1980s as a computational modeling technique alternative to that embodied by “classical”
or “traditional” artificial intelligence. Like behaviorism, its empiricism
was manifest in its emphasis on explaining complex capacities in terms
of the operation of learning strategies or rules on relatively simple inputs.

Rather than viewing the innate cognitive contributions of the organism
to be specific, rich, and “high-level” in structure, connectionists place an
emphasis on environmental stimuli (the initial data set) and powerful,
general computational algorithms that are reapplied to an initial data set
to generate complex outputs.

56 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
One computational model that illustrates the challenge that connectionist models pose to nativist views of language is the connectionist
model for the formation of past tense developed by David Rumelhart
and James McClelland. What is significant about this model in the current context is that it does not have a preexisting linguistic rule that
distinguishes regular from irregular cases, but eventually develops this
distinction from repeated applications of an algorithm. The model was
taken by its proponents to exemplify the idea that a sensitivity to linguistic structure could be developed through repeated interactions with an
environment, rather than having to be “built in” to the language learner,
as nativists had claimed. As Pinker notes, the “model irrevocably changed
the study of human language. ... it is no longer possible to treat the mere
existence of linguistic productivity as evidence for rules in the head.”
While nobody views this model as depicting how we learn the past tense
in natural language, the model has spawned over twenty descendants
that have led proponents of “rules and representations” views of language acquisition to attenuate their views. These have also motivated the
development of hybrid models that integrate the insights of such views
with their connectionist competitors.11
4 the two-dimensional approach
The basic idea of the two-dimensional approach to the debate between
nativists and empiricists, recall, is that two simple, independent theses determine a two-by-two space in this debate. The two-dimensional approach
does three things. First, it helps to identify strong forms of both nativist
and empiricist views. Second, it points to views that are less extreme and,
in some sense, intermediate between the strong versions of nativism and
empiricism. Third, it provides a common framework for understanding
debates over nativism elsewhere in the fragile sciences.

The first thesis, the internal richness thesis, concerns the nature of an
individual’s internal structure, while the second, the external minimalism
thesis, concerns the causal role of an individual’s external environment in
the acquisition and development of a given cognitive process, structure,
or phenomenon. Where X stands in for the relevant cognitive process,
structure, or phenomenon, these two theses can be stated as follows:
Internal Richness Thesis: Structures and processes internal to the individual that
are important to the acquisition and development of X are rich.

External Minimalism Thesis: Structures and processes external to an individual
play at best a secondary causal role in the acquisition and development of X.

Richness here is a technical term, but it is intended to draw on the ordinary
sense that the word has. Internal structures are rich, recall, just if they
are antecedently specialized, localized, internally complex, and causally
powerful. Proponents of the “modularity of mind” are paradigms of those
who accept the internal richness thesis about cognition, while those who
hold that cognitive processes are “domain general” or close to nonexistent (for example, behaviorists) are paradigms of those who reject that
thesis. Likewise, those who conceptualize the environment as a “trigger”
for cognition accept the external minimalism thesis, while those who
view learning as the central mechanism for the acquisition of cognitive
structure reject that thesis.

As these examples might suggest, strong nativist positions – exempli-
fied by Chomsky and Fodor – accept both the internal richness and the
external minimalism thesis. Although Chomsky and Fodor are strong
nativists with respect to a range of mental processes and structures,
Chomsky’s view of generative grammar and Fodor’s views of concepts
exemplify their commitment to strong nativism as I have characterized
it. Strong empiricist positions – exemplified by behaviorists and at least
early connectionists – reject both the internal richness and the external minimalism thesis. For both behaviorists and early connectionists,
an organism’s cognitive structures are acquired through the process of
learning. This process is not internally rich in the sense specified above,
and ascribes a primary role to the structure of the environment in the
process of acquisition. That both of these theses capture standard nativist
and empiricist positions is reflected in Steve Laurence and Eric Margolis’s
recent characterization of these views:
Though there is clearly a continuum of positions, empiricist models are on the
side that attributes few innate ideas, principles, and mechanisms, and generally
considers the innate material of the mind to be domain-neutral and relatively
simple; empiricist models also tend to give special weight to the role of sensory
systems, in the most extreme cases maintaining that all concepts are constructed
from sensory constituents. By contrast, nativist models are on the side that views
the mind as highly differentiated, composed of far more innate elements, including domain-specific systems of knowledge or principles of inference, and innate
concepts of arbitrary levels of abstraction.12
Although these two theses are independent, strong nativists view them
as mutually reinforcing. Here’s why. Suppose that we accept the internal
richness thesis. If our cognitive architecture is internally rich, there is a
complexity to what we bring to any cognitive task that leaves less role for
an appeal to the complexity of the environments in which we operate.

58 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
In the extreme case, environments are just triggers for the operation
of innately complex structures. Conversely, suppose that we accept the
external minimalism thesis. Since external structures play a minimal role
in the acquisition and development of cognition, any complexity that
cognition generates must be due to something else, and what lies within
the cognizer is a strong candidate for that something else.

To the extent that the two-dimensional analysis accurately classifies
paradigmatic nativist and empiricist positions, it passes one relatively undemanding test for the adequacy of an analysis of the debate. Yet the
two-dimensional view is well suited to capture more of this logical geography, including positions less extreme than either of the paradigmatic
nativist and empiricist views, and I consider this one of its chief virtues.

There are various ways to reject paradigmatic nativist and empiricist views
of cognition, and the two-dimensional view is not only “empirically adequate” but informative about this aspect to the logical geography of the
debate over nativism and cognition.

Consider the option of accepting the external minimalism thesis but
rejecting the internal richness thesis about cognition. Classic ethologists
and proponents of general intelligence as a built-in, global cognitive ability are both advocates of such a position. In fact, we might locate much of
cognitive psychology here, insofar as it gives little role to the environment
in structuring cognition yet is cast largely in terms of domain-general capacities, such as memory and reasoning, emotions and imagination.

The converse alternative – of holding the internal richness thesis while
rejecting the external minimalism thesis about cognition – has also been
endorsed. For example, there are modularity theorists, such as Annette
Karmiloff-Smith, who view modules as being assembled through environmental interaction, rather than endogenously prespecified or governed.

For forms of cognitive activity in which there can be specialized, acquired
expertise, such as chess playing or mathematical problem solving, such
a view is particularly plausible. Proponents of socially distributed cognition, such as Edwin Hutchins, seem also to endorse this sort of view. On
Hutchins’ view of cognition, the structure of the social environment of
the individual plays a primary role in generating the structure of both
individual and group cognition. Yet individuals themselves are, in effect,
internally rich devices for the performance of cognitive functions.13
Figure 3.1 provides a summary of how the two-dimensional view applies
to this range of positions.

The two-dimensional view also sheds some light on how each of two
neurally inspired views depart from strong nativist views of cognitive
External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
Strong Nativism Socially Distributed/
Acquired Cognition
Y
E Internal
S
Richness
General Cognitive
Psychology N Thesis Strong Antinativism
O
figure 3.1. Nativism and Cognition
development, and how they are related to one another. The “constructive
learning” view of neural and cognitive development that computational
neuroscientists Steve Quartz and Terry Sejnowski articulate exemplifies a
strong rejection of nativism. It ascribes a central role to the structure of the
environment in the construction of representations (and so rejects the external minimalism thesis), while denying the need to posit antecedently
richly structured cognitive modules (and so rejects the internal richness
thesis). By contrast, neuronal selection theory, whereby neural development is explained as a selective process responsive to endogenous events,
shares the internal richness thesis with strong nativist views, but appeals
to underlying neural features, rather than cognitive modules, to explain
the structure of cognition. This affinity between neural selection theory
and strong nativist views, as well as their shared rejection of the external
minimalism thesis, underpins, I believe, Quartz and Sejnowski’s rejection
of both.14
Another criterion for evaluating the two-dimensional view is to see how
adequately it captures more specific debates over nativism amongst cognitive scientists. For example, we might turn to debates over the acquisition
of concepts in general, of word meanings or other aspects of language,
such as syntax, or those over specific postulated cognitive domains, such
as the theory of mind.15
Consider first the last of these examples, that of the theory of mind
within developmental psychology. The two-dimensional account classes
the views of Alan Leslie and Simon Baron-Cohen, who hold that children’s
60 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
psychological attributions and understanding of the mind are governed
by a domain-specific module that develops maturationally, as strong nativist positions. Strong antinativist positions, by contrast, are exemplified
by Peter Hobson and Michael Tomasello. They view these abilities as deriving not from dedicated modules but from more general symbolizing
capacities acquired through social experience.16
But again there are those who have maintained views less extreme
vis-`a-vis nativism. For example, “theory theorists,” such as Alison Gopnik
and Joseph Perner, take children to develop a theory of mind through the
same mechanisms of theory construction that children apply elsewhere
in acquiring knowledge of the world (and so reject internal richness).

Yet Gopnik and Perner ascribe only a limited role to the environment in
the generate-and-test process that governs their conceptual change, and
so share the external minimalism thesis with strong nativists. By contrast,
theorists such as Jay Garfield and Candida Peterson maintain a view that
appropriates the mediational views of Vygotsky – and so reject the external
minimalism thesis – but recognize a modular component to children’s
acquisition of knowledge of the mind, even though they do not think that
there is a domain for the theory of mind per se, and so accept a form of
the internal richness thesis.17
Figure 3.2 summarizes the two-dimensional view of the nativist aspect
to the theory of mind debate. As one might expect, there are further
aspects to the debate over the theory of mind that the two-dimensional
view itself does not capture: For example, that between theory theorists
and simulationists, that over the relationship between language and the
theory of mind, and that concerning the significance of false belief task
performance. This should remind us that although nativism is one issue
in play in work on the theory of mind, it is not the only one.

5 making do with less?
Traditional philosophical analyses, cast in terms of the conditions putatively necessary and sufficient for the concept of innateness, have typically
tried to understand nativism in one dimension, even if that dimension
has some internal complexity to it. Several recent accounts of nativism
attempt to make do with just one dimension, and I want to concentrate
in this section on problems that such views face. The two views on which I
shall concentrate, those of Muhammad Ali Khalidi and Richard Samuels,
have been developed as alternatives to existing one-dimensional views,
such as those that view innate structures as those present at birth, or
External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
Modularists
Leslie
Baron-Cohen
Y
Garfield, Peterson, and Perry
2001
E
S Internal
Richness
Gopnik
Perner
Enculturists
Tomasello 1999
Carpendale and Lewis
(in press)
Thesis
N
O
figure 3.2. Nativism and the Theory of Mind
those that develop in the normal course of an organism’s life. In what
follows, I shall take for granted the criticisms that Khalidi and Samuels
make of such views.18
Khalidi has defended the adequacy of a triggering view of innateness
over what he calls the disease model and plasticity accounts of nativist
views and argued that domain-specificity stands in an evidential rather
than a constitutive relationship to nativism. In essence, Khalidi’s account
makes do with just one of the two dimensions that I have posited to
the debate over nativism, that encapsulated by the external minimalism
thesis. Khalidi begins by registering the variety of cognitive scientists –
including Hirschfeld, Gelman, Landau, Cosmides, Tooby, Keil, Gopnik,
and Meltzoff – whom he considers as viewing innateness and domainspecificity as constitutively linked. He then states his view that an “innate
mental state or cognitive capacity is one that would be triggered by the environment,” a view articulated earlier by the philosopher Stephen Stich.

The remainder of Khalidi’s paper criticizes views that attempt to show
62 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
that there is some constitutive link between this notion of innateness and
domain-specificity.19
There are two methodological problems with this view and how it is
defended. The first is that it is rather philosophically high-handed in
implying that many of those at the center of contemporary debates over
nativism are conceptually confused about what nativism is. No doubt,
there is some confusion. But defending a view of nativism that implies
that a wide variety of researchers working on nativism are infected with
this particular confusion is like insisting that lawyers are conceptually
confused when they treat spoken agreements as contracts on the grounds
that one has analyzed the concept of a contract in terms of signed, written
agreements. The implication itself should be grounds for rethinking the
grounds of the analysis.

The second problem is that the arguments that Khalidi provides can at
best show that internal richness is neither identical to, nor reducible to,
nor entailed by something like the external minimalism thesis. This point
should be granted by a proponent of the two-dimensional view. Indeed,
one might take this, in conjunction with how researchers themselves talk
about nativism, as a reason for insisting that we need at least two independent dimensions to understand the debate over nativism. Moreover,
since the arguments against incorporating something like the internal
richness thesis into the account of nativism are all arguments that presuppose the priority of a one-dimensional triggering criterion, they beg
the question against a proponent of the two-dimensional view.

Richard Samuels provides another one-dimensional analysis of innate
cognitive structures, the primitivist account, that proceeds in two steps. According to Samuels, “a psychological structure is innate just in case it is a
psychological primitive,” and (step two) psychological primitives are structures posited by some correct scientific psychological theory, structures
whose acquisition is not in turn explained by any such theory. (Putative
counterexamples to the sufficiency of the account lead Samuels to modify it by making an additional appeal to the acquisition of the structure
“in the normal course of events”; I ignore this here since nothing I say
turns on this modification.)20
There are three related problems with this view: it (a) places a burden on the notion of a complete psychological theory heavier than that
notion can bear; (b) presupposes a tidy alignment between psychological structures and the mechanisms that mediate their acquisition, and
(c) entails that psychologically complex structures cannot be innate.

What these problems imply is that the primitivist account is uninformative
[(a)] or mistaken [(b) and (c)] about what psychological structures are
innate. I spell out each problem in turn.

Consider (a). Whether a structure is innate, on Samuels’s official view,
turns on there not being any correct psychological theory that explains
its acquisition. Given that even by the most optimistic of lights there
remain significant and fundamental disagreements about the acquisition
of almost every postulated cognitive structure, one might wonder just
what structures a correct psychological theory will postulate as acquired.

Even the current best candidates for innate psychological structures, such
as those governing intuitive mechanics and intuitive mathematics, have
previously been viewed within developmental psychology as having been
acquired. Without a more complete psychological theory it is difficult to
see what their status will be when psychologists call it a day.21
Suppose that the sorts of inferences that we can make from the current
state of psychological theorizing to a complete and correct psychological theory are limited, as I am implying. Then the primitivist account is
about as useful as an analysis that claims that innate cognitive structures
are those that God planted in our minds. Either (even both) of these
analyses might be true, but it seems desirable for a correct analysis to
be more informative than is either. To draw a contrast, it may be that
the fundamental physical entities in the universe are those posited in a
correct physical theory. But this constitutes a part of an insightful characterization of (say) physicalism only given that current physical theory
provides us with some solid epistemic guidance as to what a correct physical theory looks like, and what it postulates as fundamental. I suggest that
this is precisely what we lack at the moment in the cognitive sciences.

Let us put the official talk of “correct psychological theories” to one
side and turn to the heart of the primitivist view, which holds that “innate
cognitive structures are ones that are not acquired by any psychological
process or mechanism.”22 Since there is an obvious sense in which all
of an organism’s structures are acquired – all organisms develop (say,
from a fertilized egg) from not having to having them – this account
implies that innate structures are those acquired by nonpsychological
mechanisms. This brings me to (b): that the account presupposes a
neat alignment between the nativist status of psychological structures
and the kinds of mechanisms that mediate their acquisition. Those acquired by nonpsychological mechanisms are innate, while those acquired
by psychological mechanisms are not innate. This appears to make good
sense of cases where the mechanisms responsible for some psychological
structure are paradigmatically psychological (for example, learning) or
64 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
paradigmatically nonpsychological (for example, genetic). But I think the
appearances are misleading, and very few, if any, structures are acquired
exclusively either by psychological or by nonpsychological mechanisms.

Consider first the sorts of case where the primitivist account might
seem adequate. For example, the psychological structures needed to read
or to consciously solve algebra problems are not innate because they
are acquired via the psychological mechanisms or processes of teaching,
learning, study, and instruction. And the psychological structures needed
for identifying something as a physical object are innate because they are
acquired simply by “triggering,” that is, by brute-causal exposure. Reflection on both of these cases, however, brings out why (b) is a problem.

Reading and consciously solving algebra problems are abilities acquired through psychological processes, no doubt. But their acquisition
usually also involves mechanisms that are “social,” such as instruction,
and others that are “biological,” such as those for neural storage. Indeed, any psychological ability that is acquired once a child already has
acquired a lot of psychological structures and mechanisms, however they
are acquired, is likely itself to be acquired through the agency of both
psychological and nonpsychological mechanisms. One reason for the
importance of psychological mechanisms is the way in which they are integrated with both “higher” and “lower” level mechanisms, and thus the
correspondence proposed by Samuels between “noninnate” and “psychological” acquisition processes is problematic.

There is much the same problem for the proposed link between “innate” and “nonpsychological” mechanisms of acquisition. Brute-causal
exposure to physical objects and how they behave mechanically may
be sufficient to activate the intuitive physics of normal newborn or very
young infants. But there are surely psychological mechanisms that such
infants are equipped with that play a role in how their intuitive physics operates. For example, they have mechanisms that govern how they behave,
such as how long they look at a stimulus, or other mechanisms that govern
preferential looking or other forms of early behavior. That such behavior is subject to psychological generalizations, such as “Find unexpected
stimuli interesting” and “Look longer at objects that are interesting,” is
presupposed in the very experimental paradigms for the investigation of
the proposed innate structures.

The basic problem that the entwinement of psychological and nonpsychological mechanisms poses for the primitivist account is as follows.

If innate psychological structures are those acquired without any psychological mechanisms or only by nonpsychological mechanisms, then
no or almost no psychological structures are innate. Importantly, the
psychological structures that are our current best bet for being innate
turn out not to be innate, on such a view. And that suggests that the
primitivist account is mistaken.

Finally, consider (c). By a “psychologically complex” structure I mean
a structure that has parts whose coordination and integration physically
constitute that structure, and which themselves are psychological. For
such a structure, there may be a correct psychological theory for how
that structure is acquired that is given in terms of how those parts develop
and are integrated. But for all that, the structure itself might be innate.

Indeed, those who view such structures as innate often take the prime
psychological task to be to functionally decompose the structure and understand the developmental trajectory of those parts. For example, Leslie
and Baron-Cohen posit an innate theory of mind module (ToMM), and
propose a particular compositional structure that is psychological and
whose development is explained in psychological and neuropsychological terms. This is true more generally of domain-specific theories (for
example, of physical objects, of biology), which are complex in something
like the sense above but whose innateness is not thereby ruled out. One
could insist that the psychologists who talk in this way are mistaken. But
such insistence would seem high-handed in much the way that I claimed
was Khalidi’s account.

6 satisfying some desiderata
Samuels also posits five constraints on the adequacy of any account of
innateness. These can be summarized group-wise as follows:
(i) X is innate → (X is not learned) and /→(the environment plays
no role in the acquisition of X)
(ii) the account must make sense of the chief arguments for/against
nativism, of why nativism matters to cognitive science, and of the
logical geography to the debate.

Samuels calls (i) “conceptual constraints” and views them as more foundational than (ii). All five desiderata that Samuels offers are plausible
constraints, and despite its other problems, the primitivist account prima
facie does a reasonable job of satisfying all of them.

But the two-dimensional view does a better job here. Since the external
minimalism thesis is one dimension in the view, that view readily meets
both of Samuels’ “conceptual constraints.” I have already directed much
66 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
of my discussion at showing how the two-dimensional view fares regarding
the “logical geography” of the debate over nativism. The only point I shall
underscore here is that, in contrast to both one-dimensional views we have
considered in the previous section (as well as others we have not), the
two-dimensional view makes it natural to see why “being innate” is not
an all-or-nothing matter, and how we might distinguish between stronger
and more moderate positions in the debate over nativism.

The two remaining constraints that Samuels posits are that the account make sense of the arguments for nativism and that it show why the
debate over nativism is of significance within cognitive science. Samuels
himself considers two chief arguments for the innateness of cognitive
structures – those which appeal to the poverty of the stimulus and to
early development – and to those we might add arguments that cite the
universal manifestation of a psychological structure, or that invoke neurally specific deficits. Endorsement of the external minimalism thesis
itself would make each of these arguments plausible ones to offer, but it
is worth noting that the internal richness thesis also provides grounding
for at least these arguments. For if that thesis is true and cognition is
governed by internally rich units, then we might expect normal environments to be sufficient for the abilities that those units imbue an organism
with, and so develop early and universally, and for those abilities to be
subject to impairment through specific neural damage. As importantly,
the two-dimensional view also helps to explain why rejecting one of these
arguments – say, the poverty of the stimulus argument – or viewing it as
having limited significance, need not involve a wholesale abandonment
of nativism or the arguments for it.

Finally on the desiderata front, the two-dimensional view suggests that
part of the significance of the debate over nativism lies in arguments over
two distinct issues: the causal role of the environment in the acquisition of
cognitive structures and abilities and the nature of the internal resources
that individuals antecedently bring to bear on cognitive tasks. Positions
on each of these issues carry with them methodological implications for
how to study cognition and particular cognitive abilities. One’s view of
the external minimalism thesis affects (or reflects) whether one thinks
that cognitive scientists should invest their time in studying the structure
of an organism’s environment. And one’s view of the internal richness
thesis does the same with respect to the sort of internal structures posited
or sought inside the cognizer. The two-dimensional view also makes it
clear that a position on one of these issues leaves room for disagreement
about the other.

7 but could two dimensions be enough?
Suppose that we need two dimensions to understand the debate over nativism and that these are the two that I have suggested. Might we need
more? For example, one might think, particularly if one views evolutionary psychology as a strong nativist position, that one should also view the
claim that rich mental structures are evolved or encoded in the genome
as part of the commitment of a strong nativist view. The developmental
psychologist Frank Keil has suggested that it is an important part of nativist views of the mind that what is “built in” to an organism is not simply
perceptual abilities but something intuitively further “upstream” from
perception, something “more central,” something genuinely cognitive.

The philosopher Fiona Cowie has also identified five theses as constituting the “Chomskyan nativist” view of language acquisition. On Cowie’s
view, a firm commitment to one of these, the thesis that the constraints
and principles that define the domain of language and its subdomains be
identified with universal grammar is what distinguishes the Chomskyan
view from all nonnativist alternatives. Perhaps we should view this dimension as essential to characterizing nativism more generally. Since we
double the grain of our analysis for each additional dimension we add,
why not enrich our view of the nativism debate further? Why think two is
enough, especially if one leads to impoverishment? But I think we should
be cautious here. More is not always better. Consider briefly the proposals
of Keil and Cowie in turn.23
Keil’s suggestion is motivated by the recognition that all parties to the
debate over nativism acknowledge that some psychological structures are
innate and that what distinguishes nativists from empiricists, apart from
their views of what I am calling internal richness, is how far upstream this
structure is to be found. I think that there is some truth in this and that
this dimension of “centrality” is important in understanding why nativist
views come in degrees. In some specific debates over nativism, such as that
over concepts, this dimension of centrality may be significant enough to
be added as a distinct dimension. So it may be that it is useful to add this
as a third dimension to the account I have proposed, at least for some
purposes.

Yet this dimension doesn’t help much in understanding other particular nativist debates, such as that over the theory of mind, which occur,
so to speak, at one place in the stream, and whose alternatives to strong
nativism include positions that identify intuitively more central abilities,
such as metarepresentation (Perner) or theory construction (Gopnik), as
68 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
underlying the theory of mind. Moreover, I am inclined to think that this
dimension is subsumable under or derivable from the internal richness
thesis insofar as stronger nativist views tend to view the thesis as having a
greater range of applicability to cognition than do weaker nativist views.

Although it is conceptual open space to hold the internal richness thesis
about just “upstream” structures, and not those together with sensoryperceptual structures, as a matter of fact no one holds such a view. Thus,
all views that apply the thesis more widely also apply them to central
cognitive processes.

My view of Cowie’s proposal is similar. Recognizing the distinctness of
a “universal grammar” dimension to the nativism debate over language
may be useful – for example, in distinguishing Chomskyan nativism from
lexical functional grammar. Yet it is unclear how such a distinct dimension helps elucidate such debates in all areas of language, such as that
over the acquisition of the semantics of words, or more importantly, beyond language and in other cognitive domains where the combinatorial,
generative role that universal grammar plays in language is less significant. For example, in cognitive development, there is a focus on the
principles that govern infants’ recognitional and behavioral interactions
with physical objects – naive physics – and on those that govern their interactions with persons – naive psychology and naive sociology. Yet such
principles constitute a grammar or a syntax in only a metaphorical or
extended sense. The problem of how to apply this dimension to other
nativist and empiricist views is exacerbated once we turn from cognitive
to noncognitive domains.

In summary, while further dimensions may shed light on nativism in
specific contexts, they do not appear to have the generality that make
them useful in understanding nativist views more generally. We can see
this more clearly by turning from the cognitive to the biological domain.

8 nativism about cognition and biology
The renewed attention that the concept of innateness has received of late
within the cognitive sciences, typified by the authors I have thus far discussed or mentioned, is marked by a near-exclusive preoccupation with
what it means for a cognitive or linguistic structure or process to be innate, and arguments for thinking that many such structures and processes
are innate. This focus neglects the other primary domain in which the
concept of innateness has been deployed, that of the biological sciences.

As I suggested in Chapter 1, an additional virtue of the two-dimensional
account is that it sheds some light on nativism debates within this domain,
and so reveals an affinity between the largely disjoint cognitive and biological literatures. Here I shall focus on the two areas of biology to which
nativism – under the heading of innateness – has been perhaps most central. I shall expand on my compressed remarks about inheritance and
development from Chapter 1 and will also briefly consider innateness in
behavioral ecology. Rather than talk of strong antinativist views here as
empiricist, which would sound idiosyncratic, I shall refer to such views as
strong externalism about organismic development.24
There has been some skepticism about whether the notion of innateness any longer plays a useful role within either of these areas of biological science. For example, the biologist Patrick Bateson has distinguished
seven different things that “innate” means when applied to behavioral
phenotypes in the study of animal behavior, and suggested that only confusion arises from continuing to use “innate” to mark all of these correspondingly distinct contrasts. The philosopher of biology Paul Griffiths
has said that in “molecular developmental biology innateness seems as
antiquated a theoretical construct as instinct and equally peripheral to
any account of gene regulation or morphogenesis,” and has claimed that
since there is no univocal sense in which biologists speak of a trait as
being innate, we should retire talk of innateness.25
These views of Bateson and Griffiths do, I think, provide reason to
be skeptical about traditional one-dimensional analyses of innateness in
biology, including recent analyses in terms of canalization and generative entrenchment. But I also think that the two-dimensional approach
shows why Bateson and Griffiths are perhaps overly pessimistic about the
prospects for making sense of innateness in the biological sciences.26
While both the internal richness thesis and the external minimalism
thesis are formulated with respect to cognitive phenomena, processes,
and abilities, it is a trivial matter to apply them both to biological structures and processes. In Chapter 1, I pointed out that within genetics and
developmental biology questions of the innateness of any given trait are
often cast in terms of the role and conception of genes in organismic development. The dominant view here accepts genes as being at the core of
the rich, internal structure that guides organismic development, with the
environment subsequently playing some kind of secondary causal role.

Both classical and molecular genetics, both cast since the 1940s largely in
terms of the complex metaphor of a genetic program – blueprints, codes,
instructions, reading frames, executive controls – adopt this view of organismic development in general, and as such represent strongly nativist
70 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
views of this process. Genes code for phenotypes – the traits are “in the
genes” – and organismic development is the unfolding of this preformed
structure in the genetic code. But as a global view of development, such a
view has been challenged in whole and in part, and the two-dimensional
view of nativism captures much of the character of such challenges.27
While no one denies the existence of intracellular units, genes, both
their role in organismic development and the relationship between
“genetic” and “environmental” causes of development have been contested. For example, as I said in Chapter 1, Richard Lewontin has rejected the idea that genes are the primary agents of development, as well
as the claim that genetic and environmental “factors” can be partitioned
in ways so as to meaningfully inform us about the causes of particular
developmental changes. In effect he rejects both the internal richness
and the external minimalism theses, and his views represent a strong externalist position within genetics and developmental biology. Thus, the
two-dimensional view captures both strong nativist and strong externalist
positions in genetics and development. But it is important to see that, as
is the case with cognition, the two-dimensional analysis also provides for
the representation of less extreme views of genetics and development.

For example, some developmental biologists, such as Brian Goodwin,
share Lewontin’s skepticism about the roles ascribed to genes as agents
of development, and have argued for the primacy of other internal factors, such as morphogenetic fields, as such agents. In seeing development as endogenously driven, however, Goodwin accepts the external
minimalism thesis. What he rejects is the particulate view of the engines
of development entailed by the internal richness thesis. Rather than a
gene-centered developmental biology, Goodwin advocates a revival of
what he calls a rational morphology, with a primary role for developmental
constraints and morphogenetic fields in explaining development. This is
one way to depart from both strong nativist and strong externalist views
of organismic development.28
Proponents of developmental systems theory, by contrast, maintain that
the agents of development are developmental systems. Developmental systems are series of processes that use a range of developmental resources,
including genes, chromatin markers, and organelles within the organism. Those developmental systems theorists, such as Eva Jablonka and
Marion Lamb, who emphasize cellular, epigenetic inheritance systems
have some affinity with Goodwin’s rational morphology insofar as they
identify nongenetic, internal causes of development. But others, such as
Susan Oyama and Russell Gray, take there to be an important symmetry
External Minimalism Thesis
YES NO
Classical and
Molecular Genetics
Developmental Systems
Theory
Y
E Internal
S Richness
Thesis
Rational Morphology Radical Interactionism N
O
figure 3.3. Nativism, Genetics, and Development
between developmental resources that lie within and beyond the boundary of the organism, and so view developmental systems as often extending
beyond that boundary. Such views reject the external minimalism thesis,
and often share much with Lewontin’s criticisms of gene-centered views
that predominate within molecular genetics. Figure 3.3 shows how the
two-dimensional analysis applies to this range of positions about nativism
and development.29
I have so far been suggesting that the two-dimensional view of nativism sheds some light on the “logical geography” of recent views within
genetics and developmental biology. The basic idea of this view – to
treat internal structural richness and external causal role as independent dimensions – is particularly apt for genetics and development within
the biological domain. This is because much of the debate over innateness within biology has turned on questioning traditional dichotomies –
innate versus acquired, genetic versus environmental – that deny their
independence.

These two dimensions also subsume many of the characterizations
that have been given of innate traits in behavioral ecology. For example,
consider the seven senses that Patrick Bateson detects in uses of “innate”
in describing animal behaviors. Innate behaviors have been claimed to be
those that are (a) present at birth, (b) not learned, (c) adapted over the
72 Disciplining the Individual and the Mind
course of evolution, (d) unchanging through development, (e) shared
by all members of the species, (f) part of a distinctly organized system of
behavior driven from within, (g) caused by a genetic difference when two
organisms differ with respect to them. Bateson points out that there are
many cases in which these criteria come apart and argues that this limits
the usefulness of the concept of innateness within behavioral ecology.

If we view these, however, not as criteria for innateness but as seven
evidential bases for ascriptions of innateness in a given case, then I think
the two-dimensional approach is well placed to explain their appeal. Of
these, (a) and (b) are readily explained as a result of the external minimalism thesis, and (f) and (g) by acceptance of the internal richness
thesis. The remaining three, (c), (d), and (e), could be explained by
either or both theses. Likewise, the idea of innate traits as those that are
developmentally fixed and so relatively insensitive to environmental variation (canalized), or those that are “generatively entrenched,” can be
understood in terms of the external minimalism thesis. In short, the twodimensional approach to nativism within biology makes sense not only
of the major positions that have been held within genetics and developmental biology, but also explains the sorts of characterization of, and
evidence for, claims of innateness in particular cases within behavioral
ecology.

9 conceptual analysis and nativism
Identifiable nativist views have been with us for a long time, and they are
likely right about at least some of our cognitive structures and abilities,
just as they are right about some of our bodily phenotypes and behaviors.

The two-dimensional approach to the debate over nativism developed
in this chapter allows us to pinpoint what nativists are claiming about
cognition, and how one might go part of the way toward accepting the
strongest nativist views and so accommodate their insights without simply
assimilating cognitive development to bodily growth.

I also argued in the previous chapter, however, that the “short history,
long past” view of the debate over nativism should not blind us to the
significant differences between what has been central to that debate during distinct historical periods. In particular, there are several important
discontinuities between traditional rationalism and empiricism and contemporary nativist and nonnativist views. The two-dimensional approach
aims to capture something important about the contemporary debate,
and I think we do less justice to that goal by either insisting on or implicitly
assuming a continuity thesis that is insensitive to the distinctive preoccupations of seventeenth- and eighteenth-century thinkers.

It has been part of my plaint over an extended period of time that
philosophers (as well as zealous cognitive psychologists, linguists, and
computer scientists) should learn to say “some.” In philosophy we too
often yearn for something close to a standard conceptual analysis of a
concept or term in attempting to understand what is a corresponding
complicated and messy reality. If we view one-dimensional accounts of
nativism about the mind as suffering from the inability to “say ‘some,’”
and from focusing largely or exclusively on nativism about the mind,
then it is a fair question to ask how well the two-dimensional analysis
itself scores on both of these fronts.

The two-dimensional view is an analysis of sorts, but one aimed primarily at understanding the debate over nativism, rather than our “ordinary”
concept of innateness (if there be such), and that is primarily descriptive
rather than normative or revisionary. Although I have responded briefly
to a few “higher dimensional” accounts of the debate, and attempted to
show how further or other dimensions that have been proposed are, in
some sense, derivative from the two-dimensional approach, it seems to
me less significant whether one is right here than it is to be right about
the need to move beyond one-dimensional accounts. This is in part because nativist views are enmeshed with a variety of other views about
cognition – about its evolution, about its relationship to culture, about its
demarcation from both the noncognitive and the nonpsychological. And
where one’s nativism ends and such other views begin seems difficult to
pronounce on, and unwise to build on.

One final point. One implication of the two-dimensional view is that
strong nativist views will likely be defensible for a more limited range of
traits than have often been thought of as innate. But this is neither because
there are more traits for which strong antinativism or externalism hold,
nor because “innate” is a term that has outlived its usefulness. Rather,
the two-dimensional view requires that we consider both internal and
external dimensions to the acquisition and development of any given
trait. Often enough, we will have to be satisfied with a view of acquisition
and development that departs from strong forms of both nativism and
empiricism.

74
part two
INDIVIDUALISM AND EXTERNALISM
IN THE PHILOSOPHY OF MIND AND
THE COGNITIVE SCIENCES
75
76
4
Individualism
Philosophical Foundations
1 making sense of the individualism-externalism
debate
Individualism about the mind was introduced as a form of methodological
solipsism in considering the nature of an individual’s mental life and how
we ought to theorize systematically about it. I drew on this conception
of individualism in discussing the disciplining of psychology as a field
of inquiry and nativism about the mind. In Chapter 1, I also provided a
more precise characterization of individualism in psychology in terms of
the notion of supervenience.

It is sometimes unclear to those outside of the philosophy of mind just
how either the methodological solipsism or the supervenience formulation of individualism could give rise to a substantive debate about the
mind and its study. Consider construals of each of these formulations that
make either individualism or externalism seem trivially true.

Methodological solipsism in psychology is the view that psychological states should be construed without reference to anything beyond the
boundary of the individual who has those states. It is in light of this view
that the debate between individualists and externalists has sometimes
been glossed in terms of whether psychological or mental states are
“in the head.” But to the initiated and uninitiated alike, that is likely
to sound like a puzzling issue to debate: Of course mental states are in
the head! (“Where else could they be?,” as Robert Stalnaker once asked.)
So this construal of individualism makes externalism a nonstarter, and so
individualism seem trivially true.

77
78 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
The supervenience formulation of individualism says that mental states
supervene on the intrinsic, physical properties of the individual who bears
them. The most important feature of the central relation of supervenience, at least for our purposes, is that it is determinative: According to
the individualist, an individual’s mental states are determined by her intrinsic, physical states. But then it seems that it is individualism that is
a nonstarter, for surely, one might think, there are many environmental
factors that determine what mental states an individual ends up having.

What visual perceptions you have are determined by what’s in front of
you, and what sorts of things you think about is determined, in part, by
what concepts you have been taught – by parents, siblings, peers, and
teachers. So construed, externalism seems trivially true.

Both of these construals of the issue that separates individualists from
externalists about the mind are, of course, caricatures. But I hope they will
be useful caricatures, in several ways. First, the ease with which they can be
derived from each characterization of individualism poses a challenge: to
articulate a version of the issue separating individualists and externalists
that makes more perspicuous why individualism is a substantive and thus
potentially controversial claim about the nature of the mind and how we
should study it. Second, I think that each caricatured objection contains
more than a grain of truth about, respectively, externalism and individualism. And so part of our task in responding to the above challenge in
the next section will be to sift the true from the false in each of these
caricatures.

In section 3, I review the original arguments for externalism provided
by Hilary Putnam and Tyler Burge. Both of these arguments appeal to
claims about intentionality or content, but the issues they raise concern
psychological states in general. Burge concluded his original critique by
saying that the “sense in which man is a social animal runs deeper than
much mainstream philosophy of mind has acknowledged.” In section 4,
I show just how externalism suggests that the social aspects to having a
mind run deeper than a range of influential philosophical views have
allowed.1
If individualism is as entrenched a view in the history of philosophy and
in contemporary analytic philosophy as sections 2–4 imply, then it should
be no surprise that the conclusions from the Putnam-Burge arguments
have been resisted. The remainder of the chapter aims to give the flavor of
this resistance. In section 5, I discuss perhaps the most prevalent response,
one that draws on a distinction between narrow and wide content. The
idea that there is some notion of content immune to the Putnam-Burge
arguments is popular even if problematic. Section 6 explores the prima
facie relationship between individualism, functionalism, and physicalism,
and section 7 reviews and critiques an influential argument for individualism that purports to show that individualism in psychology is mandated
by reflection on the nature of scientific taxonomy more generally.

The chapter as a whole aims to be a self-contained philosophical
primer on individualism about the mind. At its end, we will be in a better
position to lay the foundations for an alternative, externalist conception
of the mind.

2 individualism, taxonomy, and metaphysical
determination
Externalists don’t claim that mental states are somewhere other than in
the head, and individualists don’t think that what is outside the head has
nothing to do with what ends up in the head. The key to understanding
the debate between individualists and externalists about the mind lies in
grasping the notion of determination at its heart.

Individualists and externalists agree that an individual’s environment is
a causal determinant of that individual’s thoughts and thus mind. Agents
causally interact with their world, gathering information about it through
their senses, and through their communicative interactions with others.

Thus, the nature of their minds, in particular what their thoughts are
about, is in part causally determined by the character of their world.

That is, the world is a contributing or efficient cause to the content of
one’s mind, to what one perceives, desires, and thinks about. This is just
to say that the content of one’s mind is not causally isolated from one’s
environment. Separating individualists and externalists is the question of
whether there is some deeper sense in which the nature of the mind is
determined by the character of the individual’s world. It is this “deeper
sense” of world-mind determination that we need to articulate further.

We can approach this issue by extending the brief discussion of the
idea that the content of the mind is in part causally determined by the
agent’s environment to explore the conditions under which a difference
in the world implies a difference in the mind. Individualists hold that this
is so just in case that difference in the world makes some corresponding
change to what occurs inside the boundary of the individual. Externalists
deny this, thus allowing for the possibility that individuals who are identical with respect to all of their intrinsic features could nonetheless have
psychological or mental states with different contents. And, assuming
80 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
that mental states with different contents are ipso facto different types
or kinds of states, this implies that an individual’s intrinsic properties do
not determine or fix that individual’s mental states.

Thus, to state individualism adequately, we need to draw a distinction
between causal and metaphysical determination. Individualists claim, and
externalists deny, that what occurs inside the boundary of an individual
metaphysically determines the nature of that individual’s mental states.

The individualistic determination thesis, unlike the causal determination
thesis, expresses a view about the nature or essence of mental states, and
identifies a way in which, despite their causal determination by states of
the world, mental states are, according to individualists, autonomous or
independent of the character of the world beyond the individual.

I said in the previous section that the relation of supervenience was
determinative, and we can now see that the appropriate notion of determination is that of metaphysical, rather than causal, determination.

The determining properties – for individualists, the intrinsic, physical
properties of the individual – are called the subvenient or base properties.

Once subvenient or base properties are fixed or held constant across
two or more situations, the supervening properties – in this case, the
individual’s mental properties – are also fixed across those situations.

Many of an individual’s properties, particularly those that are of interest to scientists, supervene on that individual’s intrinsic, physical properties. To take a simplistic example, it is plausible to suppose that your
mass supervenes on the mass of all of the particles in your body. Given
this supposition, it doesn’t matter what else is true or false about you: If
the mass of all the particles in your body is 100 kg, then your mass is also
100 kg. Provided that the mass of all the particles in your body is 100 kg,
it doesn’t matter whether you are on Earth or on Mars, whether you are
stationary or in motion, or whether you are rapidly losing or gaining
particles, your mass is also 100 kg. There is no way to change your mass
from 100 kg that does not also change the mass of all of the particles in
your body. We might say that mass is compositionally or mereologically
determinative: The masses of any physical thing’s components or parts
metaphysically determine its mass.

If you are injected with a liquid that increases your mass by 1 kg, that
action also increases the mass of the particles in your body by a total of
1kg – say, either because of the mass of the particles in the liquid itself, or
because of the way in those particles interact chemically with the particles
already in your body, thus adjusting their number and mass. Alternatively,
if someone removes a part of your body – an arm, a kidney, a piece of
skin – and your mass is subsequently reduced, the mass of all of the particles in your body is reduced by precisely the same amount. At least this
is true provided that a person’s mass supervenes on just the mass of all
of the particles in her body, that is, that mass is mereologically determinative. (Note that the theory of special relativity provides no grounds for
denying this view, since although an object’s mass varies with its velocity,
so too does the mass of its physical parts.)
The idea that mental properties should be assimilated to properties
explored in the physical sciences, such as mass, has provided one powerful reason for thinking that psychology must or should be individualistic.

If the distinction between causal and metaphysical determination shows
what is mistaken about the caricature of individualism that makes externalism appear trivially true, then this assimilation between the mental
and the physical helps to explain the grain of truth in the caricaturized
picture of individualism with which we began. For what is right about
the caricature is that individualists do place an emphasis on the central
role that an individual’s intrinsic, physical properties play in the causal
economy of that individual. This has sometimes been summarized in the
slogan “No mental difference without an intrinsic physical difference.”
That many see such a slogan as derivative from the physicalist slogan
“No difference without a physical difference” points to one perceived
and 7.)
Let us return to the methodological solipsism formulation of individualism to see both why externalists are not committed to denying that
mental states are “in the head,” and why this caricature nonetheless captures something true about externalism. Even though individualism is a
thesis of metaphysical determination, it is also a claim about how psychological states ought to be individuated or taxonomized. This is implicit,
I think, in the adjectives “mental,” “psychological,” or “cognitive,” predicated of states, properties, processes, or events, since to talk of (say)
mental properties is already to talk of properties as being of a certain
kind or type. Thus, although individualists and externalists agree that
mental states are “in the head” – just as they agree that they are causally
determined, in part, by what lies beyond the head – they disagree about
how mental states should be individuated or taxonomized. What is right
about the caricature of externalism, then, is that externalists do think that
what lies beyond the head, what is not “in the head,” is relevant to psychological taxonomy. What psychological kinds an individual instantiates
is not metaphysically determined by what is in the head.

82 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
We can now put together the point about determination with this claim
about taxonomy. Individualism is the view that mental states, qua mental
states, are metaphysically determined by an individual’s intrinsic, physical
properties. The expression “mental states” is used in a general sense,
and encompasses determinate forms of states, properties, processes, and
events that are termed “mental,” including kinds that are motivational,
cognitive, and perceptual.

Individualists are right to think that the cognitive and physical sciences
are subject to similar constraints, but wrong, I shall suggest, about what
those constraints are. Talk of mental states being “in the head” may be a
useful shorthand for the individualistic claim that such states, insofar as
they feature in psychological taxonomies, are metaphysically determined
by an individual’s intrinsic, physical properties. But we should also be wary
of how readily this locational metaphor can mislead us about the nature
of the debate between individualists and externalists.

As a thesis of metaphysical determination, individualism implies that
two individuals identical in their intrinsic respects must have the same
psychological states. The modal aspect to this implication makes supervenience an appropriate concept to use in stating individualism more
precisely. This implication, and indeed the debate over individualism, is
often made more vivid through the fantasy of doppelgangers ¨ , molecule-formolecule identical individuals, and the corresponding fantasy of Twin
Earth. I turn to these dual fantasies next.

3 getting to twin earth: what’s in the head?
Hilary Putnam’s “The Meaning of ‘Meaning’” introduced both fantasies
in the context of a discussion of the meaning of natural language terms.

Putnam was concerned to show that “meaning” does not and cannot
jointly satisfy two theses that it was often taken to satisfy by then prevalent
views of natural language reference: the claim that the meaning of a term
is what determines its reference, and the claim that knowing the meaning
of a term is simply a matter of being in a particular psychological state.

This latter claim is sometimes glossed by saying that meanings are “in the
head,” and it is an individualistic claim in that it implies that knowledge
of meaning is metaphysically determined by what’s inside the head.

These theses typified descriptive theories of reference, prominent
since Gottlob Frege and Bertrand Russell explicitly formulated them,
according to which the reference of a term is fixed or metaphysically
determined by the descriptions that a speaker attaches to that term.

Such views were central to both ordinary language philosophy and logical empiricism, two encompassing frameworks that had much influence
in English-speaking philosophy throughout the 1950s and 1960s. The
basic idea of descriptive theories of reference is perhaps best conveyed
through an example.2
Suppose that I think of Aristotle as a great, dead philosopher who wrote
a number of important philosophical works, such as the Nicomachean
Ethics, and who was a student of Plato and teacher of Alexander the Great.

These are the descriptions that I associate with the name “Aristotle.”
Then, on a descriptivist view of reference, the reference of my term
“Aristotle” is just the thing in the world that satisfies the various descriptions that I attach to that term: It is the thing in the world that is a great
philosopher, is dead, wrote a number of important philosophical works,
was a student of Plato, and was a teacher of Alexander the Great. Such
descriptivist views of the reference of proper names were the critical focus of Saul Kripke’s influential Naming and Necessity, while in his attack
on this cluster of views and their presuppositions, Putnam focused on
natural kind terms, such as “water” and “tiger.” Both Kripke and Putnam
intended their critiques and the subsequent alternative theory of natural
language reference, the causal theory of reference, to provide another,
general way to think about the relationship between language and the
world. As Gary Ebbs has pointed out, in at least Putnam’s case, this theory was part and parcel of a more wide-ranging critique of the notions
of analyticity, the a priori, and reductionism associated with empiricist
views in metaphysics and the philosophy of science. But let us stay close
to Putnam’s argument in “The Meaning of ‘Meaning’” and draw out its
connection to individualism.3
Consider an ordinary individual, Oscar, who lives on Earth and interacts with water in the ways that most of us do: He drinks it, washes
with it, and sees it falling from the sky as rain. Oscar, who has no special
chemical knowledge about the nature of water, will associate a range of
descriptions with his term “water”: It is a liquid that one can drink, that
is used to wash, and that falls from the sky as rain. On a descriptive view
of reference, these descriptions, what the logician Gottlob Frege called
the sense and Rudolph Carnap the intension of the term, determine the
reference of Oscar’s term “water.” That is, the reference or extension
of Oscar’s term “water” is fixed by the set of descriptions he attaches to
the term as part of his grasp of its sense. And since those descriptions,
so grasped, are “in the head,” natural language reference on this view is
individualistic.4
84 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
To continue Putnam’s argument, now imagine a molecule-for-molecule doppelganger ¨ of Oscar, Oscar*, who lives on a planet just like Earth
in all respects but one: The substance that people drink, wash with, and
see falling from the sky is not water (that is, H2O), but a substance with
a different chemical structure, XYZ. Call this planet “Twin Earth.” This
substance, XYZ, is called “water” on Twin Earth, and Oscar*, as a doppelganger ¨ or twin of Oscar, has the same beliefs about it as Oscar has about
water on Earth. (Recall that Oscar, and thus Oscar* as his twin, have no
special knowledge of the chemical structure of water.) Oscar* believes
that it falls from the sky as rain, is drinkable, can be used for bathing,
is found in rivers and streams – all the things that Oscar believes of water. Oscar and Oscar* associate just the same descriptions with the term
“water”: their term has the same meaning, sense, or intension, where
these are conceived individualistically. On a descriptive theory of reference, since meaning determines reference, their terms “water” should
have the same reference.

But there are several reasons to resist the claim that Oscar and Oscar*
have a term, “water” with a common reference. First, recall that Twin
Earth is introduced as being just like Earth, except that it has another
substance, XYZ, in place of water, that is, H2O. If this is right, then it
is hard to see how Oscar* could come to refer to water, since there is
no water on his planet. Twin Earth has what we might call “twin-water”
or “twater” on it, not water, and it is twater that Oscar* interacts with,
not water. Second, Oscar and Oscar* stand in the same relation to their
respective environments, which suggests a certain parity in their cases.

Given that Oscar’s term “water” refers to or is about water, then Oscar*’s
term “water”refers to or is about twater. Putting these two points together:
If Oscar uses “water” to refer to water because that is the stuff that is in his
local environment, then Oscar should use “water” to refer to twater, for
just the same reason. That implies that Oscar and Oscar* have natural
language terms that differ in their reference. And this is so despite the fact
that their terms agree in their in-the-head meaning. By hypothesis, Oscar
and Oscar* are doppelgangers ¨ , and so are identical in all their intrinsic
properties, and so are identical with respect to what’s“in the head.” Thus,
Putnam argues, the reference of the natural language terms that Oscar
uses is not metaphysically determined by what is in Oscar’s head.

Putnam’s target was a tradition of thinking about language that treated
the meanings of natural language terms and language more generally in
ways that supposed that the world beyond the individual language user did
not exist. With a focus on natural kind terms, and the broader, naturalistic
alternative that Putnam saw himself as offering, Putnam’s views here became associated with scientific and metaphysical realism, whereby the
referents of those terms, natural kinds, had underlying essences that
were discovered a posteriori through scientific methodology. Thus, part
of the interest that Putnam’s views have generated, and some of the controversies they have engendered, turn on these broader features of his
views.5
Since Putnam’s chief point is one about natural language terms and the
relationship of their semantics to what’s inside the head, one needs at least
to extend his reasoning from language to thought to arrive at a position
that denies individualism about the mind itself. Indeed, there are various
points at which Putnam himself seems to presuppose individualism about
the mind in making his case against descriptive theories of reference. For
example, Putnam says, in reference to a doppelganger ¨ of his whose word
“elm” refers not to elms but to beech trees that “[i]t is absurd to think
his psychological state is one bit different from mine: yet he ‘means’ beech
when he says‘elm’ and I‘mean’elm when I say elm. Cut the pie any way you
like, ‘meanings’ just ain’t in the head.” It is precisely the view that Putnam
labels as absurd here, however, that is expressed by anti-individualists
about the mind.6
The term “individualism” itself, and the development of a series of
thought experiments that made a case against individualism and which in
many ways paralleled Putnam’s Twin Earth thought experiment, were introduced by Tyler Burge in “Individualism and the Mental.” Burge identi-
fied individualism as an overall conception of the mind prevalent in modern philosophical thinking at least since Descartes in the mid-seventeenth
century, and argued that our common sense psychological framework for
explaining behavior, our folk psychology, was not individualistic. Importantly, Burge was explicit in making a case against individualism that did
not turn on perhaps controversial claims about the semantics of natural
kind terms. He developed his case against individualism using agents with
thoughts about arthritis, sofas, and contracts, and so his argument did
not presuppose any type of scientific essentialism about natural kinds.

Like Putnam’s argument, however, Burge’s argument does presuppose
some views about natural language understanding.7
The most central of these is that we can and do have incomplete understanding of many of the things that we have thoughts about and for
which we have natural language terms. Given that, it is possible for an
individual to have thoughts that turn on this incomplete understanding,
such as the thought that one has arthritis in one’s thigh muscle. Arthritis
86 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
is a disease only of the joints, or as we might put it,“arthritis”in our speech
community applies only to a disease of the joints. Consider an individual,
Bert, with the thought that he would express by saying “I have arthritis in
my thigh.” In the actual world, this is a thought about arthritis; it is just
that Bert has an incomplete or partially mistaken view of the nature of
arthritis, and so expresses a false belief with this sentence. But now imagine Bert as living in a different speech community, one in which the term
“arthritis” does apply to a disease both of the joints and of other parts of
the body, including the thigh. In that speech community, Bert’s thought
would not involve the sort of incomplete understanding that it involves
in the actual world; in fact, his thought in such a world would be true.

Given the differences in the two speech communities, it seems that an
individual with thoughts about what he calls “arthritis” will have different
thoughts in the two communities. In the actual world, Bert has thoughts
about arthritis. In the counterfactual world he has thoughts about some
other disease, what we might refer to as“tharthritis”to distinguish it from
the disease that we have in the actual world.

In principle, we could suppose that Bert himself is identical across the
two contexts, that is, that he is identical in all intrinsic respects. Yet we attribute thoughts with different contents to Bert, and seem to do so solely
because of features of the language community in which he is located.

Thus, the content of one’s thoughts, and so how we taxonomize those
thoughts as intentional states, is not metaphysically determined by the
intrinsic properties of the individual. And again taking a difference in
the content of two thoughts to imply a difference between the thoughts
themselves, this implies in turn that thoughts themselves are not individuated individualistically.

One contrast sometimes drawn between the externalist views of
Putnam and Burge is to characterize Putnam’s view as a form of physical
externalism and Burge’s view as a form of social externalism. According
to Putnam, it is the character of the physical world – the nature of water itself – that, in part, metaphysically determines the content of one’s
mind, while according to Burge it is the character of the social world –
the nature of one’s linguistic community – that does so. While this difference may serve as a useful reminder of one way in which these two views
differ, we should also keep in mind a social aspect to Putnam’s view of
natural language that I have not yet mentioned: his division of linguistic
labor. What allows individuals to use natural kind terms to refer to objects
in the world despite those individuals not necessarily having identifying
descriptions, according to Putnam, is their ability to borrow reference
from others, experts, who are able to reliably pick out those referents
through their knowledge. Important to both Burge’s and Putnam’s views
is the idea that language users and psychological beings depend and rely
on one another in ways that are reflected in our everyday, common sense
ways of thinking about language and thought. Thus, there is a social aspect to the nature of meaning and thought on both views, and this is in
part what justifies the appropriateness of the label anti-individualism for
each of them.8
I close this section with a parenthetical observation that raises one issue
for further thought. The contrast between the individual and the social is
built into the debate between individualists and externalists. This contrast
takes different forms in the cognitive, biological, and social sciences, but it
remains central to influential views in all three. We might wonder just why,
whether there is a theoretically illuminating account of the distinction
itself, and why it has such ubiquitous appeal in the fragile sciences.

4 the social aspect to having a mind
In retrospect, Putnam’s conclusions about natural language meaning
should have been no real surprise since there is obviously a social dimension to language. While the fact that language is used in a social context,
and that one of its chief functions is to communicate between individuals or groups of individuals, have rarely been completely ignored in the
philosophy of language and cognitive science, a range of dominant views
about language have, however, downplayed these aspects of language and
treated them derivatively.

For example, Paul Grice had proposed that we understand what a
speaker means by an utterance in terms of a complex set of intentions
that that speaker has, and that we then understand what a sentence means
in terms of this notion of speaker meaning. Part of the complexity to a
speaker’s intention was that it was an intention to effect a change in the
mental states of one or more hearers. Thus, there clearly is a communicative aspect to Grice’s proposal. But like descriptivism about reference, this
is an account of meaning given primarily in terms of what happens in the
head of a given speaker, with shared, interpersonal meaning – what Grice
called sentence meaning – analyzed in terms of individual speaker meaning. Thus, as Burge pointed out in “Individualism and the Mental,” the
Gricean program in semantics is individualistic. The same general point
holds of a range of other influential views of natural language: for example, David Lewis’s account of convention, Noam Chomsky’s conception of
88 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
linguistics, and early attempts to develop natural language understanding
programs in artificial intelligence.9
Although I have emphasized the similarities between the externalist
arguments of Putnam and Burge, the corresponding moral that can be
drawn from Burge’s argument – that there is a social dimension to having
a mind – remains striking, even in retrospect. This is so not only because
one might think that mental states do not primarily serve a communicative function, but also because the very enterprise of understanding the
complexities of the mind directs us inside the head. I want to point to
two distinct features of minds and how they have been thought about to
illustrate this.

First, the cognitive sciences have developed an elaborate conception
of cognition as a form of computation. In what has become known as
“classical” cognitive science, the focus here has been on the specific algorithms governing state-to-state transitions between internal, mental symbols. On this conception, any social aspect to cognition would need to
be secondary or derivative in some way, since computation itself is fundamentally asocial. This asociality assumption would also seem to be shared
by connectionist variations on the computational theme, whereby cognition is at bottom the adjustment of connection weights between idealized,
neurally inspired nodes. Likewise, the development of computational
techniques within cognitive neuroscience, from single-cell computation
to computation in relatively large-scale units, such as columns and modules, has not provided any reason to give up this assumption. As a kind
of computation, cognition is not social at all.

Second, we are conscious of many of our mental states. There is something it is like to have them, a phenomenology to our mental lives that is
“had,” that is experienced, from a particular perspective, that of the first
person. If we focus not on the intentionality of mental states but on their
phenomenology, there seems less room for an externalist – let alone a
social – dimension to mentality. There is simply an asymmetry between
how I know about my own mental life and how I find out about those of
others, one that makes it difficult to see how externalism could be true
of that part of mentality of which we are conscious. We are intimate with
some of our own mental states, and have a knowledge of them whose
directness and noninferential nature seem hard to reconcile with the
idea that such states are metaphysically determined by factors beyond
the head, including social factors. Indeed, our first-person knowledge
of the mind has been thought to be incompatible with externalism in
general.10
Other aspects of our conception of minds, however, are more conducive to the claim that the mind is itself social in nature. The first of
these is the idea that cognition is situated or embedded in a particular social environment. The social embeddedness of thought is apparent both
in Putnam’s appeal to the division of linguistic labor and Burge’s reliance
on incomplete understanding, and some work in the cognitive sciences
has adopted this sort of view of cognition from a more general and developed interest in embedded cognition. Work on embedded or situation
cognition has often focused on how individuals become tightly coupled to
their physical (rather than their social) environments, concentrating on
the role of the physical environment in enhancing or even constituting
individual performance. But other people and the artifacts, institutions,
practices, and interactions they both create and inherit are the most significant feature of any individual’s environment for her mental life, a
point being slowly taken up within some areas of the cognitive sciences.11
A second way in which sociality has been thought to permeate the
psychological is via the idea that the mental is normative. The source
of this normativity is the social world: from interpersonal relationships,
to institutional roles, conventions, and institutions themselves. Ordinary
folk psychological ascriptions carry with them normative and not just
descriptive implications, those concerning justification, rationality, and
appropriateness of what those states are about. This normative dimension to the mental has been recognized in the idea that mental states
provide reasons for acting, and it forms the backbone of interpretationist views of folk psychology, such as those of Donald Davidson and Daniel
Dennett. These discussions predate, and have been largely orthogonal
to, the individualism-externalism debate.12
Others have made a more direct connection between these two issues,
normativity and externalism. Burge himself has argued for externalism
via an appeal to the normativity of perception and the general idea of intellectual norms. And normative requirements have been taken by some
to provide the basis for distinguishing between simple intentionality and
truly thoughtful intentionality of the type that human beings possess.

Philip Pettit, for example, has argued that rule following is one thing
that distinguishes true thinkers from merely intentional creatures, and
that rule following requires what Pettit calls an ethocentric conception of
thought, one which views thought as involving activity in an interpersonal,
social world.13
It is in what we might call the “Pittsburgh school” of thought, rooted in
Wilfrid Sellars’ classic attack on the Myth of the Given, that links between
90 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
the normativity of the mental and externalism about the mind have
been forged most thoroughly, particularly in the work of John McDowell,
Robert Brandom, and John Haugeland. What these views share, and what
allows them to carve a path from normativity to externalism, is the idea
that in order to have at least certain kinds of meaningful, content-laden,
intentional states one must be subject to rules, standards, and conventions, where these are not metaphysically determined by intrinsic facts
about the bearer of those states. Recognizing the normative dimension
to the mental takes one beyond the individual and into the social.14
5 narrow and wide content
Thus far, I have barely paused to register the various twists and turns
to the debate over individualism in psychology. But there is one twist
that can’t be missed: the distinction between narrow and wide content.

One intuitive response to the initial Putnam-Burge arguments against
individualism has been to concede that while there is a sense in which
even doppelgangers ¨ can have mental states with different content, there is
an equally important sense in which they must have mental states with the
same content. That content, content shared by doppelgangers ¨ no matter
how different their environments, is narrow content.

We can use Putnam’s own example to illustrate what narrow content is,
and why we might insist on its existence and importance. While we might
distinguish between the meaning of Oscar’s term “water” and Oscar*’s
term “water” (which we designate with “twater” in part to highlight its
distinct extension), we could equally ascribe a common, shared meaning to their terms “water,” one neutral between H2O and XYZ. Precisely
because there is so little difference between Oscar’s term “water” and
Oscar*’s term “water,” it is plausible to view those terms, even if not
strictly identical, as sharing so extensive a common core of meaning that
we would be overlooking something important were we simply to treat
them as semantically independent terms. Putting this in terms of the psychological states that Oscar and Oscar* are in, we can say that although
there is some difference between the psychological ascriptions we would
make for each – those that employ a notion of wide content – there is also
much intentional psychology that is shared between Oscar and Oscar*.

In fact, there is much shared in their intentional psychology even when
we are considering their thoughts about“water.”In order to express these
common, intentional psychological states, we need some notion of content that Oscar and Oscar* share. That is, we need some notion of narrow
content. Whatever else it is, narrow content is the type of content that
physical twins must share, however different their environments.

In introducing narrow content in this way, I have presupposed that the
Twin Earth thought experiments have shown that Oscar and Oscar*’s psychological states differ in their propositional content. More generally, I
am assuming that our ordinary, pretheoretical notion of propositional
content, of intentionality, is not narrow but wide. This is certainly the
received view both of what the Twin Earth arguments show and of intentionality, but it will pay to spell out just why.

The intentional content of so-called folk psychological states, such as
belief and desire, is what is specified by the that-clause of an ascription
of propositional attitudes. For example, when we say that
Peter thinks that wolves are placental
the content of Peter’s thought is that wolves are placental. This is what his
thought is about, what it represents as being the case. Peter’s thought
is about wolves, that is, he has some internal representation that refers
to wolves. At least when we are considering folk psychology, there is no
intrinsic feature of the representation itself that makes the corresponding
thought one about wolves. In fact, note that we can understand what
the content of Peter’s thought is in this example although I have said
nothing at all about the nature of the representation in and of itself.

Even supposing that Peter’s thought is instantiated in Peter in virtue of
there being a token of the sentence “wolves are placental” inscribed in
Mentalese in a place in Peter’s brain that we can call his “thought box,”
this fact about Peter’s internal organization is not sufficient for Peter’s
thought to be about wolves being placental. Someone else with just that
inscription in her thought box could have a distinct thought were facts
outside of Peter other than they are. In particular, this could be so were
“mere” social facts, facts about our communal conventions for the use
of natural language terms, different. The claim that this is true not just
of particular in-the-head facts but of all of them considered together –
they do not suffice to fix the contents of one’s thoughts – is another way
to express the conclusions drawn from the Putnam and Burge thought
experiments.

The intentionality of folk psychological states seems intuitively to lie in
some sort of relation between what is inside the head and what is outside of
it. It is plausible to think that this relationship is, broadly construed, causal
in nature. It is wolves that Peter thinks about because wolves are what
causally impinge on Peter either through his own direct sense experience
92 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
of wolves or through his causal location in a linguistic community. This is
not to imply that being in such a causal relationship is sufficient for one to
have thoughts about wolves, but that these causal relationships are partial
metaphysical determiners of the intentionality of one’s thoughts. And
this shows that folk psychological content is wide, since individuals who
differ in this beyond-the-head relation may have thoughts with different
contents, no matter how similar they are in in-the-head respects.

Consider now the claim that there is, in addition, a notion of narrow
content to be found lurking in folk psychology. The intuition that the
above appeal to the twins Oscar and Oscar* drew on was that their internal identity does generate some sort of intentional identity or similarity,
even if there is also a respect in which they have thoughts with different
contents. One way to express this is to say that their “water” thoughts
share a narrow content, even though they differ in their wide content.

There are three motivations for the notion of narrow content, none of
which presupposes individualism about the mind, and each of which has
served as the basis for a distinct proposal about what narrow content is.

The first concedes that individual representations do not suffice to fix
content but challenges the generalization of this point to cover all individual representations considered together. That is, once one considers
not just the intrinsic features of a given mental token but its relations to
other mental tokens, the claim that what’s inside the head doesn’t fix any
notion of content loses its plausibility. This is because there can be, and
typically is, a rich causal structure to mental representations that begins
and ends in the head, a point that can be drawn from the functionalist view of mental states. For example, Oscar and Oscar* both have a
mental token, “water,” that is causally related to the same perceptual and
mental inputs, and the same mental and behavioral outputs, and this is
sufficient for those tokens to share some type of content. The proposal
that the narrow content of a mental state is its narrow conceptual role
is a development of this idea, an idea also developed independently as
procedural semantics in early work in artificial intelligence.

The second motivation reaches back to the origins of the antiindividualistic perspective on mental content in the philosophy of language to recognize two aspects to the meaning of natural language terms
and the close relationship between them. Consider the term “I.” The
referent of a spoken token of the word “I” is the speaker, and that is
who is meant by that utterance; the referent of “you” is the person being
spoken to. But “I” also has a common meaning when different people
utter it, as does “you”: “I” refers to the speaker, and “you” refers to the
hearer. Thus, when two people say to each other “I love you,” there is
clearly some sense in which they have said exactly the same thing to one
another, and we need some notion of content that captures this. What
these utterances and their constituents share is their narrow content, this
being a sort of rule – such as that “I” refers to the speaker/writer – that is
then contextualized to derive the referent of a particular token utterance
or inscription. This has generated the proposal that narrow content is a
function from contexts to truth conditions: Take the narrow content of a
mental state, add a beyond-the-head context, and one arrives at its (wide)
propositional content.

The third motivation is the idea that the beyond-the-head differences
between Oscar and Oscar* make absolutely no difference to how the
two see the world: Their worlds are phenomenologically identical. But
how the world appears to one is mediated not just by any old internal
machinery but by content-laden internal machinery, such as concepts
and ideas, thoughts and beliefs. If physical twins are phenomenologically identical, then they must be intentionally identical in some sense,
and the corresponding notion of content must be narrow, not wide.

This has given rise to the idea that narrow content is phenomenological
content.15
These various proposals provide a strategy for limiting the significance
of the Putnam-Burge arguments against individualism since they suggest that there is no strict incompatibility between an individualistic and
an intentional psychology. Thus, one can concede the conclusions that
Putnam and Burge draw but rely on the presence of some notion of narrow content either to continue with content-laden psychology as it has
developed to date, or to look for alternative ways to connect computational and neuroscientific approaches to the mind with our existing folk
psychology.

6 functionalism, physicalism, and individualism
For many philosophers of mind, individualism has been attractive because of a perceived connection between that view and physicalism and
functionalism in the philosophy of mind, both of which have been widely
accepted over the last thirty years. Physicalism or materialism has been
expressed in various ways, perhaps most commonly in terms of the notion of supervenience that we have already met: All facts, properties,
processes, events, and things supervene on the physical facts, properties,
processes, events, and things, as they are posited in elementary physics.

94 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
This ontological formulation of physicalism is often accompanied by an
explanatory thesis, which states that physical explanations are, in some
sense, the ultimate explanations for any phenomenon whatsoever.

Individualism has been thought to be linked to physicalism since it implies, via the supervenience formulation, that there is no psychological
difference without a corresponding difference in the intrinsic, physical
states of the individual. Those rejecting individualism have sometimes
been charged with endorsing a form of dualism about the mind, or making a mystery of mental causation by ignoring the causal powers that
mental states have. Causation between mental states and events is ultimately causation between an individual’s physical states and events, and
scientific taxonomies of mental states must respect this feature of mental causation. Connecting this up with the methodological formulations
that have had influence in cognitive science itself, individualism has been
claimed to be a minimal constraint on arriving at psychological explanations that locate the mind suitably in the physical world, a psychology that
taxonomizes its entities by their causal powers.

Individualists themselves disagree about what this implies about the
substantive nature of psychology. For example, Jerry Fodor thinks that
this minimal constraint provides a way of seeing how folk psychology in
particular and the notion of mental content more generally, have a respectable place in the cognitive sciences. At one point Fodor held that this
in turn required cognitive science to use a notion of narrow content, although in subsequent work he has suggested that ordinary propositional
content was adequate for the tasks of theory construction in the cognitive sciences. Stephen Stich, by contrast, thinks that individualism implies
that cognitive science should jettison both folk psychology and the notion
of mental content altogether, arguing that content should be eliminated
from psychology, in part because of the conflict between the minimal
constraint of individualism and the wide nature of intentionality. Both
of Fodor’s positions suggest that individualistic approaches to psychology
will be recognizable descendants of current work in the cognitive sciences
that incorporates and builds on folk psychology. Stich’s view, by contrast,
implies that an individualistic cognitive science will be divorced from
folk-contaminated research traditions, being fashioned instead from the
cloth of computational intelligence or cognitive neuroscience.16
Functionalism is the view that psychological states and processes
should be individuated by their causal or functional roles, that is, by their
place within the overall causal economy of the organism. It has been common to suppose that these functional or causal roles are individualistic.

Functionalism was introduced in the 1960s as a way of understanding the
relationship between mental and physical states that meshed with two
perspectives on minds then nascent but that have had a lasting effect on
how philosophers think about the mind.

The first was the rise of the computer metaphor and particularly the
analogy between the distinctions between software or program and hardware, on the one hand, and mind and brain, on the other. Mental states
were not strictly identical to brain states but involved some sort of abstraction from those states, in much the way that computer programs were not
strictly identical to electronic states of computers but abstractions from
them. Functionalism cohered with the computer metaphor because it
offered a causal understanding of the mind that also seemed to characterize the less mysterious relationship between programs and computers.

Functionalism also provided the conceptual underpinnings for the very
idea of artificial intelligence.

The second was the related desire for an account of the mind that
made it perspicuous how creatures very much unlike us in many respects
could nonetheless share a mental life very much like our own. This desire
was typically expressed as the requirement that an account of the mind
must allow mental states to be multiply realized, that is, instantiated even
when the underlying physical realizers vary. The most attention-grabbing,
putative cases of multiple realization were those where the physical realizers for mental states were extremely different – humans versus possible
silicon-based Martians. But there was also a concern for biological differences across species, as well as physical differences in a given individual
over time.

Functionalism seemed perfect for an account of the mind that meshed
with these two perspectives, since what mattered for functional identity
was not the nature of the physical stuff but, rather, the way in which that
stuff was structured or organized. Again, the computer metaphor was apt
here: The very same program could be instantiated on physically quite different machines. Crucial to program identity is functional organization;
likewise for minds.

Functionalism has been understood in various ways, but the two ways
most prevalent in cognitive science – in terms of the notion of computation, and in terms of the idea of analytical decomposition – both lend
themselves to an individualistic reading. Computational processes, conceived as operating solely on the syntactic properties of mental states,
have been plausibly thought to be individualistic. And it is natural to view
analytical decomposition as beginning with a psychological capacity, such
96 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
as memory or depth perception, and seeking the intrinsic properties of
the organism that create and constitute that capacity.

7 the appeal to causal powers
Appeals to an entity’s causal powers are prominent in discussions of the
relationship between individualism and physicalism, and they are at the
core of an influential and persistent argument for individualism first offered by Jerry Fodor. Although criticisms of the argument seem to me
decisive in showing the argument to be fatally flawed, the argument itself taps into a cluster of intuitions that run through deep philosophical
waters. Perhaps for this reason the argument has continued to inspire
individualistic appeals to causal powers, despite acknowledged problems
with Fodor’s original statement of it.17
The basic version of the argument itself is easy to state. Taxonomy or
individuation in the sciences in general satisfies a generalized version of
individualism about psychology: Sciences taxonomize the entities they
posit or discover by the causal powers that those entities have. Psychology
and the cognitive sciences should be no exception here. But the causal
powers of anything supervene on that thing’s intrinsic, physical properties. Thus, science taxonomizes entities by properties that supervene
on the intrinsic, physical properties of those entities. Science, and so
psychology, is individualistic.

One way to identify the problem with this argument is to ask what it
is that makes the first premise about scientific taxonomy in general true.

Given the naturalistic turn supposedly embraced by those working in contemporary philosophical psychology, one would think that support here
would come from an examination of actual taxonomic practice across the
sciences. However, once one does turn to look at these practices, it is easy
to find a variety of sciences that do not taxonomize “by causal powers”:
They instead individuate their kinds relationally, where often historical
relations determine kind membership. Examples often cited here include
species in evolutionary biology, which are individuated phylogenetically
(and so historically), and continents in geology, whose causal powers are
pretty much irrelevant to their individuation as continents.

The problem is particularly acute in the context of this argument for
individualism, since a further premise in the argument states that a thing’s
causal powers supervene on that thing’s intrinsic properties. Thus, one
cannot simply save the first premise in the argument by stipulating that individuation in these sciences is “by causal powers,” using some extended
or nonstandard sense of that notion. For example, Fodor has acknowledged that scientific taxonomy is often relational, and his attempt to
show how his argument accommodates this fact involves precisely this
sort of broadening of what it means to individuate “by causal powers.” If
one operates with an extended notion of individuation by causal powers,
however, then “causal powers” no longer supervene on an individual’s
intrinsic, physical properties. In adjusting the sense of “causal powers” to
accommodate relational taxonomies in science, we make the other chief
premise in the argument, that causal powers supervene on intrinsic, physical properties, false. We can take causal powers to be intrinsic properties,
in which case they do supervene on what’s inside an individual, but then
the claim about scientific taxonomy being “by causal powers” is false.

It is for this reason that the argument from causal powers equivocates
on the crucial term “causal powers.” I have argued elsewhere that this
equivocation permeates all versions of the argument. I also think that
we have reason to be skeptical about views of explanation and taxonomy
that place more weight on the distinction between intrinsic and relational
properties than it can bear.18
The cluster of intuitions that persists despite an acknowledgment
that the argument itself is flawed in something like this way revolve
around the idea that an entity’s causal powers are central to both the place
of that entity in the causal nexus and in how that entity is or should be
taxonomized. To get from this somewhat vague idea to the individualistic
claim that scientific taxonomy is “by causal powers,” one has to establish
some sort of asymmetry between properties that are metaphysically determined by what lies within the boundary of the individual, and those,
like relational properties, that are not. For example, one could claim that
only an entity’s intrinsic properties feature in causal laws governing that
thing’s behavior, or that the causal efficacy that any relational property
has depends only on the intrinsic properties of the entities it relates.

Such views are part of the smallist legacy of corpuscularianism that I
identified at the end of Chapter 1. The basic problem with them is very
much that with the claim they are invoked to defend: That once one turns
to taxonomic and explanatory practice in a range of sciences, one finds
many examples in which the putative asymmetries – between causal powers and other properties, or between intrinsic and relational properties –
do not exist. This is a developed form of the prima facie general problem that, I claimed in Chapter 1, smallist views in metaphysics and the
philosophy of science face, and we will encounter it again in the next two
chapters in critiquing the standard view of realization.

98 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
Nonetheless, the intuition that individualism does articulate a constraint for the explanation of cognition that sciences more generally satisfy, one that would make for a physicalistically respectable psychology,
persists. My view is that this intuition itself seriously underestimates the
diversity in taxonomic and explanatory practice across the sciences, and
that it simply needs to be given up. Attempts to revitalize this sort of
argument for individualism proceed by making the sorts of a priori assumptions about the nature of scientific taxonomies and explanations
that are reminiscent of the generalized, rational reconstructions of scientific practice that governed logical positivist views of science. This should
sound alarm bells for any self-professed naturalist.

There is one difference between individualists and externalists about
psychology emerging from reflection on the argument from causal powers worth keeping in mind as we think about the individual in the fragile
sciences more generally. Individualism, especially as it has been articulated by those proposing or defending this particular argument, is touted
as a global thesis about individuation in psychology that follows from an
even more general thesis about individuation in science. Externalism,
especially as defended by those attacking the argument from causal powers, is accompanied by a more pluralistic view of psychological taxonomy.

This view allows some place for the causal powers of individuals but also
sees scientific (and so psychological) taxonomy in many cases as being
determined by an entity’s relational and even historical properties. These
individuative theses carry with them normative visions about what good
and bad scientific taxonomy, and thus explanation, is like in particular sciences. In psychology, individualism implies that folk psychology,
together with the vast tracts of psychology proper that incorporate or
develop folk psychology – including much of social psychology, cognitive developmental psychology, and work on decision making – involves
a problematic taxonomy of mental states. It also implies that the way to
repair such problematic taxonomies is to modify them to reconcile them
with individualism. Hence, the narrow content program. Externalists are
likely to view scientific taxonomies and scientific explanation as being
sensitive to a range of factors, and to be skeptical about the prospects for
any recipelike prescription regarding proper scientific taxonomy of the
sort that individualists propose.

8 metaphysics and the fragile sciences
What of the more general, putative connection between physicalism and
individualism? If the denial of individualism could be shown to entail
the denial of a plausibly general version of physicalism, then externalism
would itself be in real trouble. But like the individualist’s appeal to causal
powers and scientific taxonomy, the move from the general intuitions
that motivate such an argument to the argument itself will likely always
prove problematic. For example, externalists can respect the physicalistic slogan “no psychological difference without a physical difference”
because the relevant physical differences lie beyond the boundary of the
individual; attempts to refine this slogan (for example, no psychological difference without an intrinsic physical difference) are likely either
to beg the question against the externalist, or to invoke a construal of
physicalism that is at least as controversial as individualism itself.

Externalists have not been as attentive to the metaphysical notions
at the core of contemporary materialism as they could have been, however. When they have so attended they have often opposed prevalent
physicalist or materialist views without offering a substantive, alternative
metaphysics of the mind. Tyler Burge is the most prominent externalist
of whom this could be said. In his original discussion of the implications
of individualism for related views about the mind, Burge claimed that
the rejection of individualism implied the rejection of widely accepted
token-token identity theories of the mind. In much of his later work,
he has also pointed to inadequacies both in arguments from physicalist assumptions to individualism and to materialist conceptions of the
metaphysics of mind. At the same time, Burge has emphasized the need
to focus on explanatory practice in order to properly understand metaphysical issues, such as the nature of mental causation, saying that such
reflection “motivates less confidence in materialist metaphysics than is
common in North American philosophy.”19
The most underdiscussed, relevant metaphysical notion is that of realization. The next two chapters offer an extended treatment of the concept of realization. They will not only prove useful in our current focus
on individualism in psychology, but also in thinking about the role of the
individual in the fragile sciences more generally.

5
Metaphysics, Mind, and Science
Two Views of Realization
1 the metaphysics of mind and the fragile sciences
It is commonplace for materialist philosophers of mind to talk of mental
states as being realized in states of the brain. So much so, that realization
has become part of the very framework in terms of which many conceptualize the metaphysics of mind. However, while the concept of realization
has been invoked in the philosophy of mind and psychology for over forty
years, it has only recently become the subject of direct philosophical theorizing. Implicit in the literature on the metaphysics of mind is the idea that
realization is a general relation, rather than one invoked solely to answer
the mind-body problem. In this chapter, I shall argue that making this
assumption explicit provides reason to rethink the concept of realization.

By the end of this chapter, I hope to have shown how the metaphysical
foundations of the cognitive sciences are intertwined with broader metaphysical and methodological issues in other parts of the fragile sciences.

Psychologists and cognitive neuroscientists do not, for the most part,
talk of realization, but of the neural correlates, or of the neural mechanisms
for psychological functions and capacities. Cognitive capacities are localized in states of the brain. It is part of philosophical lore that such
talk is loose-speak for the more metaphysically loaded discussions within
the philosophy of mind cast in terms of supervenience and realization.

This lore is what justifies the sense that philosophical discussions of the
metaphysics of mind are continuous with and contribute to the cognitive
sciences, even though one does not hear “realization” in the mouths of
cognitive scientists themselves. It is part of the self-image of naturalistic
philosophy of mind.

100
Challenging this self-image is no part of my aim in this chapter, though
developing how I think realization should be conceptualized requires
some discussion of the network of concepts to which realization is related, including those of mechanism and localization within the cognitive
sciences. Having spent the core of the chapter discussing realization in
general, I shall conclude it by returning to neural realization. I begin with
a brief history of how realization came to be so central to the metaphysics
of mind.

2 realization within the philosophy of mind
Contemporary views of realization in the philosophy of mind can be
traced to Hilary Putnam’s use of the notion in the context of his appeal to
Turing machines in discussing the mind-body problem. Putnam argued
that the relationship between mental and physical states should be no
more puzzling (and no more interesting) than the relationship between
the abstract states of a given Turing machine and the structural states
of the device realizing that Turing machine. Putnam drew a distinction
between the logical description of a Turing machine and the physical
states that realize the states to which that description refers, the idea
being that we see mental states as realized by physical states of the brain
in just this sense.

Accompanying this idea were two claims that have had far-reaching
consequences for how philosophers have thought about the mind over
the last forty years: first, that systems adequately characterized by Turing
machine descriptions can be multiply realized by physical states; and second, that there are no significant barriers to identifying mental states
with brain states. Within a few years, the first of these ideas, that of the
multiple realizability of mental states, had become a central reason for rejecting the second of them, the mind-brain identity thesis, largely through
Putnam’s own influence. Thus arose the functionalist view of the mind
that, despite its critics (including a later timeslice of Putnam himself), has
survived as the dominant “ism” in contemporary philosophy of mind.1
With the rise of functionalism, the claim that mental states are realized
in physical states of the brain became part of the received wisdom on the
mind-body relationship. Indeed, the concept of realization, particularly
that of multiple realization, is well-entrenched in the articulation, explanation, and defense of nonreductionist forms of physicalism. Yet perhaps
the most sustained discussion of realization itself, that of Jaegwon Kim,
102 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
advocates reductionism about the mind on the basis of what Kim thinks
is a proper understanding of the metaphysics of realization. The dissonance here derives in part from the neglect of the concept of realization
that I mentioned in the opening paragraph, a point that Terence Horgan
observed in a “state of the art” review of the concept of supervenience
for the journal Mind over a decade ago.2
In this respect, at least, the state of the art has changed only very
recently. My read on the current state of the art is that the standard
view of realization, shared by reductionists and nonreductionist alike, is
deeply flawed, and that there exists a general alternative to that view,
which accords a central place to the idea that realization is essentially
and irreducibly context sensitive.

3
3 a sketch of two views of realization
As a way of outlining the chief contrast between these two views of realization, I begin with a first approximation of what I take to be the standard
view of realization as used in the philosophy of mind. While there is a
recognition both of realization as the (two-place) relation that holds between mental and physical states, and of realizations as the physical states
that occupy the realizer place in this relation, it is the latter of these that
has been the focus of discussion. Intrinsic, physical states of individuals –
more particularly, of the central nervous systems of individuals – are the
physical realizations of an individual’s mental states, and these realizers
are metaphysically sufficient for the presence of the states they realize.

This is what makes realization a metaphysically robust relation simultaneously suitable and problematic for underwriting an account of mental
causation: Suitable because metaphysical sufficiency would seem to have
the strength to underwrite an account of mental causation; and problematic because, so-construed, physical realizer states, themselves being physical, seem to leave no room for distinctly mental causation. Thus, while
the intuitions about psychological explanations generated by the PutnamBurge thought experiments that we recounted in Chapter 4 may indicate
ways in which our concept of the mental is sensitive to beyond-the-head
factors, such as the nature of the physical environment or facts about one’s
social location, a proper understanding of the metaphysics of realization
points one to an individualistic or internalist view of mental states.

By contrast, the view of realization that I shall propose in this chapter,
and articulate and defend at greater length in the next, takes the contextsensitive character of mental states to be inherent to their nature, since
realization itself is a context-sensitive notion. More poignantly, the claim
at the core of the standard view of realization – that realizers are metaphysically sufficient for the properties or states that they realize – drives
one to this view. This presents those adopting the standard notion of realization with a dilemma: Either give up or soften this claim of sufficiency
(but at the expense of a range of further physicalist claims), or admit that
realization, and so the metaphysics of the mental, is ineliminably context
sensitive. Either way, some widely held physicalist views need to be revised
or rejected.

In the next section, I offer a more rounded characterization of the
standard view of realization that brings out more explicitly two theses at
the heart of that view. This will make my chief objection to the standard
view easy to state and set the scene for an exploration of some contextsensitive alternatives to it.

4 the standard view (i): realizers as
metaphysically sufficient
A widespread view amongst physicalists in the philosophy of mind, whatever their other differences, is that realizers satisfy what I shall call the
metaphysical sufficiency thesis:
Metaphysical Sufficiency Thesis: Realizers are metaphysically sufficient for the
properties or states they realize.

I want to say something about why this thesis is implicit in standard
conceptions of realization, particularly those used in the philosophy of
mind.4
One reason is historical. As materialists came to be influenced by the
way in which the computer metaphor suggested that mental states were
multiply realized in physical states, rather than strictly identical to those
states, the claim that physical states were metaphysically necessary and
sufficient for particular mental states, appropriate when considering an
identity theory, was weakened to one of sufficiency only.

A second reason is that many statements of what it means for mental
states to be realized by physical states presuppose or imply this claim. For
example, it is common to think of realization as a relation of determination (of mental states by physical states), and the sufficiency thesis is at
least a necessary condition for such determination. Also, in explaining
the one-many relationship between mental and physical states allowed
by the notion of multiple realization, it is common to point out not only
104 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
that this is not to be confused with the claim that there is a many-one relationship between mental and physical states, but that such a possibility
would call physicalism itself into question. This possibility, that of emergent realization, that is, of a physical realizer for a given mental property
that could realize some other mental property were the world different
in various ways, is precisely what is ruled out by the sufficiency thesis,
because such realizations would not in and of themselves determine the
properties they realize.

A third reason is that the sufficiency thesis is needed to make sense of
many of the positions that physicalists have adopted and the arguments
they have offered in support of them. An intuition at the core of physicalism is that all the relevant physical facts fix all the nonphysical facts,
and the notions of supervenience and realization have both been used
to articulate this intuition further. Supervenience, in all its varieties, is
itself a relation of determination, and if one thinks of realization as a
correlative notion, then it too must be determinative. (Alternatively, if
one holds that the physical realization of a given property is typically a
subset of the subvenient base properties, realizations are, at most, partial
determinants of the properties they realize, a view I return to discuss in
Chapter 6.) And as already bruited above, the sufficiency thesis not only
seems necessary for reductively identifying mental and physical states in
views such as Kim’s, but it also generates the recent wave of what Jerry
Fodor calls epiphobia among nonreductionists – epiphobia being the
fear that one is becoming an epiphenomenalist.

5 the standard view (ii): realizers as
physically constitutive
Kim’s own reductionism about the mind is also guided by a second thesis,
one at least implicitly shared by many others, including Richard Boyd,
David Lewis, and Sydney Shoemaker. I shall call this thesis the physical
constitutivity thesis:
Physical Constitutivity Thesis: Realizers of states and properties are exhaustively
physically constituted by the intrinsic, physical states of the individual whose states
or properties they are.

I understand this thesis broadly such that stronger and weaker versions
of it could be articulated in terms of the notions of supervenience, typeidentity, or token-identity. In the philosophy of psychology, this thesis
might be thought to have its methodological counterpart in the popular
endorsement of the idea that homuncular functionalism and functional
analysis involve the decomposition of psychological capacities into their
constituent capacities, a claim we will have reason to consider more carefully later.5
Since physical realizations have been claimed to provide a metaphysical and explanatory basis for the higher-level properties they realize,
it is not surprising that these links between functionalism, realization,
and constitution structure (or perhaps derive from) a broader physicalist metaphysics, one that accords microstructure a central role. As Kim
says, speaking in the first instance of our common sense conception of
chemical kinds, but clearly with a more general view in mind:
... many important properties of minerals, we think, are supervenient on, and
explainable in terms of, their microstructure, and chemical kinds constitute a microstructural taxonomy that is explanatorily rich and powerful. Microstructure
is important, in short, because macrophysical properties of substances are determined by microstructure. These ideas make up our ‘metaphysics’ of microdetermination for properties of minerals and other substances, a background of partly
empirical and partly metaphysical assumptions that regulate our inductive and
explanatory practices.

As Kim says a little later,“[t]o have a physical realization is to be physically
grounded and explainable in terms of the processes at an underlying
level.” Such a view is also manifest in Kim’s one-time enthusiasm for the
prospects of understanding “mind-body supervenience as an instance of
mereological supervenience,” that is, the supervenience of wholes on
their parts.6
6 smallism, the standard view,
and the fragile sciences
In Chapter 1, I claimed that smallism, discrimination in favor of the small,
lurked in the background of contemporary individualism and nativism.

The constitutivity thesis is certainly smallist, but it might well be thought
that its influence is quite limited. After all, recall that “realization” is a
term of art with its contemporary origin in a specific literature – that
of Turing machine functionalism in the philosophy of mind. However,
I want to suggest that an explicit appeal to or an implicit reliance on
that concept and thus on the sufficiency and constitutivity theses can
also be found in a range of positions in the fragile sciences, and thus
the reach of the standard view of realization is significantly broader than
one might think. Consider two such positions that are related to issues
106 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
first discussed in Chapter 1 in exploring the relationship between various
forms of individualism and nativism.

One such position concerns the status of collectives in the social sciences. It is common to hold that social-level entities, such as electorates,
institutions, practices and rituals, and their properties are, in some sense,
nothing over and above the individuals who are involved in them and
their properties. Although this relationship has seldom been expressed
in terms of the standard notion of realization, that concept would seem
ideal to capture the “nothing over and above” aspect to that relationship:
Individuals physically constitute social-level entities, and having the individuals and their particular properties is metaphysically sufficient to
have social-level entities and their corresponding properties. Consider
an electorate that is in the process of voting in a new government. That
electorate is physically realized at that time by a given number of individuals, and by a certain majority of those individuals voting for the opposition
party the electorate is thereby in the process of voting in a new government. Nothing more than these mundane individual-level facts is needed
for this to be true. Nonreductionists and reductionists about collectives
disagree about what this realization relation implies about social ontology. As we saw in Chapter 1, methodological individualists in the social
sciences hold that the relevant properties of individuals are psychological and that this has methodological implications for how to do social
science.

A quite distinct arena in which there is likewise an implicit reliance
on the conjunction of the constitutivity and sufficiency thesis is developmental biology in which genes are held to be both physically constituted
and metaphysically determined by particular DNA sequences. The claim
about the physical constitution of genes in general – they are strings of
DNA – is one of the triumphs of twentieth-century biology. That particular sequences of DNA are held to be metaphysically sufficient for the
presence of a given gene underlies not only comparative molecular phylogenetic inferences that identify the same (or, as it is typically put, a
homologous) gene across organisms belonging to two different species
or other cladistic groups, but also the robustness of the appeal to DNA
sequences in talking of the “gene for” a given phenotypic trait. Thus, it
would make sense of key aspects of how genes are conceptualized in genetics and developmental biology to say that they are realized in sequences
of DNA, even if that is not how biologists have in fact put the matter. In
fact, I shall argue later in this chapter that talk of realization has quite
general application within the biological sciences.

While I think that it is the constitutivity thesis that is problematic in
talk of the realization of mental states, my general challenge is to the conjunction of the sufficiency and constitutivity theses for at least a variety of
properties and states, including not only mental properties and states but
those from across the fragile sciences. Context can feature in an account
of realization in a number of ways, but feature it must, and I see no way of
adequately representing the role of context in such an account that does
not undermine either the sufficiency thesis or the constitutivity thesis. A
bald statement of my chief objection to the standard view of realization
is that the sufficiency and constitutivity theses are typically not true of
the same putative realizers. Often the realizations that are metaphysically
sufficient for the properties they realize are not exclusively physical constituents of individuals with those properties. Conversely, sometimes the
physical constitution of an individual with a given property is not metaphysically sufficient for that property to be present. Mental properties
are no exception here.

Physicalists who understand realization as a relation of metaphysical
determination, as most do, should embrace the idea that at least some
states and properties, including mental states and properties, have realizers that extend beyond the individual instantiating them. States and
properties that have what I shall call a wide realization are prevalent in
both common-sense thinking and in the biological and social sciences.

Perhaps because there has been no general framework for such a view of
realization, this view has not been explicitly endorsed in the literature on
mental properties, although it is the view of realization that makes most
direct metaphysical sense of the widespread recognition that a range
of mental properties are not individualistic, and a view that externalists
should readily agree with. This advocacy of wide realizations represents
one way of developing a context-sensitive notion of realization.

There are initially less striking ways in which realization is context
sensitive, however, and I shall discuss two of them next.

7 context-sensitive realization
and metaphysical sufficiency
As a way of introducing the idea that realization is context sensitive, consider the mental state of pain and the Ur-example of its realizer, C-fiber
stimulation. As Sydney Shoemaker has pointed out, C-fiber stimulation
is, at best, a partial realization of pain. What Shoemaker calls a corerealization of that mental state is the specific part of the central nervous system
108 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
most readily identified as playing a crucial, causal role in producing or
sustaining the experience of pain. But when an individual is in pain other
parts of her central nervous system are also activated, and the activity of
these parts is crucial for C-fiber stimulation to play the causal role that is,
according to functionalists, definitive of pain.7
In general, the physical states that are partial realizations of a property or state will be metaphysically context sensitive in that they will realize
that property or state only given their location in some broader physical
system. Considered just in themselves, they do not satisfy the sufficiency
thesis. Additionally, in the special case of the core realization of a property, conceived of as the most salient part of some larger system in which
that property is instantiated, we have an epistemic dimension to the context sensitivity of the realization. What we find of greatest causal salience
depends on our conceptual and perceptual abilities. It also depends on
the questions we ask, the background information we have, and, more
generally, our epistemic orientation.

The context sensitivity of partial and core realizations should be uncontroversial, but might be thought of as having little relevance here
because such realizations do not and have never been claimed to satisfy
the sufficiency thesis. Even if core realizations of a property are what
we most readily call to mind in thinking of the realization of that property, there are more complete physical states of which core realizations
are a part that do satisfy the sufficiency thesis. Any interesting contextsensitivity thesis about realization should apply to them, not simply to
core or other partial realizations. Following Shoemaker, we might define
a total realization of a property as just such a state of a system.

By talking of a given higher-level property, P, and the system, S, in
which P is realized, we can characterize the general distinction between
core and total realizations as follows:
(a) core realization of P: a state of the specific part of S that is most
readily identifiable as playing a crucial causal role in producing or
sustaining P
(b) total realization of P: a state of S, containing any given core realization as a proper part, that is metaphysically sufficient for P
In particular cases, “S” is to be replaced by the appropriate system,
whether it be psychological, biological, economic, computational, chemical, and so on, and their more determinate forms. In the case of pain,
the appropriate system is the nociceptive system, containing mechanical
and polymodal nociceptors in the skin (muscles and viscera), myelinated
and unmyelinated axons (the latter being the famed C-fibers), spinal
neurons, parts of the brainstem and thalamus, and the somatosensory
area of the cerebral cortex. More generally, while P is a property of some
individual entity, such as an organism, S need not be identical to that
entity but, as in the example of pain, may form a part of it. Paradigms
of such systems are those in which bodily functions and their associated
properties are realized – for example, the respiratory system, the digestive
system, the circulatory system – that are a part of each creature with the
respective properties. Total realizations of P are exhaustively constituted
by a core realization of P plus what I will refer to as the noncore part of the
total realization.

While total realizations are in some sense complete states of S, they
are incomplete in two important respects. First, the distinctness of S and
the subject or bearer of P entails that total realizations do not include all
states of those subjects or bearers, for not all states a subject or bearer
is in form part of the system specified. For example, a person’s having
a toenail of two centimeters, while a property of that person, is not a
property of that person’s digestive or respiratory systems; “x has a toenail
of two centimeters” expresses a property of persons, not of digestive or
respiratory systems. Second, the total realization of P excludes the background conditions that are necessary for there to be the appropriate,
functioning system. While these may themselves be necessary for a given
entity to have P, since they are not states of S, they are no part of the total
realization of P. Thus, total realizations should be distinguished from the
broader circumstances in which they occur.

To illustrate these points, consider the mammalian circulatory system,
which is made up of various parts – such as the heart, arteries, capillaries, arterioles, venules, and blood. Various states of these parts, considered together, determine what circulatory properties one has at any
given time. Related common sense and medical theories about circulation specify what the circulatory system includes and excludes, but it is
clearly a (proper) part of an organism. For a given circulatory property –
say blood pressure – not all parts are of equal causal importance. From an
intuitive point of view, one’s blood pressure is most saliently determined
by the condition of one’s heart and arteries. Thus, the core realization
of, say, having blood pressure of 120/80 would be identified with a state
of these parts of the circulatory system – for example, having clogged
arteries and a strong heart. Yet such states do not by themselves and independent of the state of the rest of the circulatory system guarantee
blood pressure of 120/80 in a person. Rather, they need to be located
110 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
in a certain way within the rest of the person’s circulatory system. A total
realization of having blood pressure of 120/80 is a state of the circulatory system, including the states of having clogged arteries and a strong
heart, that determines the presence of that property. Excluded from total realizations are both properties instantiated by the individual that are
not properties of the circulatory system at all (such as her having brown
hair, or being six feet tall), as well as broader features of the individual’s
environment that are necessary for her to have a functioning circulatory
system (such as there being oxygen in the environment and the world’s
persistence through time). Such background conditions are no part of
the total realization of the corresponding property since they are not
properties of the circulatory system at all.

Since the distinctness between a total realization and background conditions is important for the general alternative to the standard view of realization that I want to present, consider one other way of coming to this
distinction. Consider our common sense view of circulation and how we
would expect it to be modified by the findings of circulatory physiologists.

While we would expect physiologists to offer a more precise specification
of both the core and total realizations of the properties of this system, we
wouldn’t expect them to contribute much to our understanding of the
nature of the background conditions of these realizations. (For this, they
defer to other scientists, or to common sense.) In investigating a given
biological system, scientists examine both the core and noncore parts
of a total realization, but the boundaries of the system to a large extent
delineate the boundaries of their inquiry.

Strictly speaking then, it is only the physical states constituting a total
realization together with the appropriate background conditions that metaphysically suffice for P. Our paradigms for the relevant systems are functioning, integrated physical systems, and without the appropriate background
conditions in each case there would be no such systems. This might be
taken to suggest that even total realizations, considered simply as complex
configurations of physical matter and energy, are metaphysically context
sensitive in much the way that partial realizations are.

Let us catch our breath. In this section I have identified two types
of realization that violate the sufficiency thesis and pointed to ways in
which realizations are context sensitive. First, core realizations in and
of themselves are not metaphysically sufficient for the properties they
realize, but must be part of some larger functional system. This point is
of some significance because even if no one really believes the sufficiency
thesis to be true of core realizations, it is physical structures that in fact
are core realizations – such as C-fiber firings – that are typically invoked
in discussions of reductionism, realization, and functionalism. This is
especially true in discussions of mental states. By the end of this chapter
I hope to have made a prima facie case that this is also true of the sorts
of example, those of genes in developmental biology and collectives in
the social sciences, that I mentioned in the previous section. Second,
since total realizations are physical states of larger functional systems, and
there are background conditions necessary for their functioning, strictly
speaking even total realizations themselves do not satisfy the sufficiency
thesis. The significance of these points will unfold over the next few
sections.

8 physical constitutivity and wide realizations
Thus far, I have assumed the constitutivity thesis and thus individualistic realizations, having used that assumption to challenge the sufficiency
thesis. That thesis was challenged as a global view of realizations in two
ways by realizations that are context sensitive: Core realizations are both
metaphysically and epistemically context sensitive, and in presupposing
background conditions necessary for the existence and functioning of
the corresponding system, total realizations are metaphysically context
sensitive. I turn now to the constitutivity thesis and how it is undermined
by a more far-reaching type of context sensitivity. Here the sufficiency thesis will be my ally, and I shall return to focus initially on mental properties
in particular.

I begin by elaborating on my claim, made in section 5, that homuncular functionalism is often construed as a methodological counterpart to
the constitutivity thesis. The idea of the prevalent strategy of homuncular decomposition in cognitive science is to explain complex, intelligent,
representational capacities by functionally analyzing them into simpler
(but typically more numerous) capacities, and then reapplying this first
step recursively until we have simple abilities that require neither representation nor intelligence. If each homuncular level of analysis provides
a realization of the level above it, and realizations satisfy the constitutivity
thesis, then any view of homuncular functionalism that purports to be a
physicalist view should proceed via physical decomposition.8
The constitutivity thesis itself implies that realizations of mental properties are individualistic, in that two molecularly identical individuals
must also share the same realizations of mental properties. And if realizations are determinative of the properties they realize, mental properties
112 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
must be individualistic, too. Indeed, reflection on the relationship between the above bodily systems and the individuals to whom they belong
supports this as a general view of realizations: Because bodily systems are
parts of individuals, there is no way for molecularly identical individuals
to differ in the bodily systems that each has.

This general view overlooks, however, that there are two species of
total realizations, only one of which can be understood in terms of the
notion of constitution above. While it is often the case that S is a part
of the individual that has P, there are a variety of examples in which the
converse is true, examples in which the individual that has P is a part of S.

These are cases in which S extends beyond the boundary of the individual,
and I shall call the type of total realization that exists in such cases a wide
realization.

Let IB be the subject or individual bearer of P. In constitutive decomposition, of which homuncular functionalism is often construed as
a paradigm, S is a part of IB. By contrast, in cases of integrative synthesis
IB is a part of S; in these cases, P has total realizations that are wide. We
can summarize the distinction between wide and entity-bounded realizations in terms of the location of the noncore part of a total realization as
follows:
(c) entity-bounded realization: a total realization of P whose noncore
part is located entirely within IB, the individual who has P
(d) wide realization: a total realization of P whose noncore part is not
located entirely within IB, the individual who has P
Figure 5.1 provides a simplified depiction of the metaphysical parallels
between these two forms of realization, as well as of the differences between the corresponding strategies of constitutive decomposition and
S
B
Background
Conditions
(a)
S
Background
Conditions
B
(b)
figure 5.1. (a) Constitutive Decomposition. Involving Entity-Bounded Realization (b) Integrative Synthesis Involving Wide Realization. S = system B = bearer
integrative synthesis. As a species of total realization, wide realizations
satisfy the sufficiency thesis. Yet since they extend beyond the physical
boundary of the individual, they are not exhaustively constituted by the
intrinsic, physical properties of the individual subject, and so do not satisfy the constitutivity thesis.

The concept of a wide realization allows us to make metaphysical sense
of Putnam-Burge externalism introduced in the last chapter. On this view
the propositional attitudes are not individualistic, or they at least have
a nonindividualistic aspect. The propositional attitudes have a physical
total realization, albeit one that is not entity bounded. The realization
of particular folk psychological states is wide, and given the framework
I am proposing that entails that those states should be understood by
using integrative synthesis to locate their bearers in some broader system,
presumably one that involves social relations between individuals. I shall
call this our folk psychological system.

The width of our folk psychological system is not anomalous in
psychology; in fact, the strategy of integrative synthesis also applies readily
to computational psychology. Many computational systems that govern
cognition are themselves wide, where the computational system S extends
beyond the boundary of IB, the individual who bears the psychological
properties, and the appropriate type of total realization is a wide realization. I have previously argued that we should expect wide computational
systems of cognitive states just when there has been sustained mind-world
constancy over evolutionary time of the type that one finds in the case
of many perceptual and behavioral systems. Such systems include our
mechanisms for form perception and the navigational systems that ants
and bees deploy.9
This general view – that world-mind constancy creates the opportunity
for cognitive loads to be shifted from inside the head to beyond it – has
Principle – “know only as much as you need to know to get the job done” –
was postulated to explain informational off loading and exploitation by
organisms in an evolutionary context, and his more recent endorsement
of “the extended mind” has taken this perspective as implying that the
mind itself may include parts of the world beyond the individual. Likewise,
the cognitive scientist Edwin Hutchins views his study of navigation as a
socially distributed, embedded computational process to imply that the
computations performed during navigational tasks extend beyond the
boundary of the individual. I shall discuss wide computationalism and
these sorts of views of computation and cognition more generally and
114 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
in more detail in Chapter 7. My chief point here is that the invocation
of wide realizations is not an ad hoc ploy introduced simply in order
to add a supporting metaphysics to our externalist intuitions about folk
psychology.10
9 wide realizations in the biological
and social sciences
The further point that I do want to develop in some detail is that there
is nothing strange about mental states having wide realizations. In fact,
I think that wide realizations are typical across the fragile sciences,
at least if we assume a notion of realization that satisfies the suffi-
ciency thesis. The claim that wide realizations are ubiquitous in such
sciences should sound, at least prima facie, counterintuitive. But once
we make the connection between the metaphysics of realization and the
methodologies of constitutive decomposition and integrative synthesis,
this point becomes easier to understand. Let me begin with the biological
sciences.

A variety of evolutionary and ecological properties themselves have
wide realizations and are profitably understood through the strategy of
integrative synthesis, that is, by locating their bearers in the corresponding wide systems. Such properties include fitness, being highly specialized, and being a predator, properties of individual organisms or even
species; and properties of phenotypic traits or behaviors, such as being
an adaptation, a homology, or a spandrel.

Consider first the example perhaps closest to common sense, the property of being a predator. Predators play a certain role in an ecological system, occupy a particular ecological niche, that of preying on other living
things, typically (but not solely) for nourishment. This property is relational in at least two ways: An organism is a predator for certain other
living things (their prey), and in certain types of environments (their
ecosystem). Here the relevant system is the predator-prey system, whose
dynamics are captured, in part, by the Lotka-Volterra equations and is
explored in population ecology. While the part of this system most readily identifiable as playing a crucial causal role in producing or sustaining
the property of being a predator, that is, that property’s core realization,
might be thought to be contained within the organism that is a predator,
the total realization for this property is clearly wide. Since being a predator involves a relation between an organism and something beyond its organismic envelope, what is metaphysically sufficient for particular bodily
or behavioral phenotypes to be those of a predator extends beyond the
boundary of the individual.

The same is true of being highly specialized, the ability to occupy a relatively small number of the ecological niches available. Although we can
and do speak of certain organisms as realizing this property by virtue of
having specific intrinsic properties, at best these states or properties of
individual organisms are core realizations for that property, and the corresponding total realizations include physical configurations in a system
that extends beyond the individuals who are highly specialized, that is,
the total realizations are wide. In the case of being highly specialized, the
relevant system is the ecosystem, this being the system in terms of which
ecological niches are defined.

Finally, an organism’s fitness is its propensity to survive and reproduce
in its environment. We can represent the former as a probability between
0 and 1 (the organism’s viability), and the latter as a number greater
than or equal to 0 (the organism’s fertility) where this number represents
the organism’s expected number of offspring. In either case, although
fitness is a dispositional property of individual organisms (or even whole
species), this disposition is not individualistic, since physically identical
organisms may differ in fitness because they have been or are located in
different environments. That is, the numbers that represent viability and
fertility may vary solely because of an organism’s environmental location.

This relational aspect to the property of fitness is often masked by the
fact that an organism’s environment usually plays (in effect) the role of a
constant in many of the contexts in which the concept of fitness is put to
work. Yet the properties “has a probability of surviving of 0.7” and “has
an expected number of offspring of 2.2” are incompletely specified in
a way that makes them meaningless without an implicit reference to an
environment. What metaphysically suffices for a given organism to have
a specific level of fitness is not instantiated entirely in that organism: The
total realization of fitness (and its determinate forms) is wide, not entity
bounded. Here the relevant wide system is the organism plus something
like its niche, broadly construed to include its location within a particular
population structure and other relational aspects of its existence.

The same general point is true of the total realizations of properties of
phenotypic traits or behaviors. What makes a trait or behavior an adaptation, for example, is something about its evolutionary history, not just
something about the individual who has the trait or exhibits the behavior.

Whatever we want to say about their core realizations, their total realizations are not individualistic. There are ontological and not just epistemic
116 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
reasons why you can’t tell whether, say, the presence of wings in a given
species is an adaptation or a spandrel simply by inspecting existing members of that species. These examples show that total realizations do not
always satisfy the constitutivity thesis; they also exemplify the pattern of
integrative synthesis depicted in Figure 5.1b.

To this point I have been discussing wide realizations whose core part
is located within an individual. One might well wonder whether a realization could be wide in that not only does its noncore part extend
beyond the individual but so too does its core part. I shall call this type of
wide realization a radically wide realization:
(e) radically wide realization: a wide realization whose core part is not
located entirely within IB, the individual who has P
The clearest examples of radically wide realizations are those of social
actions that involve engaging with the world and have further social and
institutional background conditions. And so we move from the biological
to the social sciences in thinking about the full range of the applicability
of the notion of wide realization in the fragile sciences.

Consider actions such as making a withdrawal from a bank, committing
a felony, or voting, each of which we might do by signing a piece of paper
in certain circumstances. Here, not only the noncore part of the total
realization extends beyond the individual agent, but so too does the most
natural candidate for the core realization of these actions, signing a piece
of paper. This is an action of an individual, as are the actions that it in
turn realizes, even though the action extends beyond the boundary of
that individual. The relevant system explored via integrative synthesis –
whether it be the banking system, criminal justice system, or electoral
system – likewise extends beyond the boundary of the individual agent
and has its own background conditions.

The same is true of many of our ways of classifying agents in the social sciences. In economics, for example, individuals are homeowners,
consumers, and wage earners. Someone falls into one of these categories
by virtue of the relationship between what she does and has done, and
the legal, social, and economic institutions and practices to which she is
subject. An agent enters into verbal and written agreements, hands over
cash, or performs certain tasks. Since these actions or behaviors themselves, however, literally extend into the world beyond the individual,
their realizations do not stop at the skin. Behavior that stops at the skin –
the bodily movement that an agent makes – is not even a core realization
of the corresponding action.

10 two views reconsidered
This chapter has been more analytical in its style than those that have preceded it, and it may pay to step back from the thick of it all to see where
we are. In sections 7–9, I have proposed four ways in which physical realizations are context sensitive, the first and second of which challenge
the sufficiency thesis (section 7), and the third and fourth of which challenge the constitutivity thesis (sections 8 and 9). In section 8, I introduced
(ordinary) wide realizations, exemplified by intentional mental properties, whose noncore part extends beyond the boundary of the individual
who has those properties. What I called radically wide realizations in section 9 are wide realizations whose core part also extends beyond that
boundary, and I suggested that they were exemplified by social actions.

My more general point in these sections was that there are a range of
properties in the cognitive, biological, and social sciences that have wide
rather than entity-bounded realizations.

Those who would like to salvage the standard view of realization can
shuffle where they locate the particular examples I have introduced in this
four-fold schema. But since the sufficiency and constitutivity theses are
jointly satisfied in none of the four forms of context-sensitive realization,
there will remain a problem for the standard view, no matter how much
shuffling is done.

On the standard view, realizations are metaphysically determinative of
the properties they realize and physically constitutive of the individuals
who possess those properties. On the alternative, context-sensitive view,
realizations are located within systems, and those systems in turn are located within broader environments. The context-sensitive view allows that
the standard view is correct about some properties and their realizations –
what I called entity-bounded realizations in section 8 – but insists that
there is a wide variety of properties that involve another form of context
sensitivity, that of wide realization. In effect, the context-sensitive view
implies that there is an individualistic bias within the standard view, one
that not only ignores the perhaps innocuous context sensitivity of both
core and total realizations, but that overlooks or denies the possibility of
wide realizations altogether.

I have been arguing that there is a sort of tension within the standard
view. For what metaphysically determines the presence of a property often extends beyond the boundary of the individual who has that property. And, conversely, the physical constituents of the individual bearing
a given property are often contributory or partial realizers rather than
118 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
metaphysically determinative realizers of that property. In advocating the
endorsement of wide realizations, I have, in effect, embraced the suffi-
ciency thesis over the constitutivity thesis.

With this in mind, let us return to reconsider the relationship between
realization and appeals to neural correlates, mechanisms, and localizations within the cognitive sciences. Just as realizations are assumed to be
entity bounded on the standard view, psychologists and cognitive neuroscientists typically think of neural mechanisms as entity bounded, and so
have an individualistic view of these. Given the tension within the standard view of realization, it seems clear that cognitive scientists themselves
would likely opt for the constitutivity over the sufficiency thesis. If that is
so, however, then this represents a significant break from the physicalist
orthodoxy that “the physical” determines “the mental.”
Whatever psychologists and cognitive neuroscientists think about rejecting the metaphysical sufficiency thesis, it is a view deeply embedded
within the philosophy of mind. First, the view of realization as a determinative relation is one that reductionists such as Jaegwon Kim have readily
drawn on in arguing that nonreductionists occupy an unstable position;
this view is not likely to be seen by such reductionists as merely optional.

Second, while this view of realization can be seen as just one of a cluster of
intuitions, it is central to understanding the cluster as a whole. For example, it connects the notion of realization with that of supervenience in an
intuitive way by treating them as correlative notions; it explains the sense
in which realizers provide a metaphysical basis for what they realize; and
it allows us to make sense of the idea that mental properties are “nothing
over and above” their realizations. This should make us wary of simply
dropping the sufficiency thesis. To settle, in effect, for partial realizations,
such as core realizations, as the metaphysical substrate to the mind that
best corresponds to what cognitive scientists mean in talking of the neural
correlates, mechanisms, and localizations for cognitive capacities would
require a softening in how physicalism is to be understood.

The context-sensitive view suggests another option, one that both preserves this determination thesis in some cases and brackets consideration
of it in others. While some cognitive capacities and the mechanisms that
realize them have an entity-bounded realization, others merely have neural correlates, or are partially realized in specific regions of the brain. The
context-sensitive view of realization goes hand in hand with a contextsensitive view of mechanisms. Neural mechanisms, like neural realizations, are always located within cognitive systems, and I have argued
that cognitive systems sometimes extend beyond the boundary of the
individual property bearer. When they do, the mechanisms are wide in
that they are individuated by reference to this system.

By identifying a range of properties across the cognitive, biological,
and social sciences to which the context-sensitive view seems to naturally
apply, I have made a start on articulating that view and perhaps shown its
promise. I have thus far, however, done little by way of really defending
the context-sensitive view of realization. That is the task of Chapter 6.

6
Context-Sensitive Realizations
1 adjusting one’s metaphysics
The argument of Chapter 5 provides a prima facie motivation for further
exploring the context-sensitive view of realization. In this chapter, these
explorations are of three kinds. Together they constitute a philosophical
defense of the context-sensitive view.

The first concerns context-sensitive realizations and physicalism. Physicalism has been formulated both as a view of the mind-body relation
and as a more encompassing metaphysical position, and one of the aims
of the next three sections is to show what the context-sensitive view of
realization implies about both of these forms of physicalism. Although
there are forms of physicalism in the philosophy of mind that allow for
the possibility that minds have nonphysical realizations, it remains true
that the expression “physical realization” would be regarded by many as
containing a redundancy. There are, so far as I know, no developed proposals for just how the mind would be “realized in” nonphysical stuff.

Given this, it is important to show that the context-sensitive view of realization preserves robust forms of physicalism, even if, as I shall argue, it
requires either giving up or revising several strands to physicalist thought.

In this regard, in sections 2–4, I shall discuss, respectively, the thesis of
microphysical determinism, the nature of dispositions, and nonreductive
materialism.

The second kind of exploration considers modifications to the standard view of realization that address its putative shortcomings as a general
view of realization. One general suspicion often directed at so-called novel
views is that their putative insights can be captured within the framework
120
of existing views. Being clear about the overall metaphysical package that
the context-sensitive view brings with it is one way to dissipate such suspicions, or at least to shift the burden of proof to those who harbor them.

In section 5, I shall examine a version of the standard view that ascribes a
key role to background conditions without buying into the full range of
context-sensitive realizations advocated within the context-sensitive view.

Here it will be useful to introduce an analogy to the place of background
conditions in discussions of causation, both in articulating the modified
standard view and in revealing its shortcomings relative to the contextsensitive view. In section 6, I examine several other attempts to encompass some form of context sensitivity within the framework provided by
the standard view. If the argument of these sections is correct, then the
context-sensitive view offers a richer metaphysical package than do these
variations on the standard view.

Finally, I shall conclude this exploration of the context-sensitive view
by tacking to the other side, responding to claims that taking the contextsensitive view seriously requires adjustments in our conception of minds,
individuals, and the relationship between them that are considerably
more radical than those I have entertained thus far. Those who both
are sympathetic to the context-sensitive view and think that it marks an
important departure from business as usual in a materialist metaphysics
of mind might well think that my own remarks in this chapter and the
last are unduly conservative or restrictive. If mental states have wide realizations, for example, why think that we can (or would want to) hold
onto realism about the mind, or restrict ourselves to viewing subjectivity
as attaching to individuals at all? I shall take up these sorts of question in
sections 7–9.

2 microphysical determinism, relations, and smallism
In the previous chapter, I said that the fragile sciences often traffic in
properties that have a wide realization, and that when they do the corresponding methodology of integrative synthesis is appropriate. These
sciences often investigate the relational properties of individuals, and
what (totally) realizes such properties is not contained within the boundary of those individuals. Thus, an adequate account of the metaphysics of
realization must move beyond the standard view with its exclusive focus
on entity-bounded realizations and the constitutivity thesis.

We could express this criticism of the standard view by saying that
it manifests a form of smallism, discrimination in favor of the small, in
122 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
directing us always to what constitutes individuals, rather than what they in
turn constitute. Indeed, the problem that relational properties and kinds
I identified as a general problem for smallist views in metaphysics. Since
the standard view has been developed as part of a physicalist view of the
mind, and the problem that I claim exists is quite general, we should
consider the resources that physicalists have to address it.

A common expression of physicalism says that all facts, properties,
events, processes, states, and entities supervene on the totality of physical
facts, properties, and so on. This is to say that there is some or other
physical base set of facts, properties, and so on for any fact, property,
and so on. It is a short step from here to gloss physicalism as the view that
there are physical realizations for all of the facts, properties, and so on that
there are. Given that both supervenience and realization are relations of
metaphysical determination that, so to speak, run in opposite directions –
from realizations and to supervening properties – we might be tempted
to think of these two metaphysical notions as getting at much the same
idea. If that is so, then our short step is very short indeed, perhaps just
that of logical closure.

Physicalism, thus, is a kind of thesis of metaphysical determination:
The physical determines the rest. Microphysical determinism is a more
specific form of physical determinism, one more directly relevant to assessing smallist metaphysical views. It is the general view that the properties of microphysical entities metaphysically determine all the properties
there are. Consider two forms of microphysical determinism that, in different ways, attempt to accommodate relational properties.

The first of these Paul Teller has called local physicalism and particularism. It holds that the microphysical properties of any given entity, plus
the microphysical properties of all those entities to which it is related,
determine all of the properties it has, including its relational properties.

Suppose that Tom has a mass of 100 kg and Susan has a mass of 80 kg,
and so Tom has the relational property of being heavier than Susan,
and stands in the relation “is heavier than” to Susan. On the particularist version of microphysical determinism, this relational property of
Tom’s, and the corresponding relation between Tom and Susan is determined by Tom’s microphysical properties and Susan’s microphysical
properties. What particularism preserves from corpuscularianism is the
idea that an individual thing’s intrinsic properties determine its place in
the causal nexus. The relational properties of that individual thing are
determined not simply by its intrinsic properties, but by those together
with the intrinsic properties of the object(s) to which it is related. For
the particularist, it is still the intrinsic properties of individual things that
realize all the properties that there are. There are several problems that
particularism faces.1
First, it suggests a general strategy for understanding relational properties that presupposes that they can always be viewed in terms of relations to particular objects. Certainly, many relational properties in science can be so understood. But many of the examples I provided in
the last chapter invoke relational properties that lack this feature, and
this points to the difficulty of assimilating all relational properties and
kinds to particularism. For example, thinking about water, having a specific level of evolutionary fitness, and being a homeowner are relational
properties, but not ones that simply involve relations between the bearer
of the property and one or more particular objects. Rather, they are
relational in presupposing the location of the bearer of the property
in some larger system or environment: in a certain linguistic community, in an (usually, the actual) environment, in a society with certain
kinds of institutions and practices. An individual’s intrinsic properties
do not determine whether it has any of these relational properties. Simply adding to these the intrinsic properties of other individuals (and
which individuals?) does not lead to a realization base for these relational
properties.

Second, since particularism is a form of microphysical determinism,
then not any old intrinsic property serves as the ultimate realizer for
all the properties that there are, but just those intrinsic properties that
very small things have. Thus, as well as having to show how all relational
properties are determined as are quantitative comparative properties,
particularism must also show how all of the intrinsic properties of the not
so small are realized by just the intrinsic properties of the smaller things
that constitute them. But this seems false even at the chemical level,
let alone at “higher” levels. For example, salt is physically composed of
sodium and chlorine. Yet its having the chemical composition that it does,
and the intrinsic properties it has, is not realized simply by the intrinsic
properties of sodium and the intrinsic properties of chlorine, but those
together with the realizing sodium and chlorine standing in a certain
relation to one another (in particular, having a certain spatial relation to
one another). Likewise, organism-level properties that we might think of
as intrinsic, such as running speed or bodily musculature, are not simply
realized by the intrinsic properties of organism parts, but by those plus
how those parts are put together.

124 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
This second problem suggests a natural revision to particularism.

Rather than try, as does particularism, to maintain that there is a sense
in which the relational properties of individual things can be reduced
to intrinsic properties, instead consider relations themselves as ontologically basic. Call such a view relational microphysicalism. This form of microphysicalism plays up the fact that when we turn to physics itself we
find a range of relations: from states of entanglement in quantum mechanics, to space-time separation in relativity theory, to velocity in good
old Newtonian mechanics. Since such relations occur within physics –
indeed, within microphysics – the idea is to take them, together with the
intrinsic properties of the physically very small, as what realizes all other
properties and relations. Relational microphysicalism thus abandons the
putative asymmetry between intrinsic and relational properties, but as a
form of smallism maintains the asymmetry between the small and the not
so small.

David Lewis’s endorsement of the thesis of Humean supervenience
expresses a form of relational microphysicalism. In the preface to the
second volume of his collected papers, he expresses this doctrine as
holding that
all there is to the world is a vast mosaic of local matters of particular fact, just one
little thing and then another . . . we have local qualities: perfectly natural intrinsic
properties which need nothing bigger than a point at which to be instantiated.

For short: we have an arrangement of qualities. And that is all.2
Lewis’s references to mosaics and arrangements suggest relational microphysicalism rather than particularism.

Relational microphysicalism avoids the second problem facing particularism, but still faces the first problem, that of accounting for relational
properties that do not involve relations between objectlike relata. In addition, while it countenances relations, it is only those relations that, in
the first instance, hold between the smallest objects there are. Relational
microphysicalism is aggregative about what there is in the world in that
any composite entity, C, and its properties, are realized by its physical constituents, A and B, their properties, together with the relations between
A and B. Yet C’s relational properties will not be realized by A, B, and the
relations between them. So quite apart from relational properties that do
not involve objectlike relata, and even granting that relational microphysicalism is true of an object’s intrinsic properties, provided that aggregated
individuals have some relational properties, relational microphysicalism
remains unable to account for all there is.

3 dispositions and science
Many properties in the physical sciences are dispositional: They are tendencies that the objects that have them manifest in certain circumstances
or under certain conditions. While the manifestation of dispositional
properties may require those circumstances or conditions to obtain, what
is often called the categorical base of the disposition surely does not: The
base is intrinsic to the bearer of the disposition. Given this popular view
of dispositions, one might develop several lines of argument that indicate
that there is something mistaken about the context-sensitive view of realization. For example: Because dispositions are intrinsic and important
in the physical sciences, in trafficking in unanalyzed relational properties the fragile sciences lose their mooring from physicalism. Or: Because
we can understand the role of “context” in making sense of dispositions
without abandoning the idea that intrinsic properties are ontologically
basic in some sense, we can preserve the asymmetry between intrinsic
and relational properties, or between the small and the not so small,
that I have used the context-sensitive view of realization to challenge. Or:
Even if there is a sense in which some properties have a wide realization (manifestation), there is a deeper sense in which they must have an
entity-bounded realization (base).3
These lines of argument could, no doubt, be filled in. But my aim
here, in part, is to suggest that to do so will be in vain, for the view of
dispositions on which they rest is problematic for much the reason that
the standard view of realization is problematic. Many of the dispositional
properties in the physical sciences are themselves relational.

Consider dispositional properties in chemistry, such as acidity and miscibility. Whether a given liquid is acidic or miscible, whether it has those
properties, is metaphysically determined by more than facts about its constitution. This is because these dispositional properties are dispositions
to have certain effects on other chemical substances and kinds, and so
whether they have those dispositions – not just whether they manifest
these dispositions – is determined by facts about those other substances.

The very presence of the disposition, not just its manifestation, involves
the physical configuration of the world beyond the bearer of the disposition. These dispositional properties have a wide physical realization.

This point is reflected in standard definitions of an acid – for example, as a proton donor, or as an electron-pair acceptor. For whether a
substance with a given physical structure has the disposition to donate
protons or to accept electron pairs depends on facts about the broader
126 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
chemical system in which that substance exists. If just these facts were
different, a liquid that is actually an acid could lose this disposition, and
could do so even were its chemical composition to remain unchanged.

While successive concepts of an acid – from that of Arrhenius, to those of
Bronsted and Lowry and Lewis – characterize an acid in what we might
think of as increasingly “purely” dispositional terms, that is, in ways that
increasingly abstract away from the environment, all of these concepts
make either explicit or implicit reference to the character of solvents
and bases which lie beyond the boundary of the thing that is an acid.

Whether, say, hydrogen chloride has the disposition to donate a proton
when placed in water depends not only on the intrinsic chemical character of HCl, but also on that of H2O and the relative strengths of the
forces governing their interaction. A physical duplicate of a substance
that is acidic in the actual world may not be acidic in a world where the
facts about solvents and chemical forces are different, even once we hold
fixed the facts about other physical forces as “background conditions.”
In this respect, acidity is like fitness or any of the other examples I have
cited from the fragile sciences. The salience of the fact that the core realization of acidity is individualistic should not obscure our view of what
metaphysically determines the presence of the disposition itself.4
This requires endorsing that at least some dispositions, including some
dispositions in the physical sciences, are extrinsic or wide: Whether something has the disposition is not determined by that thing’s physical constitution. Jennifer McKitrick has recently provided a range of commonsense examples of extrinsic dispositions – the power to open a door,
weight, the disposition to dissolve the contents of my pocket, vulnerability, visibility, and recognizability – and defended this idea against the
predominant view of dispositions as essentially intrinsic. Some of the
examples that I provided in Chapter 5, such as fitness and folk psychological states, are often understood as dispositional properties within the
fragile sciences, and if they are relational, as I have argued, then they
must be wide dispositional properties. In fact, such wide dispositions are
widespread across the sciences, including acidity, miscibility, and solubility in the chemical sciences; conductivity, heat sensitivity, and rigidity
in the electronic and engineering sciences; and trustworthiness, fertility,
and stability in the cognitive, biological, and social sciences.5
Part of my point here is to preempt a series of connected ideas concerning dispositional properties and the nature of science: that an appeal to dispositional properties provides refuge for the standard view
of realization and the asymmetry that it posits between intrinsic and
table 6.1 Realization in Psychology, Biology, and Chemistry
Psychological Biological Chemical
P being in pain being a predator being acidic
S nociceptive system predator-prey system system of acids and
bases
IB person animal liquid solution
core R certain level of
activity in C-fibers
having sharp claws having an empty
electron shell
total R CR plus states of rest
of nociceptive
system (thalamus,
somatosensory
cortex, etc.)
CR plus properties of
rest of IB and prey
that, together with
IB, constitutes the
predator-prey
system (e.g., speed
of IB, body of prey)
CR plus properties
of rest of IB plus
those of solvents
and bases that,
together with IB,
constitute the
acid-base system
BCs
(holding
of world
beyond S)
conditions of rest of
the nervous
system of IB and
IB’s other bodily
systems
conditions of the
ecological
environment
occupied by S, e.g.,
terrain, seasonal
conditions
conditions of the
physical world
more generally,
e.g., particular
value of gravity
on Earth, laws of
nature
relational properties; that“real dispositions”in the fundamental sciences
are intrinsic; that the ubiquity of relational properties in the fragile sciences casts them under some sort of metaphysical shadow dissipated by
the light of the physical sciences. But part of my point is to extend the
reach of the context-sensitive view of realization and the framework that
I introduced in articulating it. To this end, Table 6.1 shows the parallels
between psychological, biological, and chemical examples that I have discussed within this framework. As this table shows, both entity-bounded
and wide realizations can be readily represented within this framework.

The symmetry between the two, I want to suggest, implies the irrelevance
of the boundary of the individual as a constraint on what counts as a
realization of a given property.

Relational properties permeate the fragile sciences, and we should
thus expect wide realization and the strategy of integrative synthesis to
be the norm across those sciences. While entity-bounded realization and
constitutive decomposition are certainly predominant in the physical
sciences, there is also a range of properties in these sciences that are,
like those in the fragile sciences, implicitly relational, including many
128 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
dispositional properties. Such properties and kinds have wide realizations. This is one more reason to be skeptical of the idea that there is anything metaphysically distinctive or suspicious about the fragile sciences,
or about the nature of relational properties and kinds.

Having examined aspects of physicalism in general in light of the
context-sensitive view of realization, let us return to focus on physicalism about the mind in particular. Rejecting the constitutivity thesis in
the standard view most obviously requires giving up reductive physicalist
views of the mind. But this also has perhaps less obvious implications for
nonreductive materialism.

4 nonreductive materialism
The conflict between the sufficiency and constitutivity theses provides a
novel way of expressing a long-acknowledged tension between externalism and reductive forms of physicalism in the philosophy of mind. Yet it
also points to largely unrecognized inadequacies in a number of ways of
expressing nonreductive materialism. Those expressions have also relied
on the standard view of realization.

Nonreductive materialism has sometimes been formulated in terms of
the acceptance of a “token-token” identity thesis or via a compositional
view of realization. Consider each view in turn and what our discussion
thus far implies about it.6
The token identity theory claims that tokens of mental and physical
states may be identical even if types of mental and physical states are
not identical, where the relevant physical states are intrinsic states of the
brain. Since such states are intrinsic, physical states of the individual,
the token identity theory, at least as usually articulated, presupposes the
constitutivity thesis. But our exploration of the varieties of realization
suggests that this thesis and the token identity theory are false for at least
many mental states. This is because the total realizations of a range of
mental states are wide and thus are not intrinsic states of the brain. At
most, it is the core realizations of mental and physical states that are
identical, but this does not help us identify mental and physical states.

Compositional views of realization, and thus physicalism, likewise take
the relevant composed entity to be the individual or her central nervous
system, and in so doing, rely on the constitutivity thesis. They thus face
the same problem that the token identity theory faces. In short, both of
these common expressions of nonreductive materialism have relied on
the standard view of realization. If either view allows the relevant tokens
or composed entity to be larger than the individual who instantiates the
corresponding mental properties, and so in effect gives up the constitutivity thesis, it must be revised in fairly significant ways: We are no longer
talking of token physical states of the brain, or compositional states of
individuals.

Nonreductionist forms of physicalism are also often expressed in terms
of there being “higher” and “lower” levels of explanation, the latter of
which provide a metaphysical but not a reductive basis for the former.

Whether we can adequately conceptualize mental states in general as being (totally) realized by “lower level” states seems to me doubtful. Those
articulating this idea further using a constitution-based conception of realization either will be hard pressed to maintain the view that realization
is determinative, or will, in effect, concede that lower levels do provide a
reductive base for higher levels. Neither option should be attractive to a
nonreductionist. To tackle the first horn of this dilemma would require
a fairly radical rethinking of the concept of realization, one that gives up
on the sufficiency thesis altogether. Tackling the second horn threatens to
locate the site of one’s nonreductionism solely within the realm of explanation, a threat exploited by Jaegwon Kim in his attacks on nonreductive
physicalism.7
We can make this point in another way and more positively. I said in
Chapter 5 that a constitution-based conception of realization appears to
provide the metaphysical grounding for the explanatory strategy of homuncular functionalism. In the language of higher and lower levels, this
is the idea that things and properties specified by lower-level homuncular descriptions physically constitute those specified by higher-level homuncular descriptions. If we grant that at least these latter things and
properties are often relationally individuated, this relation of constitution can be determinative only if the former things and properties are
likewise relationally individuated. This is to say that the things and properties specified by lower-level homuncular descriptions may be relationally
individuated. And if the relevant relations for the higher-level properties
extend beyond the boundary of the individual, so too must those for the
lower-level properties. So while there may be some sense in which lower
levels “constitute” higher levels, neither need be exhausted by the subject or bearer’s intrinsic, physical properties, that is, by those properties
usually taken to physically constitute an individual.

In effect, a homuncularly decompositional view that takes relational
individuation seriously entails rejecting a premise crucial to a smallist,
individualist view of the mind, a variation on the sufficiency thesis, viz.,
130 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
that the physical constitution of an individual metaphysically determines
what mental properties that individual has. There are metaphysical and
not merely pragmatic grounds for construing homuncular functionalism
as an externalist view, and proponents of homuncular functionalism need
to transcend their implicit reliance on the standard view of realization.

5 the modified standard view: causation
and realization
One might reasonably doubt whether the context-sensitive view is needed
to accommodate the ubiquity of relational properties and kinds in the
fragile sciences. Perhaps a view of realization embracing both the suffi-
ciency and constitutivity theses can be modified in ways that “take relational individuation”seriously. In this section I shall consider the idea that
a modified standard view can do so simply by acknowledging a greater
and more explicit role for background conditions than the standard view
itself has.

Central to the standard view is the intuition that total realizations themselves always satisfy the constitutivity thesis. Even if ascribing any property to an entity, including mental properties, presupposes that certain
beyond-the-individual background conditions hold, realizations themselves do not extend into the world beyond the individual. That is, all
total realizations are in fact entity bounded, and we should not mistake
some of these background conditions for (parts of) the realization itself. Putative examples of wide and radically wide realizations should be
reinterpreted within the parameters of the standard view, modified to
acknowledge just the first two forms of context-sensitive realization that
I identified in Chapter 5: That of core realizations, which are realizations only insofar as they are part of a total realization, and the context
sensitivity of total realizations to background conditions. On this modi-
fied standard view, realizations are entity bounded and the background
conditions necessary for the realization of a given property may be more
extensive than initially envisaged.

We can support the modified standard view by drawing a parallel between how we should think about realization and how we often think
about causation. We talk of Sarah’s carelessly discarding an unfinished
cigarette as the cause of the bushfire even though we recognize that this
event is not itself sufficient to bring about that effect. It does so only
given that a variety of conditions are in place: that it not rain, that the
cigarette make contact with combustible material, that the cigarette is not
extinguished before it ignites that material, and so on. This distinction
between causes and conditions is commonplace in theories of causation,
but it provides little reason, one might argue, for viewing causes as either
“wide” or “radically wide.” It is Sarah’s action itself that is the cause, this
event here and now. Likewise, one might think, for realizers.

I shall return to the analogy to causation in a moment, but let us consider the modified standard view itself. Of critical importance is how well
that view allows us to make sense of the full range of properties and kinds
posited across the various sciences, as well as those found in our commonsense discourse. Both social actions and mental states pose problems here,
and suggest that utilizing only an entity-bounded notion of realization,
together with background conditions, requires abandoning some central
intuitions about realization.

Most problematic are social actions, which not only have political, economic, and legal background conditions but also literally extend into the
world beyond the individual who enacts them. For these actions, such as
signing a check, even what I have been calling their core realizations do
not stop at the skin. On the modified standard view, realizations must
be entity-bounded, and so the realization of the action of (say) signing
a check can appeal to holding a pen and writing on paper only as background conditions for the realization of the action. Yet these are things
that the agent herself does, part of the action itself, not (like other background conditions) merely general features of the social and institutional
environment in which she acts, and this distinction is ignored within the
modified standard view. The real problem here is that viewing something
like the bodily movements of the agent as the total realization of her
signing a check is to collapse the distinction between total and core realizations. In effect, it is to accept that the realization of the action is not
determinative of the action, and so give up the sufficiency thesis. Thus,
this is not a view that modifies the standard view, but abandons it.

There is a fundamental, general problem for the modified standard
view here. Treating total realizations as core realizations makes them
not simply metaphysically context sensitive but also epistemically context
sensitive. That is, what counts as the realization for any given property
or kind depends on us. On the modified standard view, any part of the
world that is a physical constituent of the bearer of the property or kind
can be the realization of that property. All that needs to be done is simply to assign the state of the remainder of that individual to the set of
132 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
background conditions that, together with that physical constituent, are
metaphysically sufficient for the property or kind. In the case of signing
the check, we could push further back into the body (in fact, all the way
to the brain) in identifying the realization of that action, provided that
we make a corresponding addition to our set of background conditions.

Thus, on the modified standard view there is no mind-independent way
to specify the realization for any given property or kind.

Consider another example that illustrates the general problem here.

Any psychological state, such as being in pain, involves the firing of thousands if not millions of neurons. In a given case, which of these is the
realization of the pain? On the modified standard view, a single neuron
firing in my head at a given time could realize this state, provided that we
specify the remaining neural firings as part of the background conditions
for that single neuron’s firing to metaphysically suffice for the individual
to be in pain. To put it the other way around, on the modified standard
view there is no answer to the question of what the realization of a given
psychological state is that is independent of our decision of how extensive to make the corresponding background conditions. This constitutes
a reductio of the modified standard view.

We can return to the analogy to causation to diagnose what has gone
wrong here. Causes have the effects they do only given the presence of
certain conditions. If one has only the distinction between causes and
the conditions that necessitate their effects, then the arbitrariness of the
distinction between cause and condition lead one to consider the individuation of some events as causes and others as conditions as dependent
on us. Essentially, this is the situation that the modified standard view of
realization is faced with.8
On the context-sensitive view that I have introduced, background conditions are necessary for there to be a functioning system that (totally)
realizes an individual’s properties. To be a realist about properties, and so
about mental properties, is to be a realist about at least their total realizations, and thus about the systems with respect to which total realizations
are defined. Thus, the distinction between background conditions and
noncore parts of total realizations is required by the realism implicit
in the view I have defended (see also section 7). We simply don’t get
to decide where to draw the line between realization and background
conditions, and in particular it is not simply up to us to decide that
the realizations must be entity bounded, or where within an individual they begin and end. Given that the systems in terms of which realizations are characterized are robust entities either that form parts of
individuals or that individuals form a part of, background conditions have
a more restricted role to play than this modification of the standard view
suggests.

In terms of the analogy to causation, this is something like introducing
the notion of a causal chain between that of cause and condition. Causes
form causal chains, and these causal chains have their effects only given
the existence of certain other conditions. When we single out some event
as the cause of another, we imply that it is the most salient part of that
causal chain, and that without the remainder of that causal chain linking
cause and effect, “the cause” would be no cause at all. But it is also true
that without further supporting conditions, even the whole causal chain
would not produce that effect. What distinguishes causal chains from
the conditions against which they bring about their effects is a further
issue. But the parallel between two trichotomies – between cause, causal
chain, and conditions; and core realization, system (total realization),
and background conditions – is useful in understanding why one needs
to go beyond the resources of the modified standard view of realization.

6 context sensitivity within the standard view
Several physicalist proposals that can be viewed as sympathetic to the
standard view have acknowledged the role of context in the metaphysics
of mind, and in this section I shall consider whether they adequately accommodate the sort of context sensitivity introduced in Chapter 5. These
proposals are Terry Horgan’s idea of regional supervenience, and Denis
Walsh’s more recent defense of a view he calls wide content individualism
or alternative individualism.

While neither of these proposals focus on the notion of realization per
se, both views can be construed as attempts to provide a role for context
that maintain some version of the constitutivity thesis about realizations.

Their shortfalls qua modifications of the standard view are my concern
here.

Terry Horgan introduced a thesis of supervenience that he later christened regional supervenience:
There are no two P-regions [spatio-temporal regions of a physically possible
world] that are exactly alike in all qualitative intrinsic physical features but different in some other qualitative intrinsic features.9
Regional supervenience was introduced to account for what Horgan
calls an individual’s context-dependent properties. Horgan’s examples
134 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
include being president of the United States, being a bank, and knowing
that Oscar Peterson is a jazz pianist. It does so by extending the subvenient
base to the spatio-temporal region that contains that individual so as to
include the relevant contextual factors in that base.

If we were to consider this as extending the realization base beyond the
individual, we would have something like a wide realization (though note
that I have defined these in terms of entitylike systems, rather than spatiotemporal regions). But this, of course, would be to give up the constitutivity thesis. Horgan himself thinks that the realizers for such properties
are typically narrower than the corresponding subvenient base, suggesting that he views realizations as satisfying the constitutivity thesis. Such a
view, however, can claim only that realizations, together with the larger
spatio-temporal region of which they are a part, determine the properties they realize, giving us realizers that by themselves do not satisfy the
sufficiency thesis. What satisfies the sufficiency thesis is the regional supervenience base, but clearly that does not satisfy the constitutivity thesis.

In short, I think that we see here something like the tension between the
two halves of the standard view of realization, with what metaphysically
determines the presence of a property in an individual being something
more than what is bounded by that individual.

This argument can be reexpressed as follows. Consider the constitutivity thesis reformulated with respect to the entire region, rather than
the individual in that region who has the properties:
regional physical constitutivity thesis: Realizers of states and properties are exhaustively physically constituted by the intrinsic, physical states of the region
containing the individual whose states or properties they are.

The metaphysical sufficiency thesis and the regional physical constitutivity thesis are jointly satisfiable. But since the latter thesis explicitly requires
going beyond the boundary of the individual property bearer in order
to specify what determines that property, realization on this view is not
entity bounded.

Denis Walsh’s chief aim is to articulate a position that resolves what he
calls the antinomy of individuation: that combining the plausible claim
that thoughts of the same psychological kind have the same (wide) contents with individualism entails the implausible conclusion that“thoughts
which are instances of the same physiological kind have the same wide
contents.” Walsh’s solution to the antinomy is to reformulate each of
these three claims so as to make explicit the way in which psychological
states are context sensitive. These three principles, which together he
calls wide content individualism, are:
(1) Necessarily, if individuals have thoughts of the same psychological
kinds with respect to a context, then their thoughts have the same
(context-sensitive) content with respect to that context.

(2) Necessarily, states of the same physiological kind which share a
context realize states of the same psychological kind with respect
to that shared context.

(3) Necessarily, states of the same physiological kind which share a
context realize thoughts with the same content with respect to that
context.

As in the original antinomy of individuation, (1) and (2) entail (3), but
(3), Walsh suggests, is true.10
(2) implies that identical intrinsic, physical states of individuals in the
same context realize the same psychological states with respect to that
context, while (3) spells out this implication for the special case of intentional psychological states. While Walsh suggests that this is a way of
reconciling wide content with individualism, consider (2) and especially
(3) in light of the constitutivity and sufficiency theses and my argument
thus far. In effect, (3) says that if you take realizers that satisfy the constitutivity thesis and fix their context you have realizations of intentional
states with the same content. Yet, as the conjunction here makes clear,
the realizers that satisfy the constitutivity thesis themselves satisfy the suf-
ficiency thesis with respect to intentional states only in conjunction with
their context. Thus, we lack any one realizer that satisfies both theses.

This is precisely the problem that we identified with Horgan’s regional
supervenience thesis considered as an attempt to develop the standard
view of realization in a way that accounts for the context sensitivity of
mental states.

Furthermore, since Walsh’s view invokes a relatively unconstrained
notion of context, it would seem subject to a variation on the single neuron objection that I introduced in section 5. Walsh says that he thinks
of a context “as corresponding to a set of properties of an individual’s
environment.” If we make the context rich enough – including, for example, properties that might normally be determined by an individual’s
internal, functional organization – then two identical single neurons
that realize the same physiological state (and so satisfy the constitutivity
thesis) could also realize the same psychological state relative to that context. But this does not so much provide us with a realization that also
satisfies the sufficiency thesis as indicate a problem with drawing on such
136 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
a notion of context as a way of saving the standard, entity-bounded view
of realization.11
Walsh’s defense of the view that he calls alternative individualism is also
an attempt to build context sensitivity into individualistic views in the
metaphysics of mind and science. At the heart of alternative individualism
is a context-sensitive version of the local supervenience thesis – that causal
powers supervene on the intrinsic, physical properties of individuals – that
serves as a premise in the argument from causal powers that we discussed
in Chapter 4. Walsh takes alternative individualism to preserve what is
right in that argument. The supervenience thesis that Walsh defends
claims that for all contexts, necessarily an object’s having a given contextsensitive, intrinsic property in a context fixes the psychological properties
it has in that context. We can express this succinctly in symbols, where
“γ” denotes a context,“Φ” an intrinsic, qualitative property, and “ ” the
psychological kinds that an individual, x, instantiates:
∀γ· ∀x(Φx, γ ⊃  x, γ).

Walsh’s claim here generalizes beyond psychology to scientific taxonomy
in general.12
The problem with this supervenience thesis, as with that of the orthodox individualist (which simply drops the contextual relativization) is that
there is a wide range of examples for which it simply does not hold. Two
organisms that were intrinsically identical in the very same context could
belong to different species because of ancestral, phylogenetic differences
between them; two viral infections in a person – and thus, I assume, in one
context – that give rise to identical symptoms and are treated by the same
regimen can be of different types because they are caused by different
viral agents. In both cases, the identity of consequences in a given context
(or even of intrinsic, qualitative properties) does not determine sameness
of scientific kind because the corresponding kinds are individuated, in
part, by causal antecedents, not causal consequences.

Recall that my basic criticism of the original argument from causal
powers was that it equivocates on “causal powers,” invoking a wider notion in one premise (individuation in science is by causal powers) and
a narrower notion in another (causal powers supervene on an individual’s intrinsic properties). Alternative individualism is an attempt to salvage both of these premises, but it too involves much the same equivocation, this time on context-sensitive causal powers. The fundamental
problem in all of these cases is brought out once one asks whether relational properties are, or are fixed by, such powers: They must be if the
premise about scientific individuation is to be true, but they can’t be if the
premise about supervenience is to be true. Alternative individualism, like
Walsh’s wide content individualism, is committed to causal powers (within
a context) subsuming relational properties – that is what allows these
modifications of individualism to be seemingly compatible with externalism about the mind – but this is precisely what calls into question whether
such powers are a subset of (or supervene on) an individual’s intrinsic
properties.

Considered in tandem, Horgan’s and Walsh’s views illustrate that the
basic tension in the standard view of realization between the constitutivity
and sufficiency theses is not easily relieved. Placing emphasis on the need
to move beyond the boundary of the individual subject in order to have a
determinative base for mental states, as Horgan’s regional supervenience
does, highlights the point that realizations satisfying the sufficiency thesis
do not themselves satisfy the constitutivity thesis. And emphasizing that
realizations that satisfy the constitutivity thesis determine mental states
only given a shared context, as Walsh’s (2) does, suggests, conversely, that
in at least some cases realizations that satisfy the constitutivity thesis do
not satisfy the sufficiency thesis.

Those willing to hum along to the tune of the context-sensitive view of
realization and entertain the idea that properties at least sometimes have
wide realizations might reasonably wonder whether the context-sensitive
view has more radical implications for how we think about the mind. I
want to take up one such putative implication in each of the next three
sections, beginning in each case with a question.13
7 keeping realism afloat
Why doesn’t the context-sensitive view lead to an irrealist position on
mental states? Consider the very idea of a physical state’s being “metaphysically sufficient” for a given mental state. We have seen that, strictly
speaking, metaphysical sufficiency requires both that some physical system be in a certain state (a total realization) and that certain background
conditions hold, thus making even total realizations metaphysically context sensitive. This view of total realizations underwrites the realism about
mental properties that I invoked at the end of section 5, a realism that
would be called into question if it could be shown that total realizations
are also epistemically context sensitive, as core realizations are.

In fact, we might well think that total realizations must be epistemically
context sensitive if the core realizations they contain as proper parts are.

138 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
A sufficient condition for an individual having a given mental state is that
there be a total realization of that state whose core part lies wholly or in
large part in that individual. But if that core realization is epistemically
context sensitive, then so too is that state itself, and mental states start to
sound more like merely ascribed states of individuals.

Moreover, it seems doubtful that there is any particular physical state
that is“the”total realization for a given property, for what we pick out as a
total realization will depend on what we count as part of the corresponding system and what counts as background conditions to it. Once one
“goes wide” about realization, as perhaps one should, we have a plurality
of ways of thinking about the underlying metaphysics, a pluralism that
suggests that we, rather than the world, are the source for how the distinctions between individual, system, and background conditions are drawn.

Thus, the context-sensitive view is faced with much the problem that we
posed for the modified standard view in section 5, and an externalist
metaphysics pushes us toward irrealism about mental states.

Reply: This irrealist challenge can be arrested. In the first place, epistemic context sensitivity is not simply inherited by total realizations from
their constituent core realizations. A total realization of P could have
been defined simply as a state of S that is metaphysically sufficient for
P, that is, by dropping the relative clause that refers to core realizations,
without significantly changing the view that I have defended. There can
be multiple total realizations not because there are multiple core realizations that are epistemically context sensitive, but because, given the
complexity of the sort of systems there are, there will at least typically be
many ways in which those systems can be arranged or instantiated, each
of which will metaphysically suffice for P.

Consider pain. The nociceptive system that realizes pain is complicated, and there are many states it can be in that would metaphysically suf-
fice for an individual organism to be in pain. Even given a particular core
realization of pain – say, as a particular instance of C-fiber stimulation –
there remain multiple total realizations for that core realization because there are various noncore parts of the realization that could
suffice for the mental state of pain, even though just one of these will, in
any given instance, form part of the total realization in that case.

As with the boundary of individuals, the line between what falls within
any given system (and so can be part of the total realization for any
properties it realizes) and the background conditions for its existence
and operation can be fuzzy. The individuation conditions for systems are
likely to be more coarse grained than for individuals, but in both cases
these are highly constrained by the physical facts. It is not simply up to us
to determine what constitutes a system or the system of relevance. Like
the individuals that they either constitute (in cases of entity-bounded realization) or that constitute them (in cases of wide realization), systems
have individuation conditions, and these depend only in minor ways on
our epistemic proclivities and fancies. Whether teeth or saliva form part
of the digestive system, or operate as background conditions for its operation, may be “up to us.” But the facts about how food is broken down
into energy and distributed within the body, and how waste products are
formed and removed from the body determine what, plus or minus a
bit, constitutes the digestive system. We discover, rather than invent, what
physically constitutes the digestive system; the same is true of cognitive
systems, whether they be entity bounded or wide.

Cases in which there are genuinely alternative systems which we could,
plausibly, identify as the locus of a given total realization are likely to
be rare. Again, focus on the physiological systems that are a paradigm
here. While it is logically and metaphysically possible that there be two or
more candidate systems for the realization of any biological function –
respiration, circulation, digestion, reproduction – the requisite complexity to each of these systems in practice makes it relatively unproblematic
to single out what “the” relevant system is for any given property. The
same is true of cognitive systems. As with any systematic theorizing, in science or elsewhere, this theorizing about both entity-bounded and wide
cognitive systems is subject to error, modification, and revision, but this
is not the sort of epistemic context sensitivity that would undermine a
realist view of the ascription of psychological states.

8 pluralism about realization
Why don’t all mental states have wide realizations? Suppose that we accept
the view that at least some mental states have wide realizations. Might we
replace the existential by the universal quantifier here, and suggest that
the moral of the story so far is that mental states have individualistic core
realizations but wide total realizations?
Reply: Given that social actions appear to have radically wide realizations, and the ways in which at least our common-sense conception of
the mind is linked to such actions via the idea of a reason for acting, we
might have pause about the latter of these two views. Here I want to make
some brief comments about the former claim, the idea that all mental
states might have wide realizations.

140 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
One natural thought in response to the claim that all mental states have
wide realizations is that mental properties typically denoted by monadic
predicates – such as pain – surely have entity-bounded realizations, since
their presence at a time or over a time interval is determined solely by
what is going on within the boundary of the individual who has the property. In fact, given that the nociceptive system is a proper part of an
individual organism, as I suggested earlier, this conclusion about pain
seems inescapable. More generally, there would seem to be a range of
mental states and processes that form part of entity-bounded systems:
Good candidates include fear, motor imagery, and haptic perception.14
It has been the working assumption of much traditional cognitive science, committed as it has been to individualism about the mind, that all
mental states and processes can be viewed in such a way, with the task
of cognitive science being to uncover what these entity-bounded systems
are. While I think that there is little reason to think that such a general
view of cognition can be sustained, my point here is that the individualistic view of at least some cognitive processes does seem correct. This
suggests a general conclusion – that whereas some of our mental states
have an entity-bounded realization, others have a wide realization.

It may be worth briefly pondering the more radical alternative that I
am somewhat casually rejecting here, that no psychological states actually have entity-bounded realizations. This would imply that the cognitive
sciences are radically mistaken, and supposing that many noncognitive,
biological systems are individualistic, suggests that there is a radical juncture between the cognitive and the biological. The scale and nature of
the error within the cognitive sciences would be akin to that which behaviorists charged introspectionists with in the first part of the twentieth
century: There simply aren’t the kinds of internal states (systems) that
such a psychology seeks. While I don’t say that it is impossible that the
cognitive sciences have gone awry so radically, it does seem that one
would want very strong reasons for thinking that the smallist metaphysics
on which they have relied is completely mistaken. It seems to me clear
where the burden of proof lies on this issue.

If some of our mental states do have entity-bounded realizations, while
others have wide realizations, then there is a respect in which the standard
way of characterizing (total) realizations via the Ramsey-Lewis method
for defining theoretical terms – a method commonly used to characterize functionalist views in the philosophy of mind – is both restricted
and misleading. Ramsey-Lewis sentences purport to represent complete
theories for a given domain and are constructed by conjoining all of the
truths specified by such theories; one derives the total realization for a
particular property or state by conjoining its core realization to the realization of complete theories for the domain. Here let us simply grant
that such a conception of folk and scientific theories is coherent and
a close enough approximation of the theories we have actually developed to model those theories usefully. Now, if some part of psychology
is wide, then since the total realization for a complete psychology will be
a wide realization, that for any particular psychological state will also be
wide. Given the wide nature of the propositional attitudes and at least
some subpersonal psychological states, the goal of characterizing a complete psychology implies that the total realizations of any psychological
state must be wide.15
If we follow Brute Intuition and our brief reflection on cognitive science, and insist that surely some psychological properties have entitybounded realizations, and thus accept my claim that not all psychological
properties are wide, the Ramsey-Lewis method appears to provide us with
no way to represent a significant distinction. The most obvious modification to the standard Ramsey-Lewis view – to attempt to define properties
like being in pain by reference to a theory of pain, and properties like
believing that p by a theory of belief – fails, because each of these theories will almost certainly mention terms from the other, and so will not
allow one to define properties with entity-bounded realizations. I leave
further exploration here to those more enamored with the Ramsey-Lewis
method than am I.

9 abandoning the subject?
Why aren’t subjects or bearers of mental states themselves wide? The characterization of wide realizations preserves the idea that properties with
such realizations are still properties of individual subjects. Thus, fitness
remains a property of individual organisms even though its realization is
wide. And my belief that Paris is the capital of France remains my belief
even though it has a wide realization. I think that this is also true even
in cases of radically wide realization, paradigmatically in those involving
social actions: Jane’s signing a check is her action because the core realization of that action is realized in large part (even if not wholly) by
something that she does, such as moving her pen-grasping hand over
a piece of paper. To my mind this is a desirable feature of my view of
142 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
mental properties in particular because it preserves what is right about
an individualistic view of subjectivity and in so doing readily allows for
both third- and first-person perspectives on the mind.

One might well challenge this aspect of my view as unnecessarily and
unjustifiably conservative. Unnecessarily, for once realization goes wide
surely we are on our way to undermining subjectivity and the misplaced
position of privilege that the individual subject has in our thinking about
the mind. And unjustifiably, since in at least some cases of wide realization, particularly those of radically wide realization, there is no nonarbitrary way to single out individuals as the subjects or “owners” of the
corresponding mental properties. If we have wide realizations of mental
states, and thus wide mental states, so too we should have “wide subjects”
of those states. Andy Clark and David Chalmers suggest something like
this view of the self as a consequence of their endorsement of what they
call “the extended mind,” a view that Clark has more recently applied in
his thinking about rationality and human intelligence.16
Reply: There may, of course, be interesting science fiction or other fanciful examples that pull our intuitions toward such radical conclusions,
but it is important not to lose sight of the fact that, at least in the world
that we actually inhabit, and being the creatures that we actually are,
there is a basis for marking out individuals as the subjects of properties,
even those properties with wide realizations. Individuals – and here, as
always, our paradigms are individual people and individual organisms –
are spatio-temporally bounded, relatively cohesive, unified entities that
are continuous across space and time. Recall that the possibility of wide
systems was modeled on the actuality of systems that formed part of such
individuals as exemplified by the variety of physiological systems theorized about in biology and medicine. While these narrow systems (for
example, the circulatory system) share some of the features that make
individuals metaphysically distinctive and certainly have their own properties, they are not themselves individuals, and it seems strained or at best
derivative to view them as the subjects of the sorts of properties that we
would intuitively ascribe to the individuals they constitute. For example,
the visual system and its parts can be lesioned, can have imbalances in levels of neurotransmitters, and have certain of its pathways blocked (either
experimentally or “in the wild”). But it is the individual who perceives,
who suffers from a visual agnosia, who experiences a hallucination. The
same is true of wide systems, and this provides a principled basis for ascribing mental properties in particular to individual subjects rather than
the wide systems of which those subjects are a part. In the actual world, it
is individuals who form and maintain beliefs, experience emotions, and
wonder about what will happen next, even if those individuals form part
of what I have called folk psychological systems.

10 putting our metaphysics to work
The chief goal in this chapter and the last has been to develop a metaphysics suitable for an externalist view of psychology. Importantly, the
argument here is not driven by a consideration of the special nature of
mental properties but, rather, by reflection on a range of properties from
the cognitive, biological, and social sciences.

Although the considerations here have been metaphysical, the externalist metaphysics developed is one with explicit ties to a strategy of explanation, integrative synthesis. The explanatory strategy of constitutive
decomposition is well entrenched in a range of physical sciences, and
philosophers of the cognitive sciences have been quick to point to ways
in which it can be and has been used with respect to cognitive capacities. Integrative synthesis, while not quite novel, has a patchier history,
particularly in the physical sciences. But again, if I am correct about the
significance of the notion of wide realization, then we should expect integrative synthesis to find a central place in the sciences, including the
fragile sciences.

In the following chapters we will see where all of this philosophical
footwork leads us. In the next chapter I consider externalist views of the
mind in action in the cognitive sciences, extending this to noncomputational approaches to cognition in Part Three.

7
Representation, Computation, and Cognitive Science
1 the cognitive science gesture
We saw in Chapter 4 that as individualism was coming under attack in the
late 1970s, it was also being defended by Jerry Fodor and Stephen Stich
as a view of the mind particularly apt for a genuinely scientific approach
to understanding cognition. In contrast to the original externalist papers
of Putnam and Burge, those in which methodological solipsism and the
principle of autonomy were introduced focused on the relevance of individualism for explanatory practice in cognitive science. They appealed to
the computational nature of cognition in arguing that cognitive science
should be individualistic, and for substantive conclusions about its scope
and methodology.

These early individualist arguments of Stich and Fodor invoked what
I shall call the cognitive science gesture. They primarily pointed to general
features of cognition and theory in cognitive science that, they claimed,
revealed their individualistic nature. Cognition was computational (and
computation was individualistic), or cognitive processing was mechanistic
(and such mechanisms were individualistic). Neither used a sustained,
detailed examination of particular theories and explanations in cognitive
science to argue that they were or must be individualistic. Instead, Fodor
and Stich were, at least initially, content with a more abstract, general
gesture toward features they took to be central to cognitive science.

The gesture toward the developing cognitive sciences in defending
individualism served both to motivate and to buttress more purely philosophical considerations in favor of individualism, such as appeals to functionalism, physicalism, and causal powers, and the idea that it was narrow
144
content that was truly explanatory of cognition. We have also seen how
the standard view of realization reinforced the idea that the metaphysics
of the mental pushed one to an individualistic view of the mind. Thus, a
happy confluence: A range of broadly accepted views of the place of the
mind in the world and empirical practice in our nascent sciences of the
mind both imply individualism about the mind. The rejection of individualism was to come both at the expense of an acceptable metaphysics
and at the cost of forgoing the prospects for a thoroughly naturalistic
treatment of the mind.

My chief aim in this chapter will be to undermine this view of the relationship between individualism and cognitive science. After outlining the
accepted view of individualism and the cognitive sciences in sections 2–3,
in sections 4–7 I turn to reshape the received wisdom here, using David
Marr’s celebrated theory of vision as a focus. At the core of my discussion are the notions of exploitative representation and wide computationalism.

With an alternative vision of representation and computation in hand, I
shall conclude by considering some recent examples within the cognitive
sciences that exemplify externalism in practice.

2 individualism in cognitive science
Although the cognitive science gesture is a gesture – rather than a solid
argument that appeals to empirical practice – it is not an empty gesture.

Even if the original arguments of Fodor and Stich did not win widespread
acceptance amongst philosophers, they struck a chord with psychologists,
linguists, and computer scientists. Indeed, the dominant research traditions in cognitive science have been at least implicitly individualistic.

Consider three expressions of individualism that bring out its attractions
for many cognitive scientists.

One attraction of individualism is its perceived connection to the representational theory of mind, which holds that we interact with the world
perceptually and behaviorally through internal mental representations of
how the world is (as the effects of perceiving) or how the world should be
(as instructions to act). Ray Jackendoff expresses the connection between
such a view and individualism when he says:
Whatever the nature of real reality, the way reality can look to us is determined
and constrained by the nature of our internal mental representations. ... Physical
stimuli (photons, sound waves, pressure on the skin, chemicals in the air, etc.) act
mechanically on sensory neurons. The sensory neurons, acting as transducers in
Pylyshyn’s (1984) sense, set up peripheral levels of representation such as retinal
146 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
arrays and whatever acoustic analysis the ear derives. In turn, the peripheral representations stimulate the construction of more central levels of representation,
leading eventually to the construction of representations in central formats such
as the 3D level model. ...

Jackendoff calls this view the “psychological” (versus philosophical) vision of cognition and its relation to the world. His central claim in this
paper is that only the psychological vision directs us to viable research programs in cognitive science. Provided that the appropriate, internal, representational states of the organism remain fixed, the organism’s more
peripheral causal involvement with its environment is irrelevant to cognition, since the only way in which such causal involvement can matter
to cognition is by altering the internal mental states that represent that
environment.1
Jackendoff’s skepticism about the “philosophical” vision parallels the
disdain for “philosophical” approaches to language that Noam Chomsky
has expressed in drawing the distinction between the “I-language” and the
“E-language,” and Chomsky’s insistence that only the former is suitable
as an object of scientific study. Chomsky takes a conception of language
as “internal,” “intentional,” or “individual,” as opposed to “external,”
“extensional,” or “social,” to be a condition of a serious, empirical investigation of language, to be what makes the question of language use
and acquisition a problem rather than a mystery. The I-language is the
generative procedure inside the individual that is causally responsible for
that individual’s linguistic output, and it is what linguists attempt to reconstruct when they postulate features of a universal grammar. Given
Chomsky’s nativism about language in particular and cognition more
generally, and in light of the relationship between strong nativism and
individualism that I argued for in Chapter 1, we could expect Chomsky
to be critical of externalist views of the mind. Indeed, in “Language and
Nature” Chomsky turns directly to the philosophical tradition of externalism, beginning with the Putnam-Burge thought experiments, to argue
for the poverty of the resulting conception of language and how it should
be studied, a critique extended in his New Horizons in the Study of Language
and Mind.

2
To take a third example of an individualistic perspective on cognition, consider this extract from the Foreword to Simon Baron-Cohen’s
Mindblindness, written by Leda Cosmides and John Tooby:
Although it is a modern truism to say that we live in culturally constructed worlds,
the thin surface of cultural construction is dwarfed by (and made possible by)
the deep underlying strata of evolved species-typical cognitive construction. We
inhabit mental worlds populated by the computational outputs of battalions of
evolved, specialized neural automata. They segment words out of a continual
auditory flow, they construct a world of local objects from edges and gradients
in our two-dimensional retinal arrays, they infer the purpose of a hook from its
shape, they recognize and make us feel the negative response of a conversational
partner from the roll of her eyes, they identify cooperative intentions among individuals from their joint attention and common emotional responses, and so on.3
While Cosmides and Tooby clearly do assign the environment of the
organism a role in the evolutionary history of species-typical capacities,
the cognitive capacities themselves are individualistic.

These individualistic conceptions of the mind ultimately shape the
direction of research within the cognitive sciences through their effect
on how central notions in the field are construed. The most central of
these are representation and computation.

3 mental representation as encoding
Underlying the visions of cognitive science exemplified by Jackendoff,
Chomsky, and Cosmides and Tooby are what I will call encoding views of
mental representation. Simply put, encoding views hold that to have a
mental representation, M, is for M to encode information about some
object, property, event, or state of affairs m. A well-known, protean version of the encoding view is the picture or copy theory of mind, where to
have a mental representation of m is to have a mental picture or image
of m in your head, where the picture is “of m” just because it looks like
m. A version of the encoding view more prevalent in cognitive science
and that builds more elaborately on the idea that cognitive processing
takes place in a sort of code is the language of thought hypothesis: To
have a mental representation of m is to have a token in your language of
thought, M, that stands for or refers to m. Unlike the copy theory of mental representation, on this view there need be no resemblance between
representation and represented, with the role that resemblance plays in
the picture theory being played by some putatively natural relation, such
as causation or teleology. At the time that the debate between individualists and externalists was being articulated, the language of thought
hypothesis laid some claim to be “the only game in town” for understanding mental representation and computation.

On either view, discrete mental representations encode information about particular aspects of the world. Existing in a code, mental
148 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
representations are governed by a kind of syntax that determines how basic units in the code can be manipulated, combined, and decomposed.

Thus, cognitive scientists can and should explore the properties of representations and the rules that govern their internal dynamics, rather than
the relationships that exist between organisms and environments.

There are two prima facie problems with encoding views of mental
representation. These problems constitute not so much knockdown arguments against such views as open the way to reconceptualize representation in ways amenable to externalist visions of cognition.

The first is that although there may have been a time at which encoding
views were the only game in town, over the last twenty years a number of
views of mental representation have been developed that break from the
encoding tradition. One of these is the notion of distributed representation. On this view of representation, what is in the head are not discrete
symbols, each encoding their own piece of information, but less contentladen nodes which, in combination with the connection strengths linking
them, collectively represent information about the world. A related alternative conception of representation is that of subsymbolic computation,
whereby the units over which the computations are defined, the representations, are not themselves symbols (that is, codes). Both of these
conceptions of representation were developed within a connectionist
framework, but they have a basis in dynamic approaches to cognition
more generally. What these views share is the idea of thinking about representation as fleeting, situated, dynamic, and interactive, and as such
they mark a departure from encoding views of representation.4
These alternatives to encoding views constitute an important break
in the grip that those views have had on how cognitive scientists have
conceptualized mental representation. (So much so, in fact, that they
were sometimes overenthusiastically characterized as dispensing with the
notion of representation altogether.) But as they have been developed
primarily within individualistic frameworks, they do not themselves constitute externalist views of representation. They reconceptualize the internal form and dynamics of mental representation, but do little by way
of viewing mental representation as, in some sense, essentially embodied
or embedded.5
The second problem for encoding views is that the medium for encoding is, by definition, some type of code, and codes themselves need
to be interpreted. By virtue of what is such interpretation performed?
Either by virtue of some other type of code – in which case we face the
same question again – or by virtue of some brute noninterpretative and so
noncoding process – in which case it is difficult to see what role the initial
appeal to codes (and thus interpretation) is doing. Thus, the appeal to
mental encoding either leads to a regress or it was not necessary in the
first place. This dilemma constitutes an objection to the use of the notion
of encoding in understanding mental representation in particular, rather
than representation in general, since in other cases one or the other of
these two horns can be grasped.

For example, consider public codes, such as communicated natural
language and Morse code. These are interpreted by people, with interpretation mediated by knowledge of the conventions governing those
codes. Since public codes are not self-interpreting, grasping the first horn
of the dilemma above to explain how public codes are interpreted is
unproblematic.

Alternatively, consider computational languages. These can be layered
on top of one another through compilation and translation, with the
most basic language, the machine language, engineered directly in the
circuitry of the machine. Although this combination of compilation and
engineering is sometimes taken as an analogue for how our language
of thought is instantiated in the head, note that while compilation does
involve encoding a higher-level language in a lower-level language, engineering does not. Electronic circuitry is not a code for machine languages
but an implementation of them. Thus, in this case we can grasp the second horn of the dilemma, but we do so by giving up the metaphor of
encoding.

One might object that this dilemma argument takes too literally what
is only an analogy between mental representations and codes. All that
cognitive scientists mean by mental representations are discrete, internal
structures that correspond to things in the world. It is these structures and
their properties, not objects in the world and their properties that cognitive processes are sensitive to. Things in the world drop out as irrelevant
for cognitive processing once the structures to which they correspond
are formed or activated, and it is for this reason that cognition is methodologically solipsistic.

This view can be expressed by saying that the process of mental representation is simply that of symbol formation, and that cognition is
symbol crunching. Mental representations are natural symbols in that
they are generated by brute causal relations between cognizers and
their worlds, and so unlike conventional symbols, such as those on road
signs and in written languages, they do not require interpretation to be
symbols.

150 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
I suspect that this softening of the parallel between mental representations and codes accurately captures what many cognitive scientists
(particularly psychologists) think is right about the language of thought
hypothesis. Such softening, however, raises or leaves open questions that
strict encoding views close off.

First, by placing more weight on mental representations as natural
symbols, it weakens the connection between mental representation and
computation, since computational symbols are conventional. If mental
representations are not, strictly speaking, codes but natural symbols, then
we need some account of the basis for not only how the symbols get
their original meaning, but for the syntax that governs their processing.

Fodor’s own view – that the symbols in the language of thought, concepts, are innate, as is the syntax of that language – is one answer to this
question, but one that very few cognitive scientists have been prepared to
swallow.6
Second, this softening also highlights the question of what is special
about mental representation. There are myriad causal dependencies between an organism’s internal structures and states of the world. Why are
those involving my perceptual apparatus and my mind symbolic, while
those that concern my digestive system or the state of tension in the muscles in my leg merely causal? Philosophical projects in “psychosemantics,”
such as informational semantics and teleosemantics, have inevitably appealed to other forms of representation in articulating their vision of
mental representation. The paradigm of these have been the internal
states of measuring instruments, such as thermostats and fuel gauges, in
the former case and the functioning and products of biological organs
and behaviors, such as the heart and the dance of bees, in the latter.

This deflationary naturalism about mental representation is no doubt a
good thing. But whether such views can be happily married to something
like encoding views of representation, or to an individualistic view of the
mind, seems far from clear.7
4 the debate over marr’s theory of vision
Thus, individualism receives some support from the computational and
representational theories of mind, and so from the cognitive science
community in which those theories have been influential. But I have also
indicated that the claim that a truly explanatory cognitive science will be
individualistic has an epistemic basis more like a gesture than a proof.

One way to substantiate this second view in light of the first is to turn to
examine the continuing philosophical debate over whether David Marr’s
celebrated theory of early vision is individualistic.

Marr’s theory occupies a special place in cognitive science as well as
in the individualism-externalism debate. Marr was trained in mathematics and theoretical neuroscience at Cambridge in the 1960s, and spent
most of the 1970s at both the AI Lab and the Department of Brain and
Cognitive Sciences at MIT before dying, tragically, of leukemia at the
age of thirty-five. His ability to draw on and contribute to neuroscience,
artificial intelligence, psychology, and philosophy exemplified cognitive
science at its best. Although many of the specific algorithms that Marr
and his colleagues proposed have been superceded by subsequent work in
the computational theory of vision, the sweep and systematicity of Marr’s
views, especially as laid out in Vision: A Computational Investigation into
the Human Representation and Processing of Visual Information, have given
their views continuing influence in the field. The importance of Marr’s
theory for the individualism-externalism debate can perhaps best be understood historically and in light of the cognitive science gesture made
by individualists in the late 1970s.8
In the final section of “Individualism and the Mental,” Burge had suggested that his thought experiments and the conclusion derived from
them – that mental content and thus mental states with content were
not individualistic – had implications for computational explanations
of cognition. These implications were twofold. First, purely computational accounts of the mind, construed individualistically, were inadequate. Second, insofar as such explanations did appeal to a notion of
mental content, they would fail to be individualistic. It is the latter of
these ideas that Burge pursued in “Individualism and Psychology,” in
which he argued, strikingly, that Marr’s theory of vision was not individualistic. This was the first attempt to explore in detail a widely respected
view within cognitive science vis-`a-vis the individualism issue, and it was
a crucial turning point in moving beyond the cognitive science gesture
toward a style of argument that really does utilize empirical practice in
cognitive science itself.9
What is called “Marr’s theory of vision” is an account of a range of processes in early or “low-level” vision that was developed by Marr and colleagues, such as Ellen Hildreth and Tomas Poggio, at the Massachusetts
Institute of Technology. These processes include stereopsis, the perception of motion, and shape and surface perception, and the approach is
explicitly computational. Marr’s Vision became the paradigm expression
of the approach, particularly for philosophers, something facilitated by
152 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
Marr’s comfortable blend of computational detail with broad-brushed,
programmatic statements of the perspective and implications of his approach to understanding vision. For example, in his first chapter, entitled
“The Philosophy and the Approach,” Marr recounts the realization that
represented a critical breakthrough in the methodology of the study of
vision, as follows:
The message was plain. There must exist an additional level of understanding
at which the character of the information-processing tasks carried out during
perception are analyzed and understood in a way that is independent of the
particular mechanisms and structures that implement them in our heads. This
was what was missing – the analysis of the problem as an information-processing
task. ... if the notion of different types of understanding is taken very seriously,
it allows the study of the information-processing basis of perception to be made
rigorous. It becomes possible, by separating explanations into different levels, to
make explicit statements about what is being computed and why and to construct theories stating that what is being computed is optimal in some sense or is
guaranteed to function correctly.10
Over the last twenty years, work on Marr’s theory of vision has continued,
extending to cover the processes constituting low-level vision more extensively. By and large, the philosophical literature on individualism that
appeals to Marr’s theory has been content to rely almost exclusively on
Marr’s Vision in interpreting the theory.

As the passage from Marr quoted above suggests, critical to the computational theory that Marr advocates is a recognition of the different
levels at which one can – indeed, for Marr, must – study vision. According to Marr, there are three levels of analysis to pursue in studying any
information-processing device. First, there is the level of the computational theory (hereafter, the computational level), which specifies the goal
of the computation, and at which the device itself is characterized in
abstract, formal terms as “mapping from one kind of information to another.” Second is the level of representation and algorithm (hereafter, the
algorithmic level), which selects a “representation for the input and output
and the algorithm to be used to transform one into the other.” And third
is the level of hardware implementation (hereafter, the implementational
level), which tells us how the representation and algorithm are realized
physically in an actual device.11
Philosophical discussions, like Marr’s own discussions, have been focused on the computational and algorithmic levels for vision, what Marr
himself characterizes, respectively, as the “what and why” and “how” questions about vision. As we will see, there is particular controversy over what
the computational level involves. In addition to the trichotomy of levels
at which an informational-processing analysis proceeds, there are two further interesting dimensions to Marr’s approach to vision that have not
been widely discussed in the philosophical literature. These add some
complexity not only to Marr’s theory, but also to the issue of how “computation” and “representation” are to be understood in it.

The first is the idea that visual computations are performed sequentially in stages of computational inference. Marr states that the overall
goal of the theory of vision is “to understand how descriptions of the
world may efficiently and reliably be obtained from images of it.” He
views the inferences from intensity changes in the retinal image to fullblown three-dimensional descriptions as proceeding via the construction
of a series of preliminary representations: the raw primal sketch, the full
primal sketch and the 2 1/2-D sketch. Call this the temporal dimension
to visual computation. The second idea is that visual processing is subject to modular design, and so particular aspects of the construction
of 3-D images – stereopsis, depth, motion, and so on – can be investigated in principle independently. Call this the modular dimension to visual
computation.12
A recognition of the temporal and modular dimensions to visual computation complicates any discussion of what “the” computational and
algorithmic levels for “the” process of vision are. Minimally, in identifying each of Marr’s three levels, we need first to fix at least the modular
dimension to vision in order to analyze a given visual process; and to fix
at least the temporal dimension in order to analyze a given visual computation. We will see how these points interact with the debate over Marr’s
theory shortly.

Burge’s argument that Marr’s theory is not individualistic is explicitly
and fully presented in the following extended passage:
(1) The theory is intentional. (2) The intentional primitives of the theory and
the information they carry are individuated by reference to contingently existing
physical items or conditions by which they are normally caused and to which they
normally apply. (3) So if these physical conditions and, possibly, attendant physical laws were regularly different, the information conveyed to the subject and the
intentional content of his or her visual representations would be different. (4) It
is not incoherent to conceive of relevantly different (say, optical) laws regularly
causing the same non-intentionally, individualistically individuated physical regularities in the subject’s eyes and nervous system. ... (5) In such a case (by (3)) the
individual’s visual representations would carry different information and have
different representational content, though the person’s whole non-intentional
physical history ... might remain the same. (6) Assuming that some perceptual
154 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
states are identified in the theory in terms of their informational or intentional
content, it follows that individualism is not true for the theory of vision.13
The second and third premise make specific claims about Marr’s theory
of vision, while the first premise, together with (4) and (5), indicate the
affinity between this argument and Burge’s original argument for individualism, cast in Twin Earth-like terms, that we discussed in Chapter 4.

Burge concentrates on defending (2)–(4), largely by an appeal to
the ways in which Marr appears to rely on “the structure of the real
world” in articulating both the computational and algorithmic levels for
vision. Marr certainly does make a number of appeals to this structure
throughout Vision. For example, he says
The purpose of these representations is to provide useful descriptions of aspects
of the real world. The structure of the real world therefore plays an important
role in determining both the nature of the representations that are used and the
nature of the processes that derive and maintain them. An important part of the
theoretical analysis is to make explicit the physical constraints and assumptions
that have been used in the design of the representations and processes...

And Marr does claim that the representational primitives in early vision
(such as “blobs, lines, edges, groups, and so forth”) “correspond to real
physical changes on the viewed surface.” Together these sorts of comments have been taken to support (2) and (3) in particular.14
Marr’s appeals to the “structure of the real world” do not themselves,
however, imply a commitment to externalism. For these remarks can be,
and have been, interpreted differently. Consider two alternative interpretations available to individualists.

The first is to see Marr as giving the real world a role to play only
in constructing what he calls the computational theory. Since vision is
a process for extracting information from the world in order to allow
the organism to act effectively in that world, clearly we need to know
something of the structure of the world in our account of what vision is
for, what it is that vision does, what function vision is designed to perform.

If this is correct, then it seems possible to argue that one does not need
to look beyond the head in constructing the theory of the representation
and algorithm. As it is at this level that visual states are taxonomized qua
the objects of computational mechanisms, Marr’s references to the “real
world” do not commit him to an externalist view of the taxonomy of visual
states and processes.

The second is to take these comments to suggest merely a heuristic role
for the structure of the real world, not only in developing a computational
taxonomy but also in the computational theory of vision more generally.

That is, turning to the beyond-the-head world is a useful shortcut for
understanding how vision works and the nature of visual states and computations. This heuristic is effective either in providing important background information that allows us to understand the representational
primitives and thus the earliest stages of the visual computation, or by
serving as an interpretative lens that allows us to construct a model of
computational processes in terms that are meaningful. Again, as with the
previous option, the beyond-the-head world plays only a peripheral role
within computational vision, even if Marr at times refers to it prominently
in outlining his theory.

Beyond questions of how to interpret Marr’s own comments, individualists have objected to Burge’s argument in two principal ways. First,
Gabriel Segal and Robert Matthews have both in effect denied (2), with
Segal arguing that these intentional primitives (such as edges and generalized cones) are better interpreted within the context of Marr’s theory
as individuated by their narrow content. Second, Frances Egan has more
strikingly denied (1), arguing that, qua computational theory, Marr’s theory is not intentional at all. Both objections are worth exploring in detail, particularly insofar as they highlight issues that remain contentious
in contemporary discussions. In fact, Marr’s theory raises more foundational questions than it solves about the nature of the mind and how we
should investigate it.15
5 segal and egan on computation and representation
Segal points out that there are two general interpretations available when
one seeks to ascribe intentional contents to the visual states of two individuals. First, one could follow Burge and interpret the content of a given
visual state in terms of what normally causes it. Thus, if it is a crack in a
surface that plays this role, then the content of the corresponding visual
state is “crack”; if it is a shadow in the environment that does so, then
the content of the visual state is “shadow.” This could be so even in the
case of doppelgangers ¨ , and so the visual states so individuated are not individualistic. But second and alternatively, one could offer a more liberal
interpretation of the content of the visual states in the two cases, one
which was neutral as to the cause of the state, and to which we might give
the name “crackdow” to indicate this neutrality. This content would be
shared by doppelangers ¨ , and so would be individualistic.

The crucial part of Segal’s argument is his case for preferring the second of these interpretations, and it is here that one would expect to find
an appeal to the specifics of Marr’s theory of vision. While some of Segal’s
156 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
arguments here do so appeal, Segal also introduces a number of quite
general considerations that have little to do with Marr’s theory in particular. For example, he points to the second interpretation as having economy on its side, thus appealing to considerations of simplicity, and says,
The best theoretical description will always be one in which the representations
fail to specify their extensions at a level that distinguishes the two sorts of distal
cause. It will always be better to suppose that the extension includes both sorts of
thing.16
Why always? Segal talks generally of the basic canons of good explanation
in support of his case against externalism, but as with the appeals to the nature of scientific explanation that turned on the idea that scientific taxonomy individuates by “causal powers” that we discussed in Chapter 4, here
we should be suspicious of the level of generality (and corresponding lack
of substantive detail) at which scientific practice is depicted. Like Burge’s
own appeal to the objectivity of perceptual representation in formulating a general argument for externalism, these sorts of a priori appeals
seem to me to represent gestural lapses entwined with the more interesting, substantive, empirical arguments over individualism in psychology.

When Segal does draw more explicitly on features of Marr’s theory, he
extracts three general points that are relevant for his argument that the
theory is individualistic: Each attribution of a representation requires a
bottom-up account, a top-down motivation, and is checked against behavioral evidence. Together these three points imply that positing representations in Marr’s theory does not come cheaply, and indeed is tightly
constrained by overall task demands and methods. The first suggests that
any higher-level representations posited by the theory must be derived
from lower-level input representations; the second that all posited representations derive their motivation from their role in the overall perceptual process; and the third that “intentional contents are inferred from
discriminative behavior.”17
Segal uses the first assumption to argue that since the content of
the earliest representations (“up to and including zero-crossings”) in
doppelgangers ¨ are the same, there is a prima facie case that downstream,
higher-level representations must be the same, unless a top-down motivation can be given for positing a difference. But because we are considering
doppelgangers ¨ , there is no behavioral evidence that could be used to diagnose a representational difference between the two (Segal’s third point),
and so no top-down motivation is available. As he says, “[t]here would
just be no theoretical point in invoking the two contents [of the twins],
where one would do. For there would be no theoretical purpose served
by distinguishing between the contents.”18
How might an externalist resist this challenging argument? Three different tacks suggest themselves, each of which grants less to Segal than
that which precedes it.

First, one could concede the three points that Segal extracts from his
reading of Marr, together with his claim that the lowest levels of representation are individualistic, but question the significance of this. Here one
could agree that the gray arrays with which Marr’s theory begins do, in a
sense, represent light intensity values, and that zero-crossings do, in that
same sense, represent a sudden change in the light intensity. But these
are both merely representations of some state of the retina, not of the
world, and it should be no surprise that such intraorganismic representations have narrow content. Moreover, the depth of the intentionality or
“aboutness” of such representations might be called into question precisely because they don’t involve any causal relation that extends beyond
the head. They might be thought to be representational in much the way
that my growling stomach represents my current state of hunger. However, once we move to downstream processes, processes that are later on in
the temporal dimension to visual processing, genuinely robust representational primitives come in to play, primitives like “edge” and “generalized
cone.” And the contents of states deploying these primitives, one might
claim, as representations of a state of the world, metaphysically depend
on what they correspond to in the world, and so are not individualistic.

The plausibility of this response to Segal turns on both the strength of
the distinction between a weaker and a stronger sense of“representation”
in Marr’s theory, and the claim that we need the stronger sense to have
states that are representational in some philosophically interesting sense.

Second, and more radically, one could allow that all of the representational primitives posited in the theory represent in the same sense, but
challenge the claim that the content of any of the corresponding states is
narrow: it is wide content all the way out, if you like. The idea that the representational content of states deploying gray arrays and zero-crossings is
in fact wide might itself take its cue from Segal’s second point – that representations require a top-down motivation – for it is by reflecting on the
point of the overall process of constructing reliable, three-dimensional
images of a three-dimensional visual world that we can see that even early
retinal representations must be representations of states and conditions
in the world. This view would of necessity go beyond Marr’s theory itself,
which is explicitly concerned only with the computational problem of
158 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
how we infer three-dimensional images from impoverished retinal information. But it would be very much in the spirit of what we can think of
as a Gibsonian aspect to Marr’s theory.

Third, and least compromisingly, one could reject one or more of
Segal’s three points about Marr’s theory or, rather, the significance that
Segal attaches to these points. Temporally later representations are derived from earlier representations, but this itself doesn’t tell us anything
about how to individuate the contents of either. Likewise, that Marr himself begins with low-level representations of the retinal image tells us little
about whether such representations are narrow or wide. Top-down motivations are needed to justify the postulation of representations, but since
there are a range of motivations within Marr’s theory concerning the
overall point of the process of three-dimensional vision, this also gives
us little guidance about whether the content of such representations is
narrow or wide. Behavioral evidence does play a role in diagnosing the
content of particular representations, but since Marr is not a behaviorist,
behavioral discrimination does not provide a litmus test for representational difference.19
This third response seems the most plausible to develop in detail, but
it also seems to me the one that also implies that there is likely to be
no definitive answer to the question of whether Marr’s theory employs
either a narrow or a wide notion of content, or both, or neither. Marr
was not concerned at all himself with the issue of the intentional nature
of the primitives of this theory. But the depth of his methodological
comments and asides has left us with an embarrassment of riches when
it comes to possible interpretations of his theory. This is not simply an
indeterminacy about what Marr meant or intended, but reflects a similar
indeterminacy within the computational approach to vision itself, and, I
think, in computational psychology more generally.

With that in mind I shall turn now to Egan’s claim that the theory is not
intentional at all. This is a minority view of Marr’s theory that has brought
some incredulous stares in light of the constant references within Marr’s
work to notions of representation. How could Egan’s claim be squared
with such appeals? Of interest in this connection is Chomsky’s endorsement of Egan’s interpretation of Marr. Speaking of Ullman’s studies of
the determination of structure from motion within a broadly Marrian
framework, Chomsky says
The account is completely internalist. There is no meaningful question about
the ‘content’ of the internal representations of a person seeing a cube under the
conditions of the experiments, or if the retina is stimulated by a rotating cube,
or by a video of a rotating cube; or about the content of a frog’s ‘representation
of’ a fly or of a moving dot in the standard experimental studies of frog vision.

No notion like ‘content’ or ‘representation of’ figures within the theory, so there
are no answers to be given as to their nature.20
On Chomsky’s view, the nonintentional interpretation of such theories of
vision is made plausible by the claim that “content” and “representation
of” are terms that are neither defined within such theories nor with a clear
meaning within them. The theories are nonintentional in the relevant
sense, and thus it is a moot question whether they operate with a narrow
or a wide notion of content. As Chomsky continues,
The same is true when Marr writes that he is studying vision as a ‘mapping from
one representation to another, and in the case of human vision, the initial representation is in no doubt – it consists of arrays of image intensity values as detected
by the photoreceptors in the retina’ (Marr 1982:31) – where ‘representation is
not to be understood relationally, as representation of.’
We will return to these points in assessing Egan’s interpretation below.21
At the heart of Egan’s view of Marr is a particular view of the nature of
Marr’s computational level of description. Commentators on Marr have
almost universally taken this to correspond to what others have called
the “knowledge level” or the “semantic level” of description, that is, as offering an intentional characterization of the computational mechanisms
governing vision and other cognitive processes. Rather than ignoring
Marr’s computational level, Egan rejects this dominant understanding
of the computational level, arguing instead that what makes it a computational level is that it specifies the function to be computed by a given
algorithm in precise, mathematical terms. That is, while this level of description is functional, what makes it the first stage in constructing a
computational theory is that it offers a function-theoretic characterization
of the computation, and thus abstracts away from all other functional
characterizations.22
Thus, while vision might have all sorts of functions that can be specified in language relatively close to that of common sense – it is for
extracting information from the world, for perceiving an objective world,
for guiding behavior – none of these, in Egan’s view, form a part of Marr’s
computational level of description. Given this view, the case for Marr’s
theory being individualistic because computational follows readily:
A computational theory prescinds from the actual environment because it aims to
provide an abstract, and hence completely general, description of a mechanism
160 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
that affords a basis for predicting and explaining its behavior in any environment, even in environments where what the device is doing cannot comfortably
be described as cognition. When the computational characterization is accompanied by an appropriate intentional interpretation, we can see how a mechanism
that computes a particular mathematical function can, in a particular context,
subserve a cognitive function such as vision.23
According to Egan, while an intentional interpretation links the computational theory to our common sense–based understanding of cognitive
functions, it forms no part of the computational theory itself. Egan’s view
naturally raises questions not only about what Marr meant by the computational level of description but more generally about the nature of
computational approaches to cognition.

There are certainly places in which Marr does talk of the computational
level as simply being a high-level functional characterization of what vision
is for, and thus as simply orienting the researcher to pose certain general
questions. For example, one of his tables offers the following summary
questions that the theory answers at the computational level: “What is
the goal of the computation, why is it appropriate, and what is the logic
of the strategy by which it can be carried out?” Those defending the
claim that Marr’s theory is externalist have typically rested with this broad
and somewhat loose understanding of the computational level of the
theory.24
The problem with this broad understanding of the computational
level, and thus of computational approaches to cognition, is that while it
builds a bridge between computational psychology and more folksy ways
of thinking about cognition, it also creates a gap within the computational approach between the computation level and the algorithmic level.

For example, if we suppose that the computational level specifies simply
that some visual states have the function of representing edges, others
the function of representing shapes, and so on, there is nothing about
such descriptions that guides us in constructing algorithms that generate the state-to-state transitions at the heart of computational approaches
to vision. More informal elaboration of what vision is for, or of what it
evolved to do, do little by themselves to bridge this gap.

The point here is that computational specifications themselves are a
very special kind of functional characterization, at least when they are
to be completed or implemented in automatic, algorithmic processes.

Minimally, proponents of the broad interpretation of computational approaches to cognition need either to construe the computational level as
encompassing but going beyond the function-theoretic characterizations
of cognitive capacities that Egan identifies, or they must allocate those
characterizations to the algorithmic level. The latter option simply exacerbates the “gap” problem identified above. But the former option lumps
together a variety of quite different things under the heading of “the
computational level,” and subsequently fails to recognize the constraints
that computational assumptions bring in their wake. The temporal and
modular dimensions to Marr’s theory exacerbate the problem here.

There is a large issue lurking here concerning how functionalism
should be understood within computational approaches to cognition,
and correspondingly how encompassing such approaches really are.

Functionalism has usually been understood as offering a way to reconcile
our folk psychology, our manifest image of the mind, with the developing
sciences of the mind, even if that reconciliation involves revising folk psychology along individualistic lines. And computationalism has been taken
to be one way of specifying what the relevant functional roles are: They
are “computational roles.” But suppose that Egan is right about Marr’s understanding of the notion of computation as a function-theoretic notion,
and we accept the view that this understanding is shared in computational approaches to cognition more generally. Then the corresponding
version of functionalism about the mind must be function-theoretic in
Egan’s sense: It will “prescind from the actual environment,” as must
the computational level, but also from the sort of internal causal role
that functionalists have often appealed to. Cognitive mechanisms, on
this view, take mathematically characterizable inputs to deliver mathematically characterizable outputs, and qua computational devices, that
is all. Any prospects for the consilience of our “two images” must lie
elsewhere.

In arguing for the nonintentional character of Marr’s theory of vision,
Egan presents an austere picture of the heart of computational psychology, one which accords with the individualistic orientation of computational cognitive science as it has traditionally been developed, even
if computational psychologists have sometimes attempted to place their
theories within more encompassing contexts. We have seen that Chomsky
shares this austere view of at least Marr’s theory in suggesting that “content” and “representation of” are not terms that the theory traffics in.

How plausible is such a view of computational psychology?
One general problem, as Larry Shapiro points out, is that a computational theory of X tells us very little about the nature of X, including
information sufficient to individuate X as (say) a visual process at all.

While Egan seems willing to accept this conclusion, placing this sort of
162 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
concern outside of computational theory proper, this response highlights
a gap between computational theory, austerely construed, and the myriad theories – representational, functional, or ecological in nature – with
which such a theory must be integrated for it to constitute a complete,
mechanistic account of any given cognitive process. The more austere the
account of computation, the larger this gap becomes, and the less a computational theory contributes to our understanding of cognition. One
might well think that Egan’s view of computational theory in psychology
errs on the side of being too austere in this respect.25
We can relate this more directly to Chomsky’s views here. If Marr’s
theory in particular, or computational theories of cognitive abilities more
generally, do not contain an account of the content of (say) visual states,
or what those states are representations of, then surely they leave out
something critical about perception or cognition more generally. Part
of the promise of computational approaches to cognition has been to
show how computation and representation go hand-in-hand. But on the
Egan-Chomsky view, it now seems that “representation” itself is a term of
art within such theories with no connection either to intentionality or to
the underlying, algorithmic level. The promise cannot be fulfilled.

Making Egan’s view less austere in a way that would bridge the gap between computational and various other levels (both “higher” and “lower”)
would likely require one of two things. First, incorporating either part of
what Egan thinks of as the intentional interpretation of the computational
theory within that theory. Or, second, offering a richer conception of the
mechanisms specified at the computational level that compromise their
context independence. Either way, addressing this problem removes the
bases for Egan’s argument for an individualistic view of computational
psychology.

As I shall make clear in the next two sections, I share the view that
there may be no fact of the matter about whether Marr’s theory employs
a notion of narrow or wide content. Thus, I am sympathetic to Egan’s
development of an interpretation of Marr’s framework that bypasses this
issue. But the austere conception of computation shared by Egan and
Chomsky seems to me an interpretation with too high a price.

6 exploitative representation and wide
computationalism
As a beginning on an alternative way of thinking about computation and
representation, consider an interesting difference between individualistic
and externalist interpretations of Marr’s theory that concerns what it is
that Marrian computational systems have built into them. Individualists
about computation, such as Egan and Segal, hold that they incorporate
various innate assumptions about what the world is like. This is because
the process of vision involves recovering 3-D information from a 2-D
retinal image, a process that without further input would be underdetermined. The only way to solve this underdetermination problem is
to make innate assumptions about the world. The best known of these is
Ullman’s rigidity assumption, which says that “any set of elements undergoing a two-dimensional transformation has a unique interpretation as a
rigid body moving in space and hence should be interpreted as such a
body in motion.” The claim that individualists make is that assumptions like this are part of the computational systems that drive cognitive
processing. This is the standard way to understand Marr’s approach to
vision.26
Externalists like Shapiro have construed this matter differently. Although certain assumptions must be true of the world in order for our
computational mechanisms to solve the underdetermination problem,
these are simply assumptions that are exploited by our computational
mechanisms, rather than innate in our cognitive architecture. That is,
the assumptions concern the relationships between features of the external world, or between properties of the internal, visual array and properties of the external world, but those assumptions are not themselves
encoded in the organism. To bring out the contrast between these two
views, consider a few simple examples.27
An odometer keeps track of how many miles a car has traveled, and it
does so by recording the number of wheel rotations and being built to
display a number proportional to this number. One way it could do this
would be for the assumption that 1 rotation = x meters to be part of its
calculational machinery. If it were built this way, then it would plug the
value of its recording into an equation representing this assumption, and
compute the result. Another way of achieving the end would be to be
built simply to record x meters for every rotation, thus exploiting the fact
that 1 rotation = x meters. In the first case it encodes a representational
assumption, and uses this to compute its output. In the second, it contains
no such encoding but instead uses an existing relationship between its
structure and the structure of the world, in much the way that a polar
planimeter measures the area of closed spaces of arbitrary shapes without
doing any representation crunching. Note that however distance traveled
is measured, if an odometer finds itself in an environment in which the
164 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
relationship between rotations to distance traveled is adjusted – larger
wheels, or being driven on a treadmill – it will not function as it is supposed
to, and misrepresent that distance.28
Consider two different (unconscious) strategies for learning how to hit
a baseball that is falling vertically to the ground. Since the ball accelerates
at 9.8 ms2, there is a time lag between swinging and hitting. One could
either assume that the ball is falling (say, at a specific rate of acceleration), and then use this assumption to calculate when one should swing;
alternatively, one could simply aim a certain distance below where one
perceives the ball at the time of swinging (say, two feet). In this latter case
one would be exploiting the relationship between acceleration, time, and
distance without having to encode that relationship in the assumptions
one brings to bear on the task.

Exploitative representation is an efficient form of representation when
there is a constant, reliable, causal or informational relationship between
what a device does and how the world is. Thus, rather than encode the
structure of the world and then manipulate those encodings, “smart
mechanisms” can exploit that constancy. As the odometer example suggests, the encoding view also presupposes some mind-world constancy,
but this is presumed only for “input” representations to start the computational process on the right track. Exploitative representation makes a
deeper use of mind-world constancies.

The fact that there are these two different strategies for accomplishing
the same end should, minimally, make us wary of accepting the claim that
innate assumptions are the only way that a computational system could
solve the underdetermination problem. But I also want to develop the
idea that our perceptual system in particular and our cognitive systems
more generally typically exploit rather than encode information about
the world and our relationship to it, as well as say something about where
Marr himself seems to stand on this issue.

An assumption that Egan makes and that is widely shared in the philosophical literatures both on individualism and computation is that at least
the algorithmic level of description within computational psychology is
individualistic. The idea here has, I think, seemed so obvious that it has
seldom been spelled out: Algorithms operate on the syntactic or formal
properties of symbols, and these are intrinsic to the organisms instantiating the symbols. We might challenge this neither by disputing how much
is built into Marr’s computational level, nor by squabbling over the line
between Marr’s computational and algorithmic levels, but, rather, by arguing that computations themselves can extend beyond the head of the
organism and involve the relations between individuals and their environments. This position, wide computationalism, holds that at least some of
the computational systems that drive cognition reach beyond the limits of
the organismic boundary. Its application to Marr’s theory of vision marks
a departure from the parameters governing the standard individualistexternalist debate over that theory. Wide computationalism constitutes
one way of thinking about the way in which cognition, even considered
computationally, is“embedded” or“situated”in its nature, and it provides
a framework within which an exploitative conception of representation
can be pursued.

The basic idea of wide computationalism is simple. Traditionally, the
sorts of computation that govern cognition have been thought to begin
and end at the skull. But why think that the skull constitutes a magic
boundary beyond which true computation ends and mere causation
begins? Given that we are creatures embedded in informationally rich
and complex environments, the computations that occur inside the head
are an important part but are not exhaustive of the corresponding computational systems. This perspective opens up the possibility of exploring
computational units that include the brain as well as aspects of the brain’s
beyond-the-head environment. Wide computational systems thus involve
minds that literally extend beyond the confines of the skull into the world.

In the terms introduced earlier in Part Two, they have wide realizations
(see Figures 7.1 and 7.2).

Standard Computationalism An example: Multiplying
with only internal symbols
Computational system ends at the skull;
computation must be entirely in the
head.

1. Code external world.

2. Model computations between internal
 representations only.

3. Explain behavior, based on outputs from
 Step 2.

figure 7.1. Standard Computationalism
166 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
An example: Multiplying with Wide Computationalism 
internal and external symbols
Computational system can extend
beyond the skin into the world;
computation may not be entirely in the
head.

1. Identify representational or informational
2. Model computations between these
 forms -- whether in the head or not -- that
 constitute the relevant computational
system.

representations.

3. Behavior itself may be part of the wide
computational system.

figure 7.2. Wide Computationalism
One way to bring out the nature of the departure made by wide computationalism draws on a distinction between locational and taxonomic
conceptions of psychological states. Individualists and externalists are
usually presented as disagreeing over how to taxonomize or individuate
psychological states, but both typically presume that the relevant states
are locationally individualistic: They are located within the organismic envelope. What individualists and externalists typically disagree about is
whether in addition to being locationally individualistic, psychological
states must also be taxonomically individualistic. This is, as we have seen,
what is usually at issue in the debate over Marr’s theory of vision, where
the focus has been on whether Marr uses a wide or a narrow notion
of content. Wide computationalism, however, rejects this assumption of
locational individualism by claiming that some of the “relevant states” –
some of those that constitute the relevant computational system – are
located not in the individual’s head but in her environment.

If some cognitive systems, wide computational systems, are not locationally individualistic, then they, and thus the states that constitute them,
are not taxonomically individualistic. That is, locational width entails taxonomic width. This is because two individuals could instantiate different
wide computational systems simply by virtue of differences in the beyondthe-head part of their cognitive systems. Again, the framework introduced
in Chapters 5 and 6 makes this claim easy to state: Total realizations of
wide computational systems differing only in their noncore parts, or that
are radically wide, could instantiate the cognitive systems of individuals
who were molecularly identical.

The intuitive idea behind wide computationalism is easy enough to
grasp. But there are two controversial claims central to defending wide
computationalism as a viable model for thinking about and studying cognitive processing. The first is that it is sometimes appropriate to offer a
formal or computational characterization of an organism’s environment,
and to view parts of the brain of the organism, computationally characterized, together with this environment so characterized, as constituting
a unified computational system. Without this being true, it is difficult to
see wide computationalism as a coherent view. The second is that this
resulting mind-world computational system itself, and not just the part
of it inside the head, is genuinely cognitive. Without this second claim,
wide computationalism would at best present a zany way of carving up
the computational world, one without obvious implications for how we
should think about real cognition in real heads. I take each claim in
turn, with specific reference to Marr’s theory of vision, and with an eye to
highlighting some of the broader issues that arise in thinking about individualism and cognitive science, including how we think about mental
representation.

Offering a formal or computational characterization of an organism’s
environment, if it is to capture important aspects of the structure and
dynamics of that environment, is neither trivial nor easy. Or, to put it in
terms that help to locate whatever mystery there is to this claim within perhaps more familiar territory for those working in the cognitive sciences,
doing so is no more and no less trivial than doing so for psychological
states themselves.

To construct a computational model of an internal, psychological process, one postulates a set of primitive states, S1 ... Sn, and then formulates
transition rules that govern changes between these states, as well as some
set of initial states to which the transition rules apply in the first instance.

The computational model’s adequacy is proportional to how closely its
primitives, transition rules, and starting point(s) parallel aspects of the
corresponding cognitive system being modeled. The crucial assumption
in computational modeling is that causal transitions between physical
states can be represented as inferential transitions between computational states.

This view of what a computational system of mental states is has
been elaborated by Rob Cummins as the “Tower-Bridge” picture of
168 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
computation, and is, I think, implicit in Egan’s function-theoretic conception of computational psychology. It applies not only to “classic” models of
computational cognition but also to connectionist models, at least those
in which there remain notions of computation and representation. In the
former, the computational states tend themselves to be rich in structure
and thus differentiated, and often approximate everyday concepts, with
the transition rules serving both to “unpack”the complexity to these symbols (for example,“dog” –> “animal”) and the relations between symbols
more generally. In the latter, the computational states tend to be simple,
relatively undifferentiated, and they do not correspond readily to everyday concepts. Here the transition rules are connection strengths between
the computational states (the “nodes”), and the dynamics of the system
is governed primarily by these together with the initial layering of the
nodes.29
This basic idea is general enough that it applies not only to cognitive systems but in principle to any type of system whose structure and
dynamics we wish to model. This is a desirable feature, since (i) the notion of computation that we apply to cognitive systems should not be sui
generis, applying only to such systems; and (ii) a variety of noncognitive
systems – from planets to ecosystems to colonies of social insects to intracellular biological systems – can be computationally modeled. What
marks off cognition as special here is not the notion of computation that
it employs but the idea that the cognitive system itself and its components
are themselves computing, and not just being computationally modeled.

This idea itself is manifest in talk of “neural computing,” “single-neuron
computation,” and the “computational brain,” as well as in the Ur-idea
of the “mind as computer.” If I have correctly characterized the idea of
computational modeling, however, then the idea that cognition is different in kind from all (or even the vast majority of) other domains to
which computational modeling is applied – that is, that, plus or minus a
bit, only cognition is genuinely computational in and of itself – involves
mistaking the features of the model for the features of what is modeled.

Given this notion of computation, the idea that there can be computational systems that involve the nonbrain part of the world is trivial.

Less trivial is the claim that the brain plus parts of the nonbrain part of the
world together can constitute a computational system, a locationally wide
computational system, since that rests on there being a robust, structured
causal relationship between what is in the head and what is outside of it
that can be adequately captured by transition rules. As I said in Chapter 5,
processes in the brain, or more generally the organism, that have evolved
via world-mind dependencies are good candidates for forming parts of
wide computational systems, assuming that the nonorganismic contribution to this system itself has some sort of rich causal structure that admits
a formal characterization.

Perceptual processing is a good candidate place to look for such systems. A lens that transforms the light that passes through it does not itself
compute the spatial frequency of the resulting image. But there is a causal
process whose inputs (target object) and outputs (resulting image) we
can characterize formally (in terms of spatial frequency), and that involves the lens as a mediating causal mechanism. This mechanism, and
those that it feeds, can exploitatively represent objects in the world. The
computation here is wide, since the computational states extend beyond
the boundary of the relevant individual, the lens. The same is true if that
lens happens to form part of somebody’s eye.

How might this apply to Marr’s theory of vision? As we have seen, Marr
himself construes the task of a theory of vision to show how we extract
visual information from “arrays of image intensity values as detected by the
photoreceptors in the retina.” Thus, as we have already noted, for Marr
the problem of vision begins with retinal images, not with properties of
the world beyond those images, and “the true heart of visual perception
is the inference from the structure of an image about the structure of
the real world outside.” Marr goes on to characterize a range of physical
constraints that hold true of the world that make this inference possible,
but he makes it clear that “the constraints are used by turning them
into an assumption that may or may not be internally verifiable.” For
all of Marr’s talk of the importance of facts about the beyond-the-head
world for constructing the computational level in a theory of vision, this
is representative of how Marr conceives of that relevance. It seems to me
clear that, in terms that I introduced in the previous sections, Marr himself
adopts an encoding view of computation and representation, rather than
an exploitative view of the two. The visual system is, according to Marr, a
locationally individualistic system.30
Whatever Marr’s own views here, the obvious way to defend a wide
computational interpretation of his theory is to resist his inference from
“x is a physical constraint holding in the world” to “x is an assumption
that is encoded in the brain.” This is, in essence, what I have previously
proposed one should do in the case of the multiple spatial channels
theory of form perception. Like Marr’s theory of vision, which in part
builds on this work, this theory has usually been understood as postulating
a locationally individualistic computational system, one that begins with
170 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
channels early in the visual pathway that are differentially sensitive to four
parameters: orientation, spatial frequency, contrast, and spatial phase.

My suggestion was to take seriously the claim that any visual scene (in
the world) can be decomposed into these four properties, and so see
the computational system itself as extending into the world, with the
causal relationship between stimulus and visual channels itself modeled
by transition rules. Rather than simply having these properties encoded
in distinct visual channels in the nervous system, view the in-the-head
part of the form perception system as exploiting formal properties in the
world beyond the head. In Marr’s theory, there is one respect in which
this wide computational interpretation is easy to defend, and one respect
in which it is difficult to defend.31
The first of these is that Marr’s “assumptions,” such as the spatial coincidence assumption and the “fundamental assumption of stereopsis,”typically begin as physical constraints that reflect the structure of the world;
in the above examples, they begin as the constraint of spatial localization and three matching constraints. Thus, the strategy is to argue that
the constraints themselves, rather than their derivative encoding, play a
role in defining the computational system, rather than simply filling a
heuristic role in allowing us to offer a computational characterization of
a locationally individualistic cognitive system.32
The corresponding respect in which a wide computational interpretation of Marr’s theory is difficult to defend is that these constraints themselves do not specify what the computational primitives are. One possibility would simply be to attribute the primitives that Marr ascribes to the
image to features of the scenes perceived themselves, but this would be
too quick. For example, Marr considers zero-crossings to be steps in a
computation that represent sharp charges in intensity in the image, and
while we could take them to represent intensity changes in the stimuli in
the world, zero-crossings themselves are located somewhere early in the
in-the-head part of the visual system, probably close to the retina.

A better strategy, I think, would be to deflate the interpretation of
the retinal image and look “upstream” from it to identify richer external
structures in the world, structures, which satisfy the physical constraints
that Marr postulates. That is, one should extend the temporal dimension
to Marr’s theory so that the earliest stages in basic visual processes begin
in the world, not in the head. Since the study of vision has been largely
conducted within an overarching individualistic framework, this strategy
would require recasting the theory of vision itself so that it ranges over a
process that causally extends beyond the retinal image.

Mark Rowlands has contrasted Marr’s approach, beginning with the
retinal image in his analysis of vision with the ecological approach of
James J. Gibson, which begins with information contained in what Gibson
called the ambient optical array. Although Rowlands locates the views of
Marr and Gibson on a continuum, his chief aim in drawing the contrast is
to argue for a view of perception closer to Gibson’s end of the continuum
than to Marr’s. My idea here is somewhat different: to suggest that we can
augment Marr’s computational view by something like Gibson’s view of
what the starting point for an analysis of vision is. The importance of the
idea that the ambient optical array, as an information-bearing structure
external to the organism, is the appropriate starting point for this analysis,
as Rowlands argues, is that doing so enriches the information available for
visual processing and so reduces the complexity that we need to attribute
to the organism itself in accounts of vision. The ambient optical array
is part of the locationally wide computational system that vision takes
place in.33
Once we take this step, then the interaction between informationprocessing structures inside organisms and information-bearing states
outside of them becomes central to a computational account of vision.

And there seems a second Gibsonian insight that can direct research here:
The idea that vision is exploratory, and that crucial to that exploration
is the movement of the organism through the ambient optical array.

Rowlands thinks of this as an organism manipulating its environment to
extract information from it, whereas it seems to me that it is more fruitful
to see this as an organism manipulating itself, in particular, its body and
its parts, for this purpose. This is one way in which vision is animate,
a point to which I shall return and a second respect in which we can
extend the temporal dimension to Marr’s theory. Visual inputs are not
simply snapshots that are then (somehow) assembled and bound together
within the organism in generating complete visual scenes. Rather, they
are complete visual scenes sampled through bodily explorations of the
ambient optical array over time.

If we view these aspects of Gibson’s views as extensions of the temporal
dimension to Marr’s theory, then we might also wonder about revisiting
the modular dimension to Marr’s theory. As I said near the beginning
of section 4, a second complexity to Marr’s theory is the assumption
that visual computations are highly modular, such that features of the
final visual image, such as depth and motion, are computed independently. But if the information available to wide computational systems
is enriched in the temporal dimension relative to that available to their
172 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
narrow counterparts, then surely there is less need to assume that vision
is as modular as Marr himself assumed.

The second task – of showing that wide computational systems themselves, and not just their in-the-head components, are cognitive systems –
is perhaps better undertaken once we have a range of examples of wide
computational systems before us. Before turning to that, now that we have
explored the debate over Marr’s theory in some detail, I want to return
to the idea of narrow content.

7 narrow content and marr’s theory
Consider the very first move in Segal’s argument for the conclusion that
Marr’s theory of vision is individualistic: The innocuous-looking claim
that there are two general interpretations available when one seeks to ascribe intentional contents to the visual states of two individuals, one “restrictive” (Burge’s) and one “liberal” (Segal’s). In introducing the distinction between narrow content and wide content in Chapter 4, I indicated
that something like these two general alternatives were implicit in the basic Twin Earth cases with which we – and the debate over individualism –
began. There I also said that the resulting idea – that twins must share
some intentional state about watery substances (or about arthritislike diseases, in Burge’s standard case) – is the basis for attempts to articulate a
notion of narrow content, that is, intentional content that does supervene
on the intrinsic, physical properties of the individual.

The presupposition of a liberal interpretation for Marr’s theory, and a
corresponding view of the original Twin Earth cases in general, are themselves questionable. Note first that the representations that we might, in
order to make their disjunctive content perspicuous, label “crackdow”
or “water or twater,” do represent their reliable, environmental causes:
“Crackdow” is reliably caused by cracks or shadows and has the content
crack or shadow; similarly for “water or twater.” But then this disjunctive
content is a species of wide, not narrow, content. In short, although being
shared by twins is necessary for mental content to be narrow, this is not
sufficient for narrow content.

To press further, if the content of one’s visual state is to be individualistic, it must be shared by doppelgangers ¨ no matter how different their
environments. Thus, the case of twins is merely a heuristic for thinking
about a potentially infinite number of individuals. But then the focus on a
content shared by two individuals, and thus on a content that is neutral between two environmental causes, represents a misleading simplification
insofar as the content needed won’t simply be “crackdow” but something
more wildly disjunctive. This is because there is a potentially infinite number of environments that might produce the same intrinsic, physical state
of the individual’s visual system as (say) cracks do in the actual world. It is
not that we can’t simply make up a name for the content of such a state –
we can: Call it “X.” – Rather, it is that it is difficult to view a state so individuated as being about anything. And if being about something is at the
heart of being intentional, then this calls into question the status of such
narrowly individuated states as intentional states.

Segal has claimed that the narrow content of“crackdow,” or by implication “water or twater,” need not be disjunctive, just simply more encompassing than, respectively, crack or water. But casting the above points
in terms of disjunctive content simply makes vivid the general problems
that (1) individuation of states in terms of their content still proceeds via
reference to what does or would cause them to be tokened; and (2) once
one prescinds from a conception of the cognitive system as embedded
in and interacting with the actual world in thinking about how to taxonomize its states, it becomes difficult to delineate clearly those states
as intentional states with some definite content. As it is sometimes put,
narrow content becomes inexpressible. Two responses might be made to
this second objection.34
First, one might concede that, strictly speaking, narrow content is inexpressible, but then point out ways of sneaking up on it. One might do
so by talking of how one can “anchor” narrow content to wide content, or
of how to specify the realization conditions for a proposition. But these
suggestions, despite their currency, seem to me little more than whistling
in the dark, and the concession on which they rest, fatal. All of the ways
of “sneaking up on” narrow content involve using wide contents in some
way. Yet if wide content is such a problematic notion (because it is not
individualistic), then surely the problem spreads to any notion, such as
snuck-up-on narrow content, for whose intelligibility it is crucial.35
If narrow content really is inexpressible, then the idea that it is this
notion that is central to psychological explanation as it is actually practiced, and this notion that does or will feature in the natural kinds and
laws of the cognitive sciences, cannot reasonably be sustained. Except
in Douglas Adamesque spoofs of science, there are no sciences whose
central explanatory constructs are inexpressible. Moreover, this view
would make the claim that one arrives at the notion of narrow content
via an examination of actual explanatory practice in the cognitive sciences extremely implausible, since if narrow content is inexpressible,
174 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
then one won’t be able to find it expressed in any existing psychological theory. In short, the idea that snuck-up-on narrow content is what
cognitive science needs or uses constitutes a lapse back to the cognitive
science gesture.

Second, it could be claimed that although it is true that it is difficult for
common-sense folk to come up with labels for intentional contents, those
in the relevant cognitive sciences can and do all the time, and we should
defer to them. For example, one might claim that many if not all of the
representational primitives in Marr’s theory, such as blob, edge, and line,
have narrow contents. These concepts, like many scientific terms, are
technical and, as such, may bear no obvious relationship to the concepts
and terms of common sense, but they still allow us to see how narrow content can be expressed. One might think that this response has the same
question-begging feel to it as does the claim that our folk psychological
states are themselves narrow. However, the underdetermination of philosophical views by the data of the scientific theories, such as Marr’s, that
they interpret remains a problem for both individualists and externalists
alike here. As my discussion of exploitative representation and wide computation perhaps suggests, my own view is that we need to reinvigorate the
ways in which the computational and representational theories of mind
have usually been construed within cognitive science. If this can be done
in more than a gestural manner, then the issue of the (in)expressibility
of narrow content will be largely moot.

8 locational versus taxonomic externalism
Our extended treatment of Marr’s theory of vision over the previous four
sections has distinguished two different ways of thinking about externalism that make contact with computational approaches to cognition:
taxonomic and locational externalism. A cluster of related paradigms
within contemporary cognitive science that go under various names –
situated cognition, embedded cognition, distributed cognition, improvisational cognition – can be understood in terms of either or both of these
forms of externalism. In this section, I shall discuss specific accounts of
cognition within these paradigms. In particular, I shall argue that these
accounts of cognition posit wide computational systems, and thus are
committed to the idea that cognition is locationally externalist.

Coincident with the rise of connectionist models of cognition in which
cognitive representations can be distributed across a number of nodes,
rather than localized in few of them, has been the idea that cognition
can be distributed either across agents or across agents and their environments. In the former case, cognition is construed interpersonally, involving social and cultural mediation between people, while in the latter
case it is seen as extending beyond the individual into her environment.

Since the relevant part of the environment is often a cultural product,
such as a cognitive artifact, in both cases there are cultural and social
dimensions that are integral to cognition.

Edwin Hutchins’s work on seafaring navigation exemplifies a distributed approach to cognition of both types. While Hutchins is critical
of some of the turns that the computational approach to cognition has
taken, his own views have been developed within an overarching computational framework, one with interpersonal and artifactual dimensions.

Hutchins argues that technology should not be thought of simply as a way
of augmenting individual cognitive capacities, however, but as a means
of changing the nature of the representational spaces or media in which
computations are performed. Computations are not simply performed
in the head of the individual, but occur in interpersonal activities that
make use of recent (and not so recent) cognitive artifacts. The locus of
computation is in the beyond-the-individual world.

Hutchins brings out the interpersonal dimension to the cognitive processes involved in navigation when he says, in his introduction to Cognition
in the Wild, that he hopes
to show that human cognition is not just influenced by culture and society, but
that it is in a very fundamental sense a cultural and social process. To do this I will
move the boundaries of the cognitive unit of analysis out beyond the skin of the
individual person and treat the navigation team as a cognitive and computational
system.36
Here the unit of cognition is not the individual but the navigation team of
which the individual is a part. Both the social organization of the team and
the relationships between its members and various cognitive artifacts (for
example, the alidade, the bearing log, phone circuits, the hoey, the chart,
the fathometer) serve as the cognitive architecture of this larger cognitive unit. For example, consider the fix cycle, which plots the position
of the ship (output) given two lines of position as inputs. This cycle involves the generation, transformation, and utilization of representations
in many individuals and many cognitive artifacts. There is no one place,
in particular, no one individual, in which this process is implemented.

Hutchins’s study of navigation does tell us a lot about the social distribution of cognitive tasks in navigation, showing how modern navigation
176 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
involves exploiting social structures and relationships. And perhaps this
even provides an example of group-level cognition, a topic we will discuss
in detail in Part Four. But Hutchins also highlights how individual-level
cognition often extends beyond the boundary of the individual. For example, he does so in emphasizing how integral the use of representational
artifacts – from calendars, to maps, to alidades, to hoeys – are not only to
team-level cognitive tasks, but also to component, individual-level cognitive tasks – such as reading the alidade, writing an entry on the bearing
log, or adjusting the hoey. Such cognitive processes are realized in wide
computational systems, where these systems constitute ways of extending
an individual’s cognitive capacities. Navigation involves a wide range of
locationally externalist cognitive processes.

A second example that exemplifies this perspective is Dana Ballard’s
work on animate vision in general and on the role of deictic coding
in cognition in particular. Here the central idea is that cognition often
involves rapid updates of information from one’s environment in an unplanned or improvised manner, where this improvisational cognition involves adjusting one’s body, particularly through eye movements, to take
advantage of information that is stored in the environment and thus does
not need to be computed or stored by the individual. For example, vision
involves intense, repeated causal interactions with an environment via
rapid saccadic fixations, which shifts the burden of the computational
load from inside the head to the head-world. Inside-the-head representations are computationally expensive to construct and to maintain, hence
the idea that they are constructed only when necessary, with the representational slack being taken up by interaction with the world.

principle – know only as much as you need to know to get the job done,
where to “know” something is to internally represent it in some way. Exploitative representation reduces the informational load that individuals
bear through exploiting world-mind regularities, and in the case of animate vision this exploitation makes use not simply of such regularities
but the ease with which our bodies can be adjusted to utilize them.

The central novelty of Ballard’s approach to vision is to combine the
concept that looking is a form of doing with the claim that vision is computation. As we saw in section 6, although the ecological psychologist
James J. Gibson recognized the first of these points long ago, his views
were developed in direct opposition to the idea that vision was inferential
or computational. Ballard integrates these two points by introducing the
idea that eye movements constitute a form of deictic coding in that they
are behaviors that orient visual attention and fixation in ways that allow
perceivers to exploit the world as an external storage device. Eye movements are a type of pointing device, a type of“doing-it- where-I’m-looking”
strategy, that means that perceivers need not copy all of the information
in a scene in order to use it in guiding further action.37
Ballard applies this model of cognition not only to vision but also
to attention, memory, and action. Despite the name “deictic coding,” it
represents an approach to cognition that involves exploiting rather than
encoding beyond-the-head environments. Here too, I would suggest that
the idea of a wide computational system, and of cognitive processes being
locationally wide, aptly describe the program of animate vision.

To take a third and final example, consider the “intelligence without
reason” approach to robotics championed by Rodney Brooks that concentrates on developing behavior-based systems. Brooks makes no attempt
to model how people behave, and is explicit that he is not engaged in
any sort of “cognitive modeling” that captures (even in part) the cognitive processes that people instantiate. His goal is to build robots, which
he calls “Creatures,” that behave intelligently in natural environments,
rather than to mimic human performance on some specific task (for example, decision making, block moving, question answering) in an artifi-
cially restricted domain (for example, chess, the blocks worlds, restaurant
scripts, respectively). This is achieved by a subsumption architecture that
builds more complex layers on top of less complex layers, with each layer
achieving some action-centered goal, such as avoiding objects, wandering, or exploring its environment. Layers themselves are composed of
simple finite-state machines that achieve specific behaviors.

One of Brooks’ recurring themes is that the world is its own best model,
and so there is no attempt to have his Creatures encode features of the
world in order to negotiate successfully in it; rather, they exploit those
features. But his Creatures are not relying on symbolic aspects of their
environments or external representations. Indeed, Brooks has claimed
that the notion of representation itself is not readily applicable to his
Creatures at all. Like the claim of some early connectionists that they
had bypassed the notion of representation altogether, this claim seems
to me hyperbole, especially given that these are computationally driven
processes. Given that we admit no computation without representation,
then either his creatures are a combination of reaction (world-creature)
and computation (in the creature), or they are computational all the way
out. Either way, we have a locationally externalist view of processing, and
in the latter case, wide computationalism.38
178 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
We can now, finally, return to the question of whether wide computational systems themselves – as opposed simply to their in-the-head
realizations – are properly thought of as cognitive. Suppose that one
grants locational externalism about computational systems. Might one
still maintain individualism about cognition by conceptualizing the cognitive system proper as ending at the boundary of the individual? Such a
view rests on the plausibility of identifying what is internally realized as
always being the appropriate cognitive system. Consider the navigation
systems that Hutchins discusses. For individualism to be defensible as a
view of cognition in this case, there must be an in-the-head account of all
of the relevant cognitive processes; likewise for the case of animate vision
and behavior-based robotic systems. But recall that all three cases share
the strategy of pointing to individual-world interactions as a way to avoid
positing more costly internal representations and computations. Thus,
this individualistic move is unmotivated and runs counter to the reconceptualization of representation within these paradigms. Representation
is not something implanted in individuals but something that individuals
do by exploiting the rich structures of their environments in cycles of
perception and action.

9 having it both ways?
Two strands to the discussion in this chapter might be thought to be in tension with one another. The first stems from my claim that once one moves
from the cognitive science gesture to a more full-fledged examination of
theory and explanation in the cognitive sciences themselves, the debate
between individualists and externalists becomes tougher to resolve. This
debate turns not only on how one interprets particular theories but also
on broader issues in the philosophy of mind and science. Thus, I have
been arguing not only for the conclusion that the cognitive science gesture itself far from resolves the debate in favor of individualism, but that
going beyond that gesture leaves much in the debate open. But, second,
in offering a wide computational interpretation of Marr’s theory of vision
in section 6 and in linking this interpretation to a range of contemporary
work on situated and embedded cognition, I have argued for a resolution
of the debate in favor of externalism. Surely, one might think, one can’t
have it both ways.

The way to resolve this tension, I think, is to lean on the distinction between taxonomic and locational externalism. The debate over Marr’s theory of vision has been conducted almost exclusively in terms of taxonomic
externalism and individualism, as manifest in the focus on narrow and
wide content. But whether any theory employs a notion of narrow or wide
content will turn largely on what it says about wildly counterfactual cases,
cases in which there are molecular (or even narrowly functional) duplicates in minimally different environments. And Marr’s own discussion of
the computational level supports both a narrow and a wide interpretation of it. Thus, the nonconclusiveness of individualism construed as a
taxonomic thesis about the cognitive sciences.

Once we shift to the locational conception of externalism, matters become somewhat clearer. The issue here is whether the cognitive sciences
sometimes investigate wide computational systems, and at least on the
surface this seems easier to resolve, since it is a matter primarily of identifying whether the computational system of interest literally extends beyond the boundary of the individual. Locational externalism is a stronger
view than taxonomic externalism and entails it unless there is a plausible, nonquestion-begging way to individuate mental states independent
of their total realizations. We have seen several failed attempts to do this,
in this chapter and the last, and the emphasis on locational externalism
clearly places an onus on individualists.

This is a matter of whether the cognitive sciences do or should employ
a strategy of integrative synthesis, as well as constitutive decomposition,
whereby individuals and their cognitive processes are located in systems
larger than those individuals. My argument in this chapter has been that
by refashioning the notions of representation and computation, there is
no reason why not, and much reason to be bipartisan or pluralistic about
these notions, as we should be about realization.

10 beyond computation
In introducing and defending wide computationalism as a perspective
on research in cognitive science, I have appealed to existing work that I
think can plausibly be seen as exemplifying a wide computational view
of cognitive processing. Such a view shifts the attentional focus of the
field in such a way as to suggest new directions for the computational
theory of mind. I have suggested that one could interpret Marr’s theory
of vision as invoking the strategy of integrative synthesis (over Marr’s own
likely objections), and identified three paradigms of research in cognitive
science – in distributed cognition (Hutchins), in animate vision (Ballard),
and in reactive robotics (Brooks) – that prima facie also exemplify this
strategy.

180 Individualism and Externalism in Cognitive Sciences
Individualists, of course, are unlikely to take the appearances here at
face value. Indeed, they should challenge the claim that any of these research paradigms are properly construed as invoking wide computational
systems. There are various ways of doing so: from questioning the conceptual integrity of the very idea of wide computationalism, to arguing
that individuals are the largest cognitive units to which we in fact apply
computational analyses of cognition, to pointing to inadequacies of wide
computational interpretations of specific theories and explanations.39
Rather than continuing this debate here, I want to move on beyond
computation. In the next chapter, I shall generalize from wide computationalism to wide psychology, and in so doing discuss a variety of noncomputational approaches to cognition that also exemplify the externalist
view of cognition that I have been developing in Part Two. The argument
will be that both taxonomic and locational externalism, whether computational or not, provide the theoretical backdrop for redirecting some of
the individualistic research on core topics, such as memory and cognitive
development, in ways that draw on some largely forgotten insights within
psychology itself.

part three
THINKING THROUGH AND BEYOND THE BODY
181
182
8
The Embedded Mind and Cognition
1 representation and psychology
The chapters in Part Two have laid the foundation for a general externalist view of cognition and the mind. For the most part, the concepts of
realization, representation, and computation have been developed and
deployed within individualistic frameworks. In broadening and refashioning these concepts I have created a space for an externalist psychology, and illustrated ways in which some of that space has already been
occupied within computational cognitive science.

The most important of these concepts for cognitive psychology is that
of representation. Cognitive psychology explores the nature and structure of mental representations and how they are processed: how they
are stored, retrieved, transformed, and related to one another. In the
last chapter we saw that a representational view of cognition need not
be individualistic. In this chapter, I move beyond foundation laying for
externalism to show the place that exploitative representation has within
cognitive psychology. I shall focus on areas of psychology in which representation has played a central role – on memory (section 4), developmental psychology (section 5), and folk psychology and the theory of
mind (section 6).

Representation is not simply a form of encoding but more generally
a form of informational exploitation of which encoding is a special case.

Representations need not be thought of as internal copies of or codes for
worldly structures. Rather, representation is an activity that individuals
perform in extracting and deploying information that is used in their
further actions. It involves an agent enmeshed with the world not prior
183
184 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
to or following but in the very act of representing. On the traditional view
of representation, cognition is wedged between perception and action,
implying, in the philosopher Susan Hurley’s words, that “[t]he mind is
a kind of sandwich, and cognition is the filling.” The shift in perspective
that the concept of exploitative representation introduces opens the way
to developing a view of cognition that treats what is inside the head and
what is beyond it in a symmetrical fashion.1
One form that this symmetry takes, exemplified by the multiplication
example depicted in Figures 7.1 and 7.2, is the identification of explicit
symbolic structures in a cognizer’s environment that, together with explicit symbolic structures in its head, constitute the cognitive system relevant for performing some given task. Such symbols in the world can
be exploited rather than encoded by individuals and their in-the-head
computational systems.

The same is true when information in the world does not take this
explicit symbolic form. To use the psychologist George Miller’s apt term,
we are informavores and can exploit causal and probabilistic dependencies
in the world in generating in-the-head structures that, in part, direct
our behavior. In the previous chapter, I developed this idea in terms
of computation extending beyond the boundary of the individual, but
we could express this more generally in terms of information-processing
systems that do so. Again, there is no metaphysical significance to the
boundary of an individual’s body for individuating where that individual’s
mind begins and ends.2
The exploitative view of representation is one way to develop the
idea that cognition is situated, embedded, and embodied. One oftenexpressed concern about this idea is that it involves an unacceptably
deflationary understanding of what cognition is. Proponents of the embedded mind either focus exclusively on aspects of cognition that involve
the organism’s interface with the world (for example, perceptual and motor capacities), or they offer thin behavioristic or functionalist construals
of intuitively more central cognitive abilities. By showing how exploitative representation applies to paradigm cases of core cognitive capacities,
and by suggesting extensions of existing paradigms of representational
psychology, I hope to preempt both of these standard criticisms.

2 life and mind: from reaction to thought
Our paradigm of a living thing is an organism. All organisms react to
occurrences in their environments, and use those reactions to control
their bodies in some way. I am inclined to think that much the same is
true of all thinking things, and to view this as a simple but deep fact about
the nature of cognition, certainly for animate creatures like us whose
cognitive functioning is tied to their continued existence as living beings.

Cognition allows us to register what is in our here and now environment,
and to adapt our bodies to what we register. But this truth should not
overshadow the fact that cognition also allows us to do much more, to
go beyond our immediate environments, back to the experienced past
through memory and ingrained habit, and forward to the distant future
through planning and imagination.

The parallel between the embeddedness and embodiment of living
and thinking things, together with the recognition that thought is something more than stimulus driven and response driving, invite the question of what more there is to cognition than simple registration and
reaction. We can think of this in terms of types of representational system that organisms possess, each with a distinctive locus of control for
action.

First, a creature might simply have a reactive representational system. It
registers one or more states of its environment, and this guides its behavior, but the connections between registration and reaction are simple and
fixed. The behavior of the creature is thus effectively under control of the
stimuli in its environment. Vary the position of an intense light source
within certain parameters and you cause a variation in the position of the
flower in a sunflower. Adjust the magnetic field in the liquid in which
a paramecium floats, and you change the direction in which it moves.

Although the internal structure of creatures with such representational
systems plays a crucial role in the mediation of stimuli and response, the
locus of control for their behavior is external. It is environmental.

But many creatures are able to exercise more control over their own
reactions. Their representational systems are not simply reactive but enactive: They endow those blessed with them some control over the nature
and strength of the behaviors enacted. A registration of the environment
is made, but it does not automatically generate a reaction in what is done.

Rather, it is combined with other registrations, and these together generate a bodily output. I would hazard the guess that most of the animal
behavior that we are familiar with in everyday life – from interacting with
our domestic pets, to watching squirrels or birds in a yard, or vertebrates in
general in the wild – involves enactive representational systems. It is with
enactive representational systems that most of us are first comfortable
in invoking distinctly psychological language in a literal sense. Enactive
186 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
creatures perceive and decide, whereas reactive creatures do so only in a
metaphorical sense.

Yet even if an enactive representational system introduces a distinctive psychology, it does not suffice, one might think, for the full range of
psychological capacities that creatures have. In particular, enactive representation is still closely tied to what one does with one’s body, and does
not yet give us higher cognition with a completely internal locus of control. That is what a symbolic representational system creates, the capacity
to divorce cognition from its bodily origins. It creates genuine thinkers,
creatures who can use representations to generate other representations,
and so whose cognition may have a high level of autonomy from the here
and now. It is here that we have thought, inference, reasoning, planning, wishful thinking, and reflection. The heart of cognition. Cognition
central.

Human beings manifest all three types of representational systems: in
reflexes (reactive), in bodily skills (enactive), and in higher cognition
(symbolic). Although there is a physiology that underlies any biological
reflex, it is plausible to view the reflex as under the control of the stimulus
that elicits it. (In fact, if standard stimuli do not elicit the reflexive reaction, then we view the system responsible for it as having broken down,
as not functioning as it is supposed to.) It is in this sense that reflexes are
not options exercised by the organisms that have them, and the external
locus of their control is one reason not to think of them as cognitive
in nature. Bodily skills, such as riding a bicycle, introduce such options,
given any particular stimulus. Yet there remains a sense in which they
are not controlled “centrally” in that they do not require – in fact, often
require the absence of – direction from paradigmatic cognitive states,
such as beliefs and desires. This is why they can be performed, as we say,
“without thinking about it,” and why thinking about it sometimes gets
in the way of successful performance. Once you know how to perform a
bodily skill – from bicycle riding, to typing, to gymnastics, to catching a
ball – it is a matter of letting the body do what it knows to do, rather than
trying to control what it does consciously. One may concentrate in performing a bodily skill, but not on the sequence of actions that constitute
that performance.

In contrast to both these cases, higher cognitive capacities have an internal locus of control: What directs them, what leads them ultimately to
govern our behavior, lies within us. This control is not always conscious
but it is neither environmental nor bodily and is mediated by “what is in
table 8.1 Locus of Control and Representational Type
Type of Organism/ Example in
Locus of Control Representational System Humans
environmental reactive reflexes
bodily enactive mimetic skills
cranial symbolic beliefs, desires
the head.” Symbolic representation makes for truly voluntary behavior,
free action, genuine choice, and rationality. Some would say that symbolic
representational systems are uniquely human, or that they are what make
language, a social life structured by conventions, and rich cultural traditions possible. Table 8.1 summarizes the three types of representational
system, and some of what I have said about them.

Given this view of higher cognition, it is perhaps natural to think that
cognitive psychology, at least in studying such higher cognitive capacities,
should focus just on what is in the head. It should bracket off what the
head is in and maintain that the symbols that it is concerned to understand supervene on the intrinsic, physical states of not just the individual,
but of the brain. In short, higher cognition is individualistic.

The plaint of this chapter is that this final conclusion is mistaken.

Before turning to the substantive discussion, a brief sketch of why I think
even so-called higher cognition is best viewed from the externalist point
of view.

3 the embeddedness and embodiment
of higher cognition
All three areas of cognitive psychology that I will discuss in this chapter –
memory, cognitive development, and folk psychology – have a metarepresentational edgeto them in that they involve the representation of representations. Metarepresentation epitomizes much of what I have said about
symbolic representational systems. It has been thought to characterize,
and even to uniquely identify, human intelligence. It is a prerequisite for
rational reflection and deliberation, and for living one’s life in accord
with goals, plans, values, and ideals. If the locus of control as we move
from reflexes to bodily skills to symbolic abilities becomes increasingly
internal, increasingly removed from the direct effects of what the head is
188 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
in, then surely metarepresentational abilities go one further step in this
direction. And if an internal locus of control makes for an individualistic
perspective, then externalists should face an uphill battle in trying to
make sense of these abilities.

What I would like to do is grant the symbolic nature of cognition and
the idea that cognition has an internal locus of control, and show how neither leads to individualism. But this simply makes space for an externalist
view of cognitive psychology. What reason is there to occupy this space?
A common theme in my discussion will be that as we move from simpler
to more complicated cognitive processing in our accounts of memory,
cognitive development and folk psychology, the pressure to move from
an individualistic to an externalist psychology increases. Far from being
the province of an inwardly withdrawn mind, metarepresentation and
the levels of cognitive performance that it facilitates belong to the mind
as it is located in the social and physical world.

The strategy of argument that I shall use in making a case for an externalist cognitive psychology will draw on an inversion of the trichotomy
between reactive, enactive, and symbolic representational capacities. I
will argue that many cognitive capacities in symbol-using creatures, far
from being purely internal, are either enactive bodily capacities, or worldinvolving capacities. These capacities are not realized by some internal
arrangement of the brain or central nervous system, but by embodied
states of the whole person, or by the wide system that includes (parts of)
the brain as a proper part (Table 8.2).

Enactive bodily capacities and the embodiment of cognition more generally are important in their own right. But understanding the ways in
which higher cognition is embodied can also be instrumental in showing the limitations to encoding views of representation that underpin
individualistic views of the mind. Since my primary concern is to show
how higher cognition extends beyond the boundary of the individual, I
table 8.2 Higher Cognition and Its Realizations
Cognitive Capacities in
Symbol-Using Creatures Realization of the Capacity
purely internal internal cognitive arrangement
of the brain
enactive bodily cerebral + bodily configuration
world involving cerebral arrangement + environmental
configuration
shall concentrate more heavily on world-involving capacities than enactive bodily capacities in what follows.

4 memory
Memory has been one of the most active areas of research in psychology.

From Ebbinghaus’s initial experiments on the recall of lists of nonsense
syllables to current PET or fMRI research on the localization of particular
memory systems, the bulk of this research has reflected psychology’s origin as an experimental discipline. There is, I think, a real question about
the scope and ultimate value of the bulk of the work in this tradition, a
question that has manifested itself in recent debates over the relationship that such research bears to everyday memory, memory in the wild,
memory as it is used in our day-to-day lives. Over two decades ago the
cognitive psychologist Ulric Neisser provocatively stated that
the results of a hundred years of the psychological study of memory are somewhat discouraging. We have established firm empirical generalizations, but most
of them are so obvious that every ten-year-old knows them anyway. We have made
discoveries, but they are only marginally about memory; in many cases we don’t
know what to do with them, and wear them out with endless experimental variations. We have an intellectually impressive group of theories, but history offers
little confidence that they will provide any meaningful insight into natural behavior. Of course, I could be wrong: perhaps this is the exceptional case where the
lessons of history do not apply, and the new theories will stand the test of time
better than the old ones did. ... But because they say so little about the everyday
uses of memory, they seem ripe for the same fate that overtook learning theory
not long ago.3
For all that has happened in the past twenty-five years, there is little reason
to revise this general judgment.

Part of Neisser’s point about the experimental tradition in memory
research is that the near exclusive concentration on controlled conditions under which one finds a significant difference between two groups
of subjects has led many investigators to forget what memory is for, what
it does for us as individuals in our day-to-day lives. “Real life” memory –
for example, on memory as it is used by an individual to construct narratives about what has happened to her, or on memory as it operates in
eyewitness testimony in the legal system – is the remedy that Neisser himself sees as a way of rectifying this deficit in traditional memory research.

Reconceptualizing the study of memory as a form of externalist psychology can contribute to this general project of reenvisioning memory.4
190 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
Consider first the classic “storehouse” model of memory that derives
from a brief comment that the philosopher John Locke made in An Essay
Concerning Human Understanding. Locke says
... This is Memory, which is as it were the Store-house of our Ideas. For the narrow
Mind of Man, not being capable of having many Ideas under View and Consideration at once, it was necessary to have a Repository, to lay up those Ideas, which
at another time it might have use of.

While Locke is often credited with originating the storehouse metaphor
in this passage, what is seldom noted is that having introduced it, Locke
immediately warns us about how it should be understood, with this
passage continuing:
But our Ideas being nothing, but actual Perceptions in the Mind, which cease to
be anything, when there is no perception of them, this laying up of ourIdeas in the
Repository of the Memory, signifies no more but this, that the Mind has a Power,
in many cases, to revive Perceptions, which it has once had, with this additional
Perception annexed to them, that it has had them before. And in this Sense it is,
that our Ideas are said to be in our Memories, when indeed, they are actually no
where, but only there is an ability in the Mind, when it will, to revive them again.5
Here Locke is cautioning against reifying memory as a storehouse for
ideas, since he holds that ideas, including memories, exist only when they
are perceived consciously by the mind. Locke is also, I think, suggesting a
more dispositional conception of memory. If this is correct, then there is
a question whether this ability is, as Locke says, “in the Mind,” or whether
it is what, in Chapter 6, I called an extrinsic or wide disposition.

The psychologists Asher Koriat and Morris Goldsmith have noted that
while the storehouse metaphor has structured the bulk of memory research over the last hundred years, this metaphor has been challenged
in recent years by research that draws on what they call the “correspondence metaphor.” According to this view, it is of the essence of memory to
correspond to some past state of affairs, rather than simply to act as a storehouse for readily identifiable chunks of data. The storehouse metaphor
facilitates a conception of memory as a place that can contain a finite
number of individual units, and thus suggests that memory be studied
in terms of the quantification of those units. By contrast, the correspondence metaphor is conducive to investigating and assessing memory in
terms of the accuracy of the contents of the memory, where this is not
simply a matter of how much is remembered.6
The correspondence metaphor of memory invokes a taxonomically
externalist conception of memory. That is, what individuates memory
so conceived in general from other types of cognitive processes (for example, imagination, fantasy, wishes) is the relationship memory bears to
past, experienced states of affairs in the world. Moreover, there is a second
way in which the correspondence metaphor relies on a taxonomically externalist conception of memory. What individuates particular memories
from one another, on this view, is at least in part what they are memories
of or about, that is, their intentionality. On this view, that memories are
not simply self-standing encodings but records of events and episodes in
the world is an important fact about them, not something that should be
factored out or bracketed off in investigating them.

Ulric Neisser has recently claimed that the underlying metaphor structuring real-life memory research is not that of correspondence, but one
of “remembering as doing,” with emphasis given to the activity of remembering, rather than the results of that activity, things called “memories.”In
this respect, Neisser’s view is interestingly like Locke’s dispositional gloss
on his storehouse metaphor. This conception of memory in the experimental literature has its locus classicus in Frederic C. Bartlett’s influential
Remembering. Bartlett criticized the view of memory as a storehouse of images or traces, arguing instead that remembering, as an activity, was essentially a constructive process. With some misgivings, Bartlett adapted the
term “schema” in referring to the “active organization of past reactions.”
In tracing parallels between the role of schemata in individual memory
and conventionalization in societal remembering, Bartlett laid the foundation for the development of the theory of cultural models that has been
influential in recent anthropology and ethnology.7
This performative, enactive, or constructive model of memory opens
the way for a locationally externalist conception of memory, where what
is enacted does not simply stop at the skin but involves engaging with
the world through cognitively significant, embodied action. On this view,
internally stored memories lose the privileged role that they play on the
storehouse conception and become simply one resource that is used in
the act of remembering. What are critical are acts of remembering, and
while these use internal resources they also take place through bodily
activity that is, in turn, engaged with the world. Remembering, on this
view, involves exploiting internal, bodily, and environmental resources in
order to produce some sort of action, often social in nature.

To adapt Neisser’s own examples, to tell a joke or recite an epic tale
is not simply to make certain mouth and body movements, any more
than it is to produce a certain number of items from memory or to recall something accurately. Rather, it is to make a suitable impact on an
192 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
audience there and then through one’s memory-driven actions. We can
conceive of such memory itself as extending into the world through the
way in which it engages with and appropriates external symbols, treating
them in just the way that internal symbols are treated, and thus giving us
a locationally externalist cognitive system.

Such a conception of memory is operative in the psychologist Merlin
Donald’s view of the evolution of human cognition. On Donald’s view, the
critical transition that makes distinctively human cognition possible is the
formation of what Donald calls the external memory field. This is constituted
chiefly by visual symbols and the devices that generate them, and these
derive from human cultural achievements, such as the development of
writing systems and pictorial conventions. We have hybrid minds that
combine internal with external symbolic processing. In more recent work,
Donald has developed this view with an eye to highlighting its implications
for consciousness and its evolution.8
Following Donald, the philosopher Mark Rowlands points not only
to visuographic representations but also to the role of bodily grounded
mimesis as providing a new form of semantic memory, one that allowed
for the development of both learned bodily skills and the communication of sophisticated information about one’s self and its environment.

Rowlands also identifies sound, including spoken language, as an external
medium for memory, one whose patterns of repetition, such as rhyme and
rhythm, allow complicated sound patterns to be remembered. Sound and
the patterns that can be generated through it constitute external memory
resources, and provide the basis of the oral traditions that characterize
all human cultures even in the absence of permanent external vehicles
of representation, such as writing systems.9
Thus, this general idea can be developed without restricting oneself
to thinking of memory exclusively in terms of symbols. For example, we
can think of the performative memory system that extends beyond the
head of the individual as incorporating aspects of an individual’s environment that are nonsymbolic, including the agent’s bodily orientation
and actual objects in her environment. So conceived, enactive, procedural memory that is locationally wide is an extension of traditionally
conceived procedural memory. The idea that procedural memory may
involve doing things with one’s body, while itself old hat, does suggest
an idea that seems more novel: that one may remember by doing things
with one’s environment. Perhaps even this idea is old hat; after all, we all
know that we can use environmentally cued mnemonics, such as tying a
piece of string around one’s finger, or leaving a note on the refrigerator.

My suggestion is that these need not simply be prompts to remember
but themselves are ways of remembering – ways that involve a sustained,
reliable causal interaction between an organism and its environment. The
magnitude of our symbol-laden environments should be taken seriously,
and to do so is to see the mind as extending beyond itself, that is, as being
constituted by such symbols and thus as locationally wide.

To make this graphic, consider the popular problem-solving game for
children, Rush Hour. The game is played on a square board made up
of thirty-six small squares that are snuggly fitted by cars (of length two
squares) and trucks (of length three squares). The cars and trucks are of
various colors and can be placed either horizontally or vertically on the
board. The aim of the game is to move the cars and trucks sequentially
so that a designated car (the red car) can proceed to the sole exit on
the board. The game comes with two-sided cards. One side depicts the
way in which the cars should be set up initially (Figure 8.1, with the red
car designated “X”). The other side provides a code for completing a
series of sequential moves sufficient to solve that particular “rush hour”
problem (Figure 8.2). The first move, in the game depicted, is to move
car G one square to the right. And in just forty-six more simple moves
you’re home free!
The way in which most of us go about solving even a relatively simple Rush Hour problem involves a sustained perceptual and cognitive
figure 8.1. Rush Hour: A Problem
194 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
(a) (b)
figure 8.2. (a) and (b): Rush Hour: A Solution
interaction with a highly structured environment. The board of fixed dimensions, the rules for the movement of the cars and trucks, and the
objective of the game all structure and constrain what we can do in playing the game. But in playing it we do not simply encode all of this and
then solve the problem. (Go ahead, be my guest!) For most of us, at any
rate, that is not possible. Rather, we solve the problem by continually
looking back to the board and trying to figure out sequences of moves
that will get us closer to our goal, all the time exploiting the structure
of the environment through continual interaction with it. We look, we
think, we move. But the thinking, the cognitive part of solving the problem, is not squirreled away inside us, wedged between the looking and
the moving, but developed and made possible through these interactions
with the board.

Of course, there is a second way to solve any given Rush Hour problem (apart from asking your kids to do it). Set up the board, flip to the
“answer side” of the card, read off the code, and move each car or truck
accordingly. (This was actually my six-year-old daughter’s preferred solution, after she got the hang of the game – and perhaps after she tired
of my fumbling around with standard ways of proceeding.) While we
might be tempted to think of this as involving a problem-solving technique that is more purely internal, note how much external structure
even it exploits. There is the labeling of the cars and trucks on the board,
the code for each move, the convention that we read from left to right,
both in each encoded move and from one instruction to the next. We
then have to put all of that together with finding the car corresponding to the symbol, moving it in accord with the instruction, then finding
our place back on the solution card (lose your place there and you’re
dead).

The first point to make is that much of our everyday cognition is more
like the first way than the second way of solving a Rush Hour problem.

We are geared to interact cognitively with external structures. This is not
simply because of our memory and reasoning limitations. Rather, it is
because in doing so we can take advantage of both the rich environmental
structures that we find all around us and our ability to control ourselves
and adjust our relationship to those structures. The second point is that
even the second way of solving the problem, the method intuitively that
relies on encoding rather than exploitation, is still not purely internal
and symbolic in how it proceeds. With both methods the mind extends
itself beyond the purely internal capacities of the brain by engaging with,
exploiting, and manipulating parts of its structured environment.

The externalist perspective is most compelling in cases in which systems of external symbols come to change, in significant ways, the cognitive capacities of individuals who interact with them. Most striking
here are cases in which an organism, such as a bonobo, develops in
a symbol-enriched environment and subsequently displays massively increased symbolic capacities. Consider Kanzi, the human-raised bonobo
that has been central to both the life and research of the primatologist Sue Savage-Rumbaugh. Kanzi has been thoroughly enculturated,
and engages in sophisticated linguistic communication through a 256-
symbol keyboard that he can carry with him. Given Kanzi’s actual developmental environment, Kanzi plus a 256-symbol keyboard forms a
cognitive system with memory and other cognitive capacities that far
exceed those of just Kanzi. (Much the same holds true of Alex, Irene
Pepperberg’s African grey parrot.) My point here is not the trivial one
that enriched environments can causally produce smarter critters; rather,
it is that what metaphysically determines the smartness of at least some
critters is their being part of wide cognitive systems. To connect this
back to Donald’s views of human cognition and its evolution, we are certainly such creatures, although I also think that we are not alone in this
respect.10
In illustrating this perspective by invoking these exotic sorts of case I
do not mean to imply that memory is locationally wide only in extreme or
unusual circumstances. Rather, the real import of these cases is that they
196 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
provide us with a way to think about everyday, human memory. Both our
day-to-day acts of remembering and the systems that those acts involve are
locationally wide, drawing as they do on the symbolic and nonsymbolic
environments that we individually and collectively create, from the more
obvious forms of external storage devices, such as notepads, diaries, books
and memos, to the daily routines we form to structure our lives and the
habits that form us and the structure of our lives. This is not chiefly a
developmental point, one about how we come to possess rich internal
structures, memories, that guide our lives; nor is it a claim about what
stimulates or prompts particular acts of memory. Rather, it is a claim
about what is at the heart of memory, what memory is: It is a locationally
wide ability that creatures like us have that allows us to make use of the
past in acting for the future.

Such a conception of memory is implicit in the work of those, such
as Michael Cole and Paul Connerton, whose interests lie in the use of
memory in specific, culturally mediated activities. Cole develops the
Vygotskyan view of cognition as a mediated activity that relies as much
on external as on internal symbols, symbols that are culturally loaded
and are to be understood in terms of their location in a broader cultural
system; I shall discuss it further in section 5 on cognitive development.

Connerton, by contrast, views what he calls social memory not primarily
as inscriptional, a matter of encoding, but as performative in nature,
where the performances establish both individual and cultural habits.

The idea of procedural memory, and the distinction between procedural and episodic memory, is well entrenched in individualistic paradigms
within psychology, and Connerton extends this idea to apply collectively
to whole groups of individuals. Performances, things that we do, are
both bodily and ritualistic in that they involve the repetition of the performance in light of the perceived past, where this past is the shared past
of a group of individuals. Performance is memory in action.11
Although Connerton’s argument concentrates on specific rituals in
just one historical episode – the ritualistic beheading of Louis XVI in the
French Revolution and the ways in which body posture and dress style
changed in the aftermath of the revolution – the conception of social
memory that he develops is quite general. It applies to how we greet
others; how we lock and unlock our doors; how and what we eat; the
forms of entertainment we engage in; our work styles and choices; how
and where we sleep; what, whether, and how we drive; how we read; how
we die. Individual habits and civil rituals act reciprocally to influence
both how individual and collective memories are constructed, and the
way in which they direct individuals and societies. This perspective on
memory invokes a wide psychological conception, a reason why it marks
a somewhat radical departure from memory as it has been chiefly studied
within departments of psychology. In the little that I have said here, I hope
it is clear that such a conception of memory was not, however, always alien
to the experimental tradition of research. In fact, it would have been quite
familiar to someone like Bartlett.

There are two caveats to enter about the externalist conception of
memory that I have advocated here. First, “memory,” like “cognition,” is
something of a catch-all term, and the phenomena it refers to are ubiquitous in our mental lives: in language acquisition and use, the performance
and learning of skills, communication and socializing, daily routines, and
any form of employment. If memory is externalized, then so too is much
of our cognitive life. While I have suggested that we think of memory as a
locationally wide system that constitutes a form of exploitative representation, I don’t mean to impose a false unity on the diverse manifestations of
memory in everyday life. Second, both Donald and Rowlands present externalist conceptions of memory in terms of the distinctions traditionally
used to characterize memory – between episodic and semantic memory,
implicit and explicit memory, procedural and declarative memory, and
long-term and short-term memory. This enhances the impression that the
externalist view of cognition is primarily an extension of existing ways of
thinking about memory beyond the head, and I have followed Donald
and Rowlands part of the way here. Yet if truth be told, many of these
distinctions seem to me to be problematic, to be understood and used
inconsistently by psychologists, and to stand in need of radical rethinking. Insofar as the externalist view suggests further modifications to how
memory is conceptualized, some of these may be extensions of existing
dichotomies, others replacements for them.

In concluding my discussion of the claim that mental states have a
wide realization in Chapter 6, I raised and addressed the question of
whether this entailed that the subjects or bearers of such states were
themselves locationally wide, that is, larger than individual organisms. A
similar question can be raised about conceptualizing memory in terms
of a locationally externalist system: Does this mean that memories do
not belong to individual people, but are only a part of some collective
memory or (worse) free-floating cognitive flotsam?
The short answer is “No,” and we can explain why by returning again
to the idea of a locus of control. We do have forms of external memory
storage, such as diaries, which while deriving from (and often recording,
198 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
in part) an individual’s mental life, can exist beyond the life of their
author and come to be accessed as a form of memory by others. And
each time any one of us speaks or writes in a communicative context, we
create tokens of external symbols that constitute a common symbol pool
from which each of us draws. But these become integrated into an overall
cognitive system that we control, and that control is critical to cognition
being ours and to bearing on our lives as agents. Each of us forms a
core part of a specific wide memory system, one in which we serve as a
locus of control. And that is why the individual remains the entity that
has memories, even if memory is neither taxonomically nor locationally
individualistic.

5 cognitive development
Research on cognitive development, particularly that of the last twenty-
five years, has produced fascinating data about the richness of the internal representational structures that infants and young children have. This
research has brought with it a sea change in how children’s minds are
conceived, implying that children have significantly richer, more specific
knowledge than previous research had indicated. Moreover, the corresponding cognitive mechanisms that generate such knowledge appear
to be in place at significantly younger ages than previously thought, in
some cases at birth or shortly thereafter. The common-sense view, largely
accepted and developed within earlier developmental psychology, holds
that cognitive abilities are heterogeneous across children, they develop
largely through learning and other forms of environmental interaction,
and anything like adult abilities only begin to appear after the age at
which children begin formal schooling in Western societies. By contrast,
the picture of cognitive development painted by the research of the last
twenty-five years is one of widely-shared abilities with a rich, innate component that differ from those of adults in many ways but not in terms of
their basic cognitive nature.

To make this contrast more concrete, consider two striking examples.

One might think that the concept of number is acquired by the child
through long-term exposure to basic mathematics at a relatively late age,
or that the concept of a physical object is acquired through an inductive
extrapolation from exposure to instances of physical objects over time.

Intuitively, the possession of each of these concepts seems to be a cognitive achievement gained through relevant experience with the world. Indeed, this was the accepted view of these concepts within developmental
psychology, largely due to the influence of Piaget’s interactionist view of
cognitive development. By contrast, the “new” developmental psychology,
using sensitive (and clever) experimental techniques, indicates that infants early in their first year of life are already acting in ways that imply
that they have some concept of number and of physical object. At this
age, there has been no instruction in mathematics, and little opportunity
to extrapolate from instances. Thus, the data suggest that these concepts
are not acquired in these ways. Moreover, these concepts seem present so
early in the life of the child that there is reason to think that they are not
acquired at all, but instead are innate, part of the intrinsic endowment
of the child, with the development of these concepts merely triggered by
environmental stimulation, not shaped by it.12
This strand of nativism in recent work on cognitive development corresponds to one dimension I identified in strong nativist views of cognition in Part One, the external minimalism thesis. This work also manifests the other dimension to strong nativist views, the internal richness
thesis, through its commitment to the modularity of cognitive development. Characterized generally, the new developmental psychology views
preschool children and infants as having domain-specific, cognitive modules, including not only modules for knowledge about physical objects
and number during infancy, but also those for biology, social relationships, and minds. This knowledge ascribed to infants and young children
has typically been understood in terms of the child’s possessing a theory
about the relevant domains, which lead her to expect certain outcomes
rather than others, and thus behave in some ways rather than others.13
Like the maturational view of cognitive development that endorses the
external minimalism thesis, this aspect to contemporary research puts it
at odds not just with common sense but with much of the earlier work on
development. Included here is work conducted within an associationist
framework, and that within the Piagetian, constructivist tradition, each
of which has claimed that cognitive development is driven by domaingeneral processes, such as learning and stage-relative decalage. These ´
recent claims not only fly in the face of the received folk and scientific
wisdom of the past, but also raise many questions about the nature of
development that were previously unasked.

For example, if infants begin with at least some domain-specific, conceptual knowledge, how is that knowledge used in the development of
children’s later domain-specific knowledge? Given the characterization
of the child as a theorist of sorts, what is the relationship between the
child and the scientist, or between development and scientific change?
200 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
What place is there in this conception for more global, domain-general
processes in cognitive development of the sort that had, until recently,
populated the mind of the child within developmental psychology? Such
questions are the subject of ongoing research within the “new” developmental psychology.

There are limitations to the individualistic way in which this paradigm
thus far has been and can be developed. There are also natural ways to
extend the gambit of a developmental psychology that incorporates and
builds on its insights. The massive redescription of the nature and extent
of the child’s knowledge at the heart of recent developmental psychology
has concentrated on the structure of an infant or child’s internal mental
representations, on what it is that the child does or doesn’t know about
the relevant domain at a given age, and on the internal mechanisms governing developmental change. If infants and children know significantly
more than theorists had previously ascribed to them, as they appear to,
then views of later developmental changes will also almost certainly need
to be modified, since the state of (say) the three-year-old from which the
(say) eight-year-old develops is not what it was once thought to be. But
ultimately this nativist emphasis within the new developmental psychology must move beyond the head in making sense of the full pattern of
cognitive development.

One way of augmenting the resulting individualistic perspective on
development is via the mediational approach that derives from the work
of the Russian psychologists Lev Vygotsky and Alexander Luria in the
1930s that I mentioned in passing in the previous section. Motivating
this view was, in Luria’s words, the idea that
[t]he chasm between natural scientific explanations of elementary processes and
mentalist descriptions of complex processes could not be bridged until we could
discover the way natural processes such as physical maturation and sensory mechanisms become intertwined with culturally determined processes to produce the
psychological functions of adults.14
This idea carried with it the working assumption that individual mental
abilities are significantly modified by the various mediational tools that
they employ. Such mediators include maps, tools, and other artifacts,
numerical systems, memory aids, and, most importantly for Vygotsky,
spoken and written language. All such mediators are not only cultural
products in that they are the products of particular cultural histories and
thus are available to an individual only within the corresponding cultural
contexts. In addition, they are employed primarily within the context of
social interaction and facilitation, typically in small groups or dyads. As
Vygotsky says, “The path from object to child and from child to object
passes through another person. This complex human structure is the
product of a developmental process deeply rooted in the links between
individual and social history.”15
For Vygotsky, higher thought processes, such as remembering, attending, and speaking, are essentially mediational, and thus social. Cognitive
development is not, like embryological development, primarily the unfolding of existing structures in accord with some fixed, biological program, but a dialectical or dynamic process that involves in-the-head mental structures, beyond-the-head mediators, and the social context in which
they interact. Humans have natural psychological abilities, but these are
qualitatively different from the forms they take when they are deployed
together with specific mediators. Attention or memory without the direction provided by spoken, communicative language or other external
aids, are fleeting and transient. Literacy, the ability to read and write, itself
augments and restructures significant aspects of thought and language,
including the size of the lexicon, the development of metalinguistic abilities, and strategies of memorization. Employed with the mediators of
spoken and written language, these core cognitive capacities become enhanced abilities that make a qualitative difference to the sorts of things
that children can do.16
If this is true of higher cognitive processes in general, then it is true
of the domain-specific processes postulated by the new developmental
psychology. This suggests a natural direction in which to shift the focus
of research attention: In investigating the conceptual changes within a
given domain, or the emergence of new domains of thought in childhood, look outside of the head and consider how it modifies the child’s
“theory of X.” In emphasizing both the social and dynamic nature of
cognitive processing and its development, it should be clear how the
Vygotskyan perspective ascribes an integral role to the environment outside the individual. The external environment does not simply cause
changes in a child’s internal mental structures but in a literal sense comes
to constitute part of new, locationally wide abilities, which are then used
to interact with other mediators, leading to further locationally wide abilities, and so on. Once such wide, mediational abilities are established,
they can then be transformed and internalized by individuals and thus
decontextualized from their initial context of acquisition.

A part of the child’s environment that serves as a crucial mediator
across a range of contexts is other people. Here some work within the
202 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
recent “theory of X” approach in developmental psychology shows convergence with some of the conclusions central to the Vygotskyan tradition.

The work that I shall discuss in the remainder of this section focuses on
explanation and how a grasp of it develops in children over time.17
A striking paradox about explanation and how it is cognized turns on a
triad of claims. First, explanation is a crucial and ubiquitous part of much
of everyday life. Second, its ubiquity in our day-to-day dealings with one
another seems to reflect the various “theories” that we have about corresponding domains. Yet third, the level at which we are able both to offer
and understand explanations is amazingly shallow. What I mean by this
is simply that explanations typically stop or bottom out surprisingly early
on. Consider an intuitive example from the developmental psychologist
Frank Keil. Although almost everyone who owns a car can give some sort
of explanation as to why their car starts (or doesn’t) when the key is placed
in the ignition and turned, few of us are able to respond with any depth to
even the next few follow-up “why” or “how” questions. The shallowness in
this case is the norm: We rarely have ready access to explanations of any
depth for all sorts of phenomena for which we are able to offer some sort
of explanation. Indeed, we often carry with us what Leonid Rozenblit and
Frank Keil call an illusion of explanatory depth until we are faced with the actual task of explanation. Thus, people frequently seem to think they have
vivid, fully mechanistic models of how something works or how it got the
way it did. But when forced to state explicitly that mechanism as an explanation, their own intuitions of explanatory competence are shattered.

Although overconfidence in one’s abilities has been experimentally
documented in a range of domains, this experimental work has been
recently extended to apply to explanation in particular. For example,
Rozenblit and Keil asked college students whether they know how various familiar devices work, such as flush toilets, piano keys, and zippers.

Subjects were given a list of forty-eight familiar items, and asked to use
a seven-point scale to rate how well they understood how each worked.

They were then given a four-item test list and asked to produce a detailed,
step-by-step causal explanation for each item on this list, followed by a
series of reratings of how well they understood each of these items following their attempt to produce an explanation and their reading of expert
explanations. Rozenblit and Keil also ran versions of the experiment with
facts, narratives, procedures, and natural phenomena.

The general finding of this series of studies supports the original claim
that Keil and I made about the shallows of explanation: There is an illusion of explanatory depth in ordinary people’s understanding of familiar
devices. Many subjects assert or imply that they have a complete and fully
worked out understanding such that they could explain all the necessary steps in any process involving the object. Yet when asked for such
explanations, a large percentage of these participants show striking inabilities to put together a coherent explanation, missing not just a few
arbitrary details, but critical causal mechanisms. Until they attempt such
explanations, they are often under the illusion that they have a complete, “clockworks,” vivid understanding. The inflation in the estimate of
one’s ability to provide an explanation seems not to be general, since the
pattern of results obtained in the device condition was not repeated in
the facts, narrative, or procedure conditions, although it was repeated in
the natural phenomena condition. Thus, there seems to be something
about our knowledge of both familiar devices and natural phenomena
that creates this illusion of explanatory depth. Rozenblit and Keil suggest
that these domains promote the illusion because they are sites at which
a series of confusions converge. For example, people mistake something
like the perceptual vividness of familiar devices and natural phenomena
for the richness of their own internal representations, and their understanding of these at their functional or operational levels with that of the
underlying causal mechanics.

Apart from the illusion of explanatory depth itself, what is striking
and relevant for developmental paradigms that emphasize the nature
of underlying theories that guide cognitive development is the lack of
explanatory depth itself. Missing in adults seems to be the sort of theoretical understanding of the underlying workings that anything more
than a skeletal theory in the relevant domain would surely provide. The
shallows of explanation thus pose a prima facie problem for accounts of
cognitive development that ascribe to the child a theory of the relevant
domain, which is then added to or modified through development. This
is because the shallows of explanation we observe in adults seem to be
due to a sort of theoretical abyss. The gap between the limited explanations that suffice for the purposes at hand and those that we believe
ourselves to have is due ultimately to a lack of corresponding, detailed
theoretical knowledge that would allow us to provide more satisfying,
detailed explanations. That is, the shallows of explanation are not due
simply to contextual or pragmatic features of the practice of explanation,
or from general processing or access abilities. Rather, it stems from something central to the “child’s theory” view of cognitive development: the
absence of detailed theories themselves.

This implies that the problem in the triad generating the paradox concerning explanation (ubiquity-theory-shallows) lies in the second claim:
that explanations reflect an individual’s theoretically rich understanding
204 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
of some phenomenon. If explanation is theoretically shallow, how can it
also be ubiquitous?
What makes explanation both ubiquitous and shallow is a certain division of cognitive labor, one which makes detailed theoretical knowledge
in the head of each individual unnecessary, a division akin to the social division of labor central to Putnam-Burge externalism. We rely on
knowledge in others extensively in our explanatory endeavors (as in our
linguistic endeavors), and we rely on the assumption of knowledge in others to give us a sense of explanatory insight. Everyday folk know enough
about the “nominal essences” of the things that they interact with on a
regular basis in order to be able to offer relatively shallow explanations for
their behavior. But there are also experts who have either the within-level
or across-levels knowledge that the folk typically lack, and who are in a
position to offer explanations with more depth. Although we are faced, as
individuals, with the theoretical abyss as the norm, the theoretical knowledge that we lack exists somewhere, just not in our heads. This is to say
that explanation and the theories that underwrite their depth, are wide:
They do not supervene on an individual’s intrinsic, physical properties.

This reliance on the knowledge of others in explanatory understanding seems to be a feature that even preschool children recognize, as recent work by Donna Lutz and Frank Keil indicates. For example, a child
might be told that Bill knows all about why two magnets, if turned the
right way, stick together; and that John knows all about why a china lamp
breaks into pieces if it falls off a table. The child is then asked who knows
more about why television screens get all fuzzy sometimes during thunderstorms. Even preschoolers will cluster explanations about electricity
and magnetism together to a greater extent than either of those explanation types with mechanics. There is no doubt that they are in nearly full
ignorance of any specific mechanisms, yet as early as the age of four they
have some sense of how some explanations are more likely to be related
in the minds of experts. (In this particular example they may be keying
into notions of invisible forces and action at a distance.) As Lutz and Keil
report, even three-year-olds have a sense of how knowledge is clustered
in the minds of at least some experts, although this knowledge is far less
secure and extensive than it is at four.

One may think that this simply reveals more complexity to the internal
structure of the child’s mind than one might have initially suspected. Indeed, die-hard strong nativists and individualists might even see it as providing evidence for another module, that for deference to others! But this
would be to miss the significance of these results and their relationship to
those concerning the illusion of explanatory depth. What both indicate
is not simply that children are built to rely on the knowledge of others but
that their actual reliance limits the extent to which internally rich structures are needed to understand the world around them and function
effectively in it.

This cognitive division of labor and the relatively impoverished, internal cognitive structures that go with it are instances of more general
features of cognition. As we rely on other people, so too do we make
use of information in the world more generally. And as we have at least a
skeletal understanding of what others know (and who knows what), so too
do we have “modes of construal” of the various ways in which properties
are causally clustered and distributed in the world. The general point is
that throughout much of development, and long before formal schooling, a set of framework explanatory schemata are at work and seem to
be essential for further theory growth and conceptual change. This suggests the basis for some rapprochement between the new developmental
psychology and a mediational view of cognitive development.18
Vygotsky himself had a specific, general view of how mediational abilities developed. All mediational abilities, he claimed, begin as interpsychological abilities, abilities that are developed and manifested only in social
relations between individuals. This is a consequence of his “general genetic law of cultural development,” which says that
[a]ny function in the child’s cultural development appears twice, or on two planes.

First it appears on the social plane, and then on the psychological plane. First it
appears between people as an interpsychological category, and then within the
child as an intrapsychological category.19
While this is plausible for communicative abilities, it is incompatible with
the results of what I have been calling the new developmental psychology, even Keil’s modes of construal tempering of it, which indicate the
theoretical and conceptual sophistication that young children bring to
cognitive tasks “on the social plane.”
In any case, Vygotsky’s “law” seems less plausible for the full range of
forms that even mediational cognition can take. For example, many of the
mediational devices that have been culturally developed, such as maps,
signs, and even numerical systems, can be and are used by individuals
from the outset, particularly once they have already acquired related
psychological abilities. They do not appear to have the double existence –
first on the social plane, and then on the psychological plane – that
Vygotsky’s law attributes to all higher cognitive processes. But even if some
206 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
mediational cognition is not tied as closely to a social context as Vygotsky
seems to have thought, the more general point that mediational cognition
is ontogenetically prior to many of the higher cognitive processes that are
the focus of individualistic psychology gives us reason to rethink what it
is we are discovering when we discover the “child’s theory of X.”
I want to conclude the substantive part of this chapter with some
thoughts about externalist psychology and the child’s theory of X, where
X = mind.

6 folk psychology and the theory of mind
We are mindreaders. The explosion of work over the last twenty years
in both cognitive development and primatology exploring the developmental and evolutionary origins of this ability has largely construed the
capacity itself as a theory of mind, a theory that attributes folk psychological states to agents, and that allows one to predict and explain an agent’s
behavior in terms of the relationships between those states, perception,
and behavior. Folk psychology itself forms a core part of many areas within
psychology, including work in social cognition, group dynamics, and decision making. Philosophical discussions of folk psychology concentrating
on the relationship between folk psychology and a truly scientific psychology have sometimes implied that such work could form no part of a
truly scientific psychology. Yet such eliminativist conclusions have not garnered widespread support either in philosophy or in psychology. Here I
focus my discussion of our mindreading abilities on the end state of these
ontogenetic and phylogenetic processes, the folk psychology that we end
up sharing and relying on in everyday life.

Folk psychology has played a prominent role in the debate between
individualists and externalists, beginning with the widely accepted conclusion from the Putnam-Burge thought experiments that folk psychological
states are externalist. In Part Two, I argued that we should see this as entailing that folk psychological states have a wide realization, and that folk
psychology itself is a type of wide cognitive system, one that involves the
social relations between individuals. But what of the underlying capacity
or disposition that each of us has to construct such a folk psychology?
The large and growing literature on our mindreading abilities has, by
and large, treated this capacity as an individualistic system, a theory of
mind module or the child’s theory of mind.20
In discussing this I want to distinguish between our bare-bones folk
psychology, belief-desire psychology, and a richer conception of folk
psychology, one that includes the full range of psychological states, such as
emotions (anger, elation, fear), moods (restless, horny, inattentive), and
sensations (pain, experiencing red, tickling). I shall refer to this richer
conception as full-blown folk psychology. Consider, first, bare-bones folk
psychology.

It is plausible to think that the capacity that normal human adults have
to ascribe belief and desire to one another is both locationally narrow and
taxonomically wide. It is locationally narrow because the realization of the
capacity is purely internal to the individual who has the capacity. But it is
taxonomically wide because beliefs and desires are individuated, in part,
by their intentional content, that is, what they are about, and such content
is wide. This is so whether one thinks that this ascriptive ability operates
via a theory or via acts of imaginative simulation. Bare-bones folk psychology admits of what we might think of as an intellectualist construal, one
in which the ability itself is purely internal to the cognitive agent, and
I suspect that this is one reason why it has been the focus of attention
in the “theory of X” tradition. Matters are less straightforward, however,
when one considers both the full-blown capacities we have for folk psychological explanation and some of our more advanced deployments of
folk psychology.

Consider full-blown folk psychology, which augments bare-bones folk
psychology with a heterogeneous bunch of further states and capacities
that the folk readily attribute to one another. Apart from the various emotions, moods, and sensations already mentioned, full-blown folk psychology includes character and temperament states (sturdy, reliable, happygo-lucky) and global cognitive assessments (rational, intelligent, scatty).

It is much less plausible to think that the realization of the capacity to
ascribe full-blown folk psychology is purely internal than to think so in
the case of bare-bones psychology. That is because these states have a
felt component, whether it be experiential or bodily (or both), and it is
difficult to see how one could accurately and reliably ascribe such states
to others without knowing what they were like in one’s own case. Such
knowledge itself is procedural and has a bodily realization in that it involves not simply having one’s brain in some internal state but, at least,
having one’s brain and body in a certain state.

The most obvious ploys for proponents of the theory view of folk psychology would be to argue that (i) full-blown folk psychology can be reduced to bare-bones psychology, or (ii) however important experiential
and bodily aspects are to the acquisition of folk psychology, they do not
form part of its realization, which is purely internal. Both of these options
208 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
and 6: (i) would seem to involve either the sort of hierarchical decomposition that I argued against there, while (ii) overlooks or simply dismisses
wide realizations as a species of total realization. Even if we conceded
that bare-bones folk psychology was individualistic, both strategies would
seem to manifest one or another form of smallism.

My claim, then, is that the move from bare-bones to full-blown folk
psychology involves a shift from a purely internal mental capacity to a
bodily enactive skill. But I also want to suggest that some of our most
sophisticated deployments of folk psychology, such as understanding a
complicated narrative about the mental lives of others, and manipulating
another’s full-blown folk psychology – involve a symbolic capacity that
is world-involving. In such cases, folk psychology starts to look not just
taxonomically but locationally externalist.

Consider narrative engagement that involves understanding the fullblown folk psychology of characters in a literary, dramatic, or cinematic
genre. To understand, say, a certain kind of novel one must not only ascribe full-blown folk psychological states to the characters in the novel
but also understand those characters’ (partial) views of the world, a world
which naturally includes other people. (Very effective novels in this respect include Vladimir Nabokov’s Lolita or Ian McEwan’s The Innocent or
Amsterdam.) As you read deeper into the novel, you must modify your
representations of the folk psychological representations that each character has. But since the metarepresentational load here increases dramatically with the complexity of the portrayal of the characters and their
relationships to one another, it is no surprise that even partial expertise
typically involves knowing how to find one’s way about in the novel. It involves
knowing how to locate and identify the folk psychological representations
that respective characters have, and the signs of these in the novel itself.

Here the representations that are the object of your own representations
are located somewhere other than in your own head. In short, this understanding involves constructing a representational loop that extends
beyond the head and into the minds of the fictional characters – and
perhaps the narrator or even the author – with which you are engaged.

Perhaps unsurprisingly, much the same is true of appreciating the fullblown folk psychology of real people, especially those to whom you are
close. Our representations of the mental lives of companions and friends
are more sophisticated not simply because of the added internal complexity such representations have in our own heads, but because they
index richer mental representations in the minds of one’s companions
than those in the minds of strangers. Rather than simply encoding information about these mental representations, we engage and interact
with them, and in so doing extend the system of mental representations
to which we have access beyond the boundary of our own skins. As with
our reliance on cognitive artifacts to bear some of the representational
load borne during a complicated cognitive task, here we exploit rather
than replicate the representational complexity of our environments. But
unlike at least the cases of distributed cognition that I have discussed in
which the individual is displaced as the unit of cognition, here individuals remain both the unit of cognition and the locus of representational
control, with interactions with external representations augmenting the
internal representational systems of individuals.

Both the case of narrative engagement and that of locationally wide,
full-blown folk psychology involve representational capacities whose locus of control is still, by and large, internal. But such a locus of control
is not an essential feature of full-blown folk psychology, even if in many
instances it is a pervasive feature. We can come to rely on others psychologically in such deep ways that we in effect surrender our autonomy, or
have it stripped away from us. A final word about such cases and their
relationship to the externalist mind.

Consider, first, cases in which one person has blind devotion to and
trust in another, which can involve close kin relations, lovers and life
partners, or religious believers and their spiritual leaders. In extreme
cases, the thought and action of the trusting party is given over to that of
the trustee. When that happens we have a locus of control that is external
to the trusting party. As with these other forms of locationally wide folk
psychological systems, the cognitive capacity here is world involving, with
the relevant folk psychological representations being located both inside
and outside of a given individual’s head. The folk psychological states of
the trustee come to form a part, a controlling part, of the folk psychology
of the trusting party, effectively displacing some of the higher cognitive
capacities of that individual.

Suppose, for example, that sustained deception arises in a relation of
blind devotion or trust. From the perspective of the deceiver, manipulator, or person trusted, the locus of control here remains internal. But from
the perspective of the deceived, the manipulated, or the person trusting, their representational folk psychological states are controlled by folk
psychological states beyond what we usually think of as their own mind.

There are, I think, many real-life situations that approximate this sort
of case, even if few involve pure blind devotion and trust. They may involve
210 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
partial or mutual psychological dependencies, enhanced or diminished
cognitive functioning, asymmetrical power relations, or sustained deception and manipulation. It would be close to the pure cases that the self,
the subject of psychological states, is no longer bounded by the body, and
where separation of the trusting and trustee approximates the severing of
a physical boundary within an organism. This provides one way to think
about the death of a loved one, or the betrayal of personal trust, and the
psychology of the grief or anger that follows in its wake.

7 the mind beyond itself
Dissatisfaction with the idea that mental representation is simply a form
of encoding has motivated a variety of ways of thinking of the mind as
embodied and embedded. While some radical, early expressions of both
connectionism and dynamic approaches to cognition implied that the
notion of representation itself was the source of the problem, for the most
part representation has been reconceptualized rather than consigned
to the dustbin of Bad Ideas. By articulating the notion of exploitative
representation in Part Two and showing how it applies to higher cognition
in this chapter, I have presented a view of the mind as encultured, as
embedded in social and technical networks, and as constructed through
its extension beyond the boundary of the individual.

Although I have said less about the mind as embodied, I think that the
exploitative view of representation can be applied to make sense of the
embodiment of cognition as well, where the body becomes another resource that cognitive systems use to work their magic no different in kind
from cognitive resources in the environment to which the individual is
coupled. Recent representational views that emphasize the embodiment
of cognition, such as those of George Lakoff and Mark Johnson, Arthur
Glenberg, and Rick Grush, different as they are from one another, maintain what we might think of as a Cartesian bias in thinking of cognition
in terms of what lies within the skin – ideally, the brain – of the individual cognizer. In this respect, I suspect that they remain too closely
wedded to encoding views of representation. Mental representation is
metaphorically structured (Lakoff and Johnson), operates through embodied encodings (Glenberg), or is processed through inner dynamical
models or emulators (Grush). We need to look beyond both head and
body in thinking about mental representation.21
There is a more conservative and a more radical strand to the argument in this chapter for adopting an externalist perspective of cognition.

The more conservative strand works with the idea that a range of psychological states and processes are taxonomically wide in that how they
are individuated, classified, or taxonomized relies on factors outside of
the head, and thus do not supervene on the intrinsic, physical properties of individuals. By applying this strategy not just to the philosopher’s
favorite, (bare-bones) folk psychology, but to a range of states and processes in subpersonal psychological theories, one can see that taxonomic
externalism is not simply an implication of the Putnam-Burge thought experiments but implicit in much existing psychological explanatory practice. I suspect that, particularly amongst cognitive psychologists, there will
remain the feeling that taxonomic externalism remains merely a metapsychological perspective on explanatory practice, rather than a view that
actively guides the research that is done within the cognitive sciences
themselves.

Such a view is more difficult to sustain with respect to the more radical
strand to the argument, the one that holds that at least some psychological states and processes are locationally externalist: In a literal sense, they
physically extend beyond the head of the individual who has them. Much
of the discussion in this and in the previous chapter has focused on both
examples of this type of externalist psychology and general features of
cognition that make this a viable paradigm for structuring psychological research. Locational externalism appeals to the ways in which cognition, particularly human cognition, relies on and incorporates physical
and social aspects of the environment of the individual. The contextsensitive view of realization in Part Two provides a missing link between
a materialist metaphysics and such an externalist psychology. The accompanying explanatory strategy of integrative synthesis does the same
for methodology and explanatory practice in the cognitive sciences and
externalism.

While psychologists and cognitive scientists themselves may not view
the metaphysics here as all that relevant to the type of science they develop, the direction of research in the cognitive sciences has been shaped
by the general sense that a properly scientific psychology should be individualistic, in much the way that it was shaped in a previous generation by the sense that such a psychology should be behavioristic. Views
of what there is, of what you need to postulate (or can’t postulate) in
your ontology to do your science, are often not far beneath the surface
of explanatory practice. In particular, by scratching a little at the idea
that cognition is a form of symbol-processing, we were able to identify
why individualism might seem a necessary or desirable view of cognitive
212 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
psychology, whether or not one held in addition a computational view of
the nature of these symbols and how they are processed.

The externalism developed in this chapter takes the symbolic nature
of thought seriously but suggests that internal symbols are simply one
kind of cognitive resource used in memory (as constituents of a storehouse), cognitive development (as constituents of theories), and in folk
psychology (as constituents of beliefs). External symbols are an obvious
second kind of cognitive resource used in cognitive processing, but simply to see externalists as adding external to internal symbols would be
to mischaracterize the shift in perspective implied by the externalism I
have defended. For the central notion becomes that of a cognitive system. Some cognitive systems are wide, and some contain both internal
and external symbols. But enactive, bodily cognitive systems, such as wide
procedural memory systems, may be conceptualized in terms of explicit
symbols only with some strain, as may wide perceptual systems that involve the extraction of information that is usually thought of as non- or
subsymbolic.

A large part of the significance of mind-world coupling lies in its iterative nature. We take part of the world, and learn how to incorporate
and use it as part of our cognitive processing. That, in turn, allows us
to integrate other parts of the world that, in turn, both boost our cognitive capacities and allow us to cognitively integrate further parts of the
world. And so on. Although some recent discussions of the embeddedness of cognition have focused on novel and future technologies – from
cell phones, to electronic implants, to telerobotics – the two most signifi-
cant forms of iterative scaffolding are older than the human species: the
advent of spoken language (itself a scaffold for much higher cognition
and written symbol systems), and the cognitive dependence of infants on
their parents (the mother of all inventions?).22
With that in mind, we can see how externalism departs from the smallist views that typically drive researchers to look further “into” the brain
in search of cognitive systems. Rather, the externalism I have defended
suggests that in order to understand central aspects of cognition we look
not to what’s in the brain but what the brain is in. Memory, the process
of cognitive development, and folk psychology as they actually guide the
cognitive lives we lead are embedded cognitive systems, and much of the
embedding framework is social.

In both species of externalism that I have discussed, the individual
remains the subject or bearer of psychological states, even if she no
longer serves as a boundary demarcating the entities of a respectable
psychological science. At the end of the previous section I introduced
cases in which this is no longer true – where subjectivity itself may no
longer be easy to locate – but I think that such cases, unlike those involving locationally externalist cognitive systems, are rare. Thus, this is one
respect in which the individual is a focal point even for an externalist
psychology.

To further extend this externalist account of the mind, I turn in the
next chapter to consciousness.

9
Expanding Consciousness
1 the return of the conscious
Although the 1990s was officially the “Decade of the Brain” in the cognitive sciences, judging by the volume and range of literature, for philosophers of mind it was, rather, the “Return of the Conscious.” From early
in the decade, works such as John Searle’s The Rediscovery of the Mind and
Owen Flanagan’s Consciousness Reconsidered aimed to restore consciousness to center stage in the philosophy of mind. This restoration was in
part a way of correcting a distortion that the cognitive revolution’s emphasis on unconscious mental processing had wrought, initiating a culture in
which discussions of consciousness could be held without philosophical
embarrassment. By the end of the decade, the philosophical literature on
consciousness had outstripped that on any other topic in the philosophy
of mind.

To be sure, much of the work on consciousness in the last dozen years
or so has attended to or even stemmed from research in the neurosciences. But perhaps the issue that has most engaged philosophers of
mind has been whether the neurosciences or indeed any physical science could reveal all there is to know about consciousness. Claims that
there would, of necessity, remain some sort of explanatory or ontological
gap between the world revealed by science and conscious phenomena
themselves had been articulated and defended by Thomas Nagel, Frank
Jackson, and Joseph Levine more than twenty years ago. Such claims have
more recently received a reinvigorated examination by David Chalmers
in his The Conscious Mind, the most widely discussed book by philosophers
of mind since at least D. M. Armstrong’s A Materialist Theory of the Mind.

1
214
In this chapter, I do not attempt to review this literature, nor develop
a substantive, comprehensive theory of consciousness, which I suspect
is an illusive goal (more on which in a moment). Rather, I shall focus
specifically on the implications that the sort of externalist psychology
that I have defended in the last two chapters has for consciousness and its
study. Consciousness has seemed especially problematic for externalists,
involving mental phenomena – ranging from pain to visual experience
to self-knowledge – for which internalist accounts have seemed prima
facie inescapable. In general terms, conscious mental phenomena have
appeared to be so intimately or immediately related to facts about the
conscious subject, their bearer, and so distantly or mediately related to
facts about the world of that subject, that externalism has faced an uphill
battle in presenting itself as even a possible view of consciousness.

2 processes of awareness and phenomenal states
To begin, let’s review a sampling of the range of mental phenomena that
have been regarded as either being conscious or being at the heart of
consciousness:

bodily sensations, particularly the feelings one has through the senses
of touch or proprioception 
pain, particularly intense or acute pain 
visual experience, particularly that of color 
higher-order cognition, cognition with mental states as their objects 
attention, particularly that directed at aspects of one’s experience of
the world 
introspection, being reflection of some sort on one’s own mental life,
including one’s self
Specifying the relationship between any of these phenomena, as well as
how each is to be understood – what processes each involves, what is essential to each, what role each plays in consciousness – takes one immediately
into the various debates over consciousness. I shall proceed by focusing
on particular phenomena on this list and considering externalism with
respect to each.

At the core of the chapter is articulation of what I call the TESEE
conception of consciousness: consciousness as Temporally Extended,
Scaffolded, and Embodied and Embedded. In sections 3 and 4, I focus
on aspects of consciousness that are thoughtlike – higher-order cognition, attention, and introspection – what collectively I shall call processes of
216 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
awareness, first introducing (section 3) and then arguing for (section 4)
an expanded view of such processes. The TESEE conception of processes
of awareness complements the externalist view of cognition already developed in Chapters 7 and 8.

One further question is how well such an externalist view accounts
for the “other half” of consciousness – pain, bodily states, and visual
experience – what I group together as phenomenal states. Recently, philosophers such as Michael Tye, Bill Lycan, and Fred Dretske have attempted
to extend externalism from its roots in characterizing intentional phenomena to consciousness by adopting a representational view of the phenomenal. Although the relationship between the intentional and the
phenomenal will be the focus of the next chapter, in section 5, I consider
Dretske’s view, in particular a dilemma argument that he uses to motivate
his externalism about the phenomenal. The discussion here will set the
scene for considering views of at least some phenomenal states that exemplify the TESEE conception of them in section 6. Here I will draw on
recent work by the philosopher Alva Noe and the psychologist J. Kevin ¨
O’Regan on the sensorimotor contingency theory of visual experience,
and by Susan Hurley on consciousness more generally. As we will see,
especially in sections 7 and 8, there are limitations to how extensive an
externalist account of the phenomenal can be, and there are various ways
in which the TESEE view stops short of the sort of “global externalism”
defended by Dretske and other representationalists.

There are two reasons for suspecting that a general theory of consciousness will prove illusive. The first is that, as suggested by the six kinds of
mental phenomena I presented as examples of conscious states, such a
theory either has to lump quite diverse phenomena together, or explain
why some are more fundamental as conscious mental phenomena than
others (and treat just those). Even though I view as useful the categorization of these into processes of awareness and phenomenal states, and
shall show ways in which the TESEE conception of consciousness illuminates both, there are important differences between these two categories
of mental phenomena, as well as within them.

The second is that the demands placed on a theory of consciousness
come from many different quarters. These range from demands peculiar to philosophers – such as those sometimes imposed within the explanatory gap literature or work on the problem of self-knowledge – to
constraints that derive from facts about neural processing or limits to the
accessibility of consciousness within cognitive neuroscience and psychology. These demands sometimes apply primarily or paradigmatically to just
some subset of mental phenomena considered conscious (thus interacting with my first reservation), or address distinct aspects to consciousness.

We are in the same position as are those searching for a theory of matter
that satisfies both idealists, who think that all there is are ideas – and so
need to be shown how any theory of matter is compatible with that –
and physicists who are convinced that matter exists but disagree about
whether it is continuous or particulate, uniform or differentiated.

3 expanding the conscious mind: processes
of awareness
Consider higher-order cognition, attention, and introspection, what I
refer to collectively as processes of awareness. These are sometimes
thought of as processes that characterize distinctively human consciousness, though they have also been deployed in offering a general account
of consciousness. For example, so-called higher-order theories of consciousness (HOT) propose that consciousness is awareness. On HOT
views, what makes a given state conscious is that it is the object of some
other, higher-order mental state of a particular kind. In keeping with
my general aims in this chapter, here my focus will not be on such theories but instead on the processes that they posit and their relation to
externalism about the mind.

I shall suggest that processes of awareness call out for a radical rethinking along externalist lines, one that turns on taking locational externalism
about consciousness more seriously than it has been taken, even by externalists about the phenomenal. The argument here will be similar to
that given in the previous chapter, where I argued that our conceptions of
memory, cognitive development, and folk psychology should be explicitly
refashioned along externalist lines. At the heart of this reconceptualization are three features of processes of awareness that have usually been
ignored or downplayed: They are temporally extended; they are typically scaffolded on environmental and cultural tools; and they are both embodied
and embedded. Let me take each of these in turn.

In both the philosophical and psychological literature, processes of
awareness are usually thought of as enduring for very short periods of
time. The sort of first-person introspection or retrospection on one’s
own mental states that allows philosophers to conceptually analyze the
products of processes of awareness, and psychologists to experimentally
record reports and other outcomes of those processes, are temporally
quite limited. (Seconds for philosophers, milliseconds for psychologists.)
218 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
It is this conception of processes of awareness that generates many of the
classical problems in each field. For example, consider Hume’s problem
of the elusive I, the self being difficult to detect amongst the fleeting
objects of awareness that one finds in introspection. Or consider a version of the binding problem, the problem of accounting for how various
aspects of experience are bound together to form a seamless, relatively
unified experience, given the different ways in which these aspects are
processed within the organism. Both problems presuppose a conception
of consciousness as operating on a timescale of seconds or less.

These forms of the processes of awareness are important to cognition, but they are not the only form that such processes take. As Merlin
Donald has pointed out, there is a more temporally extended form that
awareness takes, enduring minutes or hours, that is especially significant
for human cognition, for without it we would not be able to perform
many of the tasks that are uniquely human (or near enough so). Constructing or following a narrative, planning to and then acquiring a given
motor skill, and negotiating a crowded street in a car or on foot are
three examples of such actions that we perform not simply while conscious but at least sometimes consciously. The processes that generate
such actions temporally extend beyond the limit of the second hand.

Such tasks are ubiquitous in everyday, waking life, and they involve an
agent who is both embodied and embedded (more of which in a moment). Both culturally and individually we construct perception-action
cycles that involve attuning ourselves to the world, and the world to ourselves. Many such cycles are constituted primarily by conscious experiences and acts, and their temporal extension, over minutes or hours, goes
hand-in-hand with their spatial extension beyond the brain of individual
cognizers.2
This temporally and spatially extended conception of processes of
awareness makes it easy to understand consciousness as environmentally
and culturally scaffolded. Although the cognitive role of specific, culturally developed tools, such as navigation equipment, clocks, and maps,
has been acknowledged in some recent thinking about cognition, there
has been a concentration in this literature on symbolic devices and symbols and their interaction with the cognizers. One consequence of this
is that the scaffolded nature of processes of awareness and cognition
more generally appears as a relatively esoteric, specialized addition to
biological cognitive systems, the cream on the cake of cognition. This is
seriously misleading, for the range of scaffolding involved in processes of
awareness is extensive, and includes, in addition to humanly constructed
symbolic devices, a range of environmental and social structures that are
appropriated by cognizers.

For example, systematic, reflective, cognitive use has been made of
natural features of land and sky, such as the position of the sun or the
shift in position of landmarks, in traditional seafaring navigation. These
natural features play similar roles that cognitive devices play in modern,
Western navigational practices. To take another example, a road itself can
be as important a cognitive resource as signs along that road or a map
that shows where the road leads. Individuals who want to get from A to
B need to be appropriately coupled to all of these resources. In neither
case need we think of such cognitive resources as symbolic in nature,
or as carrying meaning in and of themselves. What is crucial about such
scaffolds for processes of awareness is that they are causally integrated
into what can be complicated, conscious actions that simply could be not
performed without them. Their integration, their causal connectedness
to the individual cognizer, extends not only that individual’s cognitive
abilities, but expands her consciousness.3
Once we adopt a temporally extended view of consciousness and start
looking for scaffolding in everyday mental life, examples multiply. In the
section on cognitive development in the previous chapter, I said that both
spoken language and written language serve as mediators that change
the structure of cognition, and much the same is true of consciousness.

The written word and all that invokes it – from labels on packages, to
directional signs, letters, books, advertisements, addresses, codes, computers, scientific instruments, t-shirts, shopping lists, cards, the Western
educational system, law courts, and bureaucracy in general – is ubiquitous in how we cognitively negotiate our daily lives. Its integration into
our conscious mental lives alters the very processes of awareness that
constitute consciousness through augmentation. Those processes now
incorporate the written word, just as the processes of awareness of speaking creatures came to incorporate speech into consciousness. In each
case, consciousness itself relies on, and expands to include, such external
scaffolds.

A second, general source for mental scaffolding, as suggested in my
discussion of folk psychology in the previous chapter, is other people.

Others often constitute cognitive resources that can be accessed fairly directly (for example, by asking them) or in more indirect ways. If we accept
that cognitive resources can be distributed across individuals, then it is a
small step to viewing these resources as sometimes the object of processes
of awareness. But let me say something more about the third plank to the
220 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
view of processes of awareness I am articulating – the embodiment and
embeddedness of such processes – before taking this small step.

Temporally extended processes of awareness are embodied and embedded not simply in that they are processes of organisms, organisms
have bodies, and these bodies exist in environments. This is banal. Rather,
conscious life in the time scale of minutes or hours involves agency, and
agents, at least the sorts of agents that we are and all examples that we
know of are, exercise their agency in the physical world through their bodies over extended periods of time. There is no other way to act. And bodies
gain traction with the physical world through reliably causing changes in,
and in turn by being changed by, that world. No environment, no bodily
action; no bodily action, no agency; no agency, no temporally extended
processes or awareness.

The countervailing claim that we can imagine such processes taking
place without either or both a body and an environment at all has a
rich philosophical history, from Descartes’s evil demon hypothesis to
brain-in-a-vat thought experiments. Does the TESEE view of consciousness deny that we can imagine processes of awareness going on in such
cases? Two related replies. First, such imaginings are typically radically underdescribed, and they often become incoherent once they are imagined
more fully. More pointedly, I have found that disagreements over what
can and can’t be imagined here often turn on one’s prior philosophical
commitments, and that makes me suspicious about relying too heavily
on such claims of imaginability. So, while I am sympathetic to arguments
that point to problems with completely disembodied and disembedded
consciousness, I think that methodologically it is wise to steer clear of
a commitment here. Second, the TESEE view of consciousness is a view
of how consciousness works as a matter of fact for creatures like us with
bodies in environments, rather than of necessity for any creature that we
think we can imagine having the very same processes of awareness as us.

One need not have a view of the latter in order to have a theory of the
former.4
The previous paragraphs suggest an argument from the temporally
extended nature of processes of awareness to the further claims about
agency, embodiment, and embeddedness. But in fact I think that the
argument could be run from any one of these claims to the others,
since they form a cluster of claims that stand or fall together. If this is
right, then the position I am advocating needs to be either accepted
or resisted in toto; there is no middle-ground position. Thus, the tempting idea of viewing processes of awareness as temporally extended, but
taking the somatic and extrasomatic resources they involve as simply inputs for internal processes of awareness to operate on, is a nonstarter. If
one expands consciousness on one of these dimensions, one expands it
on all.

There are thus two sorts of arguments that need to be made to support
this position. The first should make a prima facie case for this conception
of processes of awareness being a package deal, so that the only live
options are two: Accept or reject the package. The second should then
argue for the former over the latter of these options.

4 arguing for expanded consciousness
Much of the previous section constitutes a start on the first of these tasks,
since it proceeded by showing how accepting one part of the package
leads to accepting other parts. But we need also to show that there is
no privileged starting point in this conception of processes of awareness.

Consider the following argument, which draws on the premise that processes of awareness – higher-order cognition, attention, and introspection – involve not only various sorts of access to environmental resources,
but that these are properly thought of as cognitive resources for the individual.

(1) Processes of awareness involve accessing and using cognitive resources.

(2) Some of these resources lie beyond the head of the individual.

(3) Accessing and using these resources requires acting on the world in
specific ways (through eye and head movement, bodily orientation
and motion, manipulation). [2]
(4) Even accessing and using internal cognitive resources (for example, memories, perceptions) often requires such bodily action
and worldly engagement through mnemonics, intention-fixing,
rehearsal and repetition, talking to oneself, doodling. [1]
(5) The actions required in 3 and 4 typically occupy a temporal extension of many seconds, minutes, or even hours. [3 and 4]
(6) So processes of awareness are temporally extended [5], scaffolded
[2], and embodied and embedded. [3 and 4]
I take it that the most controversial premise in this argument is 2.

An individualist who concedes 1 (and perhaps 4), might think that she
can embrace the temporally extended nature of processes of awareness,
222 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
and so a version of 5 and 6, without going externalist. This would be to
concede that consciousness is temporally extended and relies on environmental resources, while denying that the beyond-the-head resources
are cognitive.

Traditionally, the mind is conceptualized as beginning and ending
inside the head. We can express this view as implying two things about
the cognitive resources that constitute the mind. First, they lie exclusively
in the head, and second, they do not strictly require bodily action and
worldly engagement to be cognitive resources. Suppose that we attempt to
tackle the argument for the TESEE view of consciousness by staying close
to the traditional view of the mind on just the first of these two points.

That is, suppose that we have a head-bound view of cognitive resources,
but acknowledge that these internal cognitive resources often interact
with the world beyond the head in their role as cognitive resources. In
effect, this would be to attempt to cede both 1 and 4 in the argument,
while denying 2 and 3. Can such a position be defended?
One reason to think not is that the very processes that 4 concedes
involve resources in the world. If these processes are cognitive, then these
are cognitive resources. Hence 2. What is needed is a way to deny that
processes of awareness are ever themselves embedded. But the range of
examples that we have seen in the previous section makes this prima facie
implausible. The chief and perhaps most obvious way to deny this is to
defend the view that there is a fundamental asymmetry between what is
inside the head and what is outside of it, such that only the former can
constitute processes of awareness. An encoding view of representation
would fit the bill, since then resources inside the head would code for
those outside the head, but not vice-versa. But I have argued against such a
view in the previous chapter. I see no nonquestion-begging way to defend
the requisite asymmetry.

On the view of representation as exploitative that I have developed,
individuals or cognitive systems exploitatively represent objects, properties, events, and propositions, but the boundary of the individual does
not mark the place where representation begins or ends. States inside the
head are caused by, and carry information about, states outside the head,
but they bear this same relation to states of the body. Applying this view
to processes of awareness that operate through bodily action beyond the
limit of milliseconds and seconds makes it particularly difficult to distinguish as cognitive resources just those states that occur inside the head.

As we manipulate our relationship to the world through action – whether
it be through physical grasping with the hands in object manipulation,
head or eye movements in visual attention, talking to oneself or another
in figuring out what one thinks – we also cause changes in those parts
of the beyond-the-head world. Processes of awareness often have a phenomenology, can be “directly” activated or accessed, and have a subjective
dimension. But as both internal and external resources play crucial and
similar roles in these processes, it is arbitrary to assume that the processes
themselves begin and end in the head.

Thus, it is problematic to maintain just the first part of the traditional
view of the mind, that it lies in the head, while granting that there is some
sense in which processes of awareness are temporally extended and embodied and embedded. So suppose instead that we look to uphold both
parts of the traditional view, conceding less to the TESEE conception. In
terms of the argument for TESEE that I have given this would be to reject
4 as well as 2 (and so 3), or maintain only an individualistic version of 4.

This is clearly possible, but at a price. For then the only processes of awareness the argument encompasses are those that don’t involve bodily action
and worldly engagement. This would exclude much higher-order cognition and attention, both of which are often worldly directed, and even
large parts of introspective practice, which is seldom purely internally
directed. More importantly, there seems little sense in which processes of
awareness could be temporally extended, rather than a series of temporal snapshots strung together, since nearly any such process that endures
many seconds, minutes, or hours does involve precisely what the denial
(or modification) of 4 prohibits. Thus, removing 2, 3, and 4 from the
argument also removes, or at least radically attenuates 5. This reinforces
the sense that the elements of the TESEE conception form a package,
and need to be accepted or rejected as a whole.

Now, to stage 2: The defense of the conception of processes of awareness as temporally extended, scaffolded, and embodied and embedded,
the TESEE conception. There are two chief, general, related desiderata
to appeal to here: to account for as full a range of mental life involving
processes of awareness as possible; and to deliver a conception of such
processes that shows how such processes are integrated with the rest of
cognition.

On the question of integration, how well one thinks this view integrates with the rest of cognition will depend on what one thinks the
rest of cognition is like. In Chapters 7 and 8, I sketched a view of both
computational and noncomputational psychology in which the ideas of
exploitative representation and locational externalism played a central
role. Most relevant for thinking about processes of awareness, is the
224 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
externalist conceptualization of memory, cognitive development, and
folk psychology, introduced in the previous chapter. For a strong case
can be made for seeing continuity between such processes and processes
of awareness. This is in part due to the metarepresentational edge to
these processes, involving, as they often do, the representation of representations. The theme developed in that chapter was that there was some
pressure to move from individualistic to externalist conceptions of such
processes as we considered the more sophisticated and real-life forms
that they took. The same is true of processes of awareness.

Take higher-order cognition, which is typically characterized as explicitly metarepresentational. The simplest example of such a process is that
of occurrently thinking about or entertaining some other thought you
have. Suppose that you are sitting in a room, eyes closed, and you do
this. The second-order thought is distinct from simply having the corresponding occurrent first-order thought. Intuitively, it involves something
in addition, some further mental process whose object is that first-order
thought. There is some pressure to construe such examples of higherorder cognition as taxonomically externalist; in effect, this was argued
with respect to memory in the previous chapter. But consider more complicated instances of this sort of process that are common in everyday life.

Consider, for example, the higher-order cognition you have when you
are reflecting on whether your beliefs or opinions are consistent, or engaging in a conversation whose aim is to resolve a dispute over values, or
writing up a sort of informal balance sheet that allows you to explore how
realistic it would be for you to seek to achieve a long-time goal. These
are all processes that typically involve you doing something, from reading
over your diaries, to drawing on the views of others, to making diagrams,
notes, and annotations. As such, they depart from the simple case we began with and its Cartesian overtones. The something that is done involves
the body’s interactions with cognitive resources beyond the head. This
action is possible only because the relationship between what is inside
the agent and what is beyond its boundary is reliable and systematic, and
thus can be taken for granted in acting.

If this is correct, then this is one respect in which the externalist views
defended here offer a way to treat conscious and unconscious cognitive
processing in an integrated or unified way. The traditional division between higher cognition (what I have referred to as “cognition central”),
and processes of awareness as forms that consciousness takes is an artifact of history and of disciplinary orientation. If we adopt this view of
how processes of awareness are integrated with other parts of cognition,
then the issue of integration becomes entwined with that of its range
of application. For now there is no firm boundary between what I have
been calling processes of awareness and “merely” cognitive processes.

The TESEE conception applies to both.

To avoid one misunderstanding of what the TESEE conception of
processes of awareness aims to do, let me locate that view within the
pluralistic view of cognition that is part of my externalism. The aim in
the preceding and present section is not to tout the behavioristic view
that there is nothing internal to conscious experience, or that processes
of awareness are never purely internal. Sometimes they are. Rather, it
is to suggest that such processes more often involve what is inside the
individual insofar as they are integrated into what that individual does
as an embodied and embedded agent. And more so, rather than less,
as we move to more sophisticated, realistic examples of consciousness in
action. What the TESEE conception challenges is the near exclusive focus
on what is inside the head in thinking about processes of awareness, just as
the introduction of context-sensitive realization, wide computationalism,
and exploitative representation challenge a similar focus elsewhere in
our conception of the mind and cognition.

5 global externalism and phenomenal states
Let us now turn from processes of awareness to the other half of consciousness, what I have referred to collectively as phenomenal states: bodily sensations, pain, and visual experience. However plausible the TESEE
conception of processes of awareness is, it is prima facie more problematic to apply it to phenomenal states. Individualism is a natural starting
point for accounts of such states, even if we grant the externalist view of
computation and cognition developed thus far.

Philosophers have generated a variety of views from the idea that phenomenal states are a sort of internal event, one wedged at the interface between mind proper and world. These include classic empiricist accounts
of the mind, Cartesian skepticism within epistemology, twentieth-century
sense-data theory, and versions of the explanatory gap problem for contemporary materialism. Phenomenal states have typically been regarded
as occurring completely within the boundary of the individual. Thus,
they are at least locationally individualistic. Why think that they are also
taxonomically individualistic?
In the case of at least bodily sensations and pain, this has been taken
to imply taxonomic individualism about those conscious states, typically
226 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
because such states are not thought to have propositional content
(though see below). Thus, the chief feature of mental states that has
been seized on as the basis for viewing them as taxonomically externalist –
their intentionality – is absent in the case of bodily sensations and pain.

What is pain about? Nothing: It just hurts. There is a distinct feel to
pain, and a distinct phenomenology more generally to bodily sensations,
such as those gained through touch. This “raw feel” to pain and bodily
sensations supervenes on just the intrinsic, physical states of the body.

In the case of visual experience, a version of this view has been thought
to hold because there is an aspect of visual experience – how things seem
to me visually here and now – that can be distinguished from the conceptual or propositional content that such experience possesses. Even
if we concede that visual experiences have a (wide) propositional content, there is some further content they have that is narrow, and so taxonomic individualism is plausible for at least this aspect of visual experience. This has sometimes been expressed by saying that visual experience
has nonconceptual content, that this content is individualistic, and that it
plays an important role in understanding the phenomenology of visual
experience.5
Fred Dretske has defended the view, by contrast, that if one is an externalist about conceptual or propositional representational mental states,
then one should also be an externalist about all experiential mental states,
particularly those of visual experience. Dretske holds this view as a function of his endorsement of a representational account of experience that
entails that consciousness is a species of representation. If one is an externalist about representation, then one should also be externalist about
consciousness. Dretske recognizes, however, that to avoid the conditional
being run as part of a reductio against externalism, externalism about conscious experience requires defense. Why should one be an externalist
about phenomenal states?
Dretske’s chief positive argument for this position can be put succinctly. What are phenomenal states? If they are or involve conceptual
or thoughtlike entities, then those states are taxonomically externalist:
They inherit their width from that of the concepts or thoughts they involve. In this respect, phenomenal states are like metarepresentational
or higher-order mental states, and the sorts of arguments that motivated
externalism about intentional states apply to them. If, on the other hand,
phenomenal states are completely divorced from conceptual or thoughtlike entities, such that (for example) it is possible for two individuals to
have distinct phenomenal states despite their sharing all their intentional
states (including beliefs about those states), then phenomenal states are
unknowable – even from the first-person point of view. Apart from running counter to how phenomenal states are usually thought of, this in
turn removes whatever ground we might have for thinking that such states
of intentional doppelgangers ¨ are different.6
Although Dretske is concerned in the first instance with sensory states,
he views this argument as applying more generally to phenomenal states,
including pains, emotions, and motivational states. The position that
Dretske defends, or sees as defensible, thus might be termed global externalism, since it holds, or suggests, that externalism is true of all mental
states. William Lycan and Michael Tye have also defended such a view.

All three philosophers reach their global externalist conclusion via their
endorsement of a representational account of the phenomenal. Here I
want to focus on global externalism itself, and why it should be resisted.7
At the end of the previous section, I located the TESEE conception of
processes of awareness within the over-arching pluralistic view of the mind
and cognition that I have been developing in Parts Two and Three. I have
also said that I am skeptical about the prospects for a general theory of
consciousness in part because of the diversity among the phenomena and
processes considered as falling within its ambit. These points together
suggest at least a certain caution in speaking of “the mental” or “the
conscious” as categories that we might systematically and globally theorize
about. I suspect that the same is true of “the phenomenal” as a category
about which we might have substantive, interesting, true generalizations.

I include here Dretske’s complex generalization that all such states are
externalist if language- or thoughtlike, and unknowable if not. While
Dretske’s dilemma argument identifies something correct about some
phenomenal states, both horns of the dilemma can be resisted.

This resistance is easiest to mount in the case of pain and bodily sensations, and it turns on the fact that we have ways to individuate such
states other than via whatever propositional content they have. (This
is the truth, I assume, in the idea that such states are not representational at all.) Intuitively, one such way is by an appeal to their phenomenal character, but Dretske’s dilemma argument suggests that there is a
fragility to this sort of appeal, one that may well call into question our
first-person knowledge of the nature of our phenomenal states. Let me
explain.

Some phenomenal states, such as pain or the bodily sensations generated by touch, have an aspect to them that is only distantly related
to language. Subsequently, they have a content that may be difficult to
228 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
express in language. I feel a dull, gnawing pain in my knee area, and
thus come to believe that I have a pain here, but what has been called
the phenomenological content of the former state is not identical to the
propositional content of the latter. If I have another such recurrent pain
in my thigh, it will likely cause me to believe that I have a pain in my
thigh. But if I am attentionally preoccupied, or tired or drowsy, then I
could experience one or the other of these pains without forming the
corresponding belief. I know that I was or even am in pain, but I don’t
know just which pain it is. (Suppose that I have both kinds of pain regularly, and they are not all that phenomenologically distinctive from one
another.) Maybe I form the wrong belief here, or maybe I form no belief
at all. Perhaps I simply register discomfort somewhere or other in my leg,
not conceptualizing it as pain, or as more specifically located.

Suppose we view such states as being thoughtlike, so that they fall
under the first horn of Dretske’s dilemma. Then according to Dretske
they should inherit their content from that of the thoughtlike states to
which they are causally related. Yet it is difficult to say just what this
content is precisely because the relevant thoughtlike states are fleeting
and poorly attended. But insofar as they have a clearly specifiable content,
it seems doubtful that their content is itself wide. Since it both pertains
to a condition of one’s body and is suitably general (because vague),
it seems that at least embodied doppelgangers ¨ must share it. There can
be no externalist contagion from the thoughtlike to the phenomenal if
the thoughtlike states themselves are individualistic. When I think “I feel
discomfort around here,”thinking of what is in fact a pain in my knee but
which I do not conceptualize as such, then this is a state that would seem to
be shared by anything identical to me in its intrinsic, physical properties.

Even though there will be representational descriptions that doppelgangers ¨
need not share (for example, I have a pain in my knee), they are not the only
thoughtlike states that one may have. Thus, the thoughtlike character of
some phenomenal states does not entail externalism.

Suppose, on the other hand, that we view such phenomenal states as
not being thoughtlike (and so as falling under Dretske’s second horn).

Then Dretske’s claim is, in effect, that such states are unknowable, and
that we thereby lack a way of individuating them. Thus, we have no basis
for saying that they are either identical or different in any particular pair
of cases. This claim is effective in undermining the use to which individualists put Twin Earth–styled arguments about phenomenal states, which
is part of Dretske’s own aim here, and it rightly flags some significant
limits to the first-person knowledge we have of phenomenal states. Yet we
should reject the more general claim that phenomenal states lack criteria
of individuation unless they are thoughtlike.

Again, consider the state of pain that leads me to be in the thoughtlike state “I feel discomfort around here.” Even if we think of this state of
pain itself as not thoughtlike, we can still individuate it by reference to
the relevant entity-bounded system. As I said in Chapter 5, states of pain
form part of the nociceptive system, and at least as conceptualized within
the medical communities that focus on pain (anesthetists, oncologists,
pharmacologists, for example), this is an entity-bounded system, and so
locationally individualistic. On this view, the principal entity that is individuated is the nociceptive system, and the individuation of various states
of the system is derivative. The nociceptive system in a particular overall
state will instantiate pain (say, rather than a tickle, or nothing at all), or
pain with a certain representational content, because that is the kind of
state that this type of system instantiates. In short, the systemic conception of individuation and realization defended in Part Two provides a way
of resisting the second horn of Dretske’s argument. Thus, denying the
thoughtlike character of at least some phenomenal states does not entail
externalism.

Consider a variant on the simple example I have focused on so far to
clarify what this response to Dretske’s argument for global externalism
shows, and what it suggests is special about at least some phenomenal
states. I have granted that states of pain have a representational content
but argued that this concession does not entail externalism about phenomenal states via either horn of Dretske’s dilemma. There is something
right about Dretske’s argument, but it does not lead to global externalism
about phenomenal states.

Suppose I feel a strong pain in my left knee for about five seconds, and
so come to think
There is a strong pain in my left knee that has lasted about five seconds.

The representational content of this thought concerns the strength, location, and duration of the pain. We might think, first, that we can thus
individuate the pain itself by the corresponding content: It is strong, occurs in my left knee, has lasted about five seconds, and so on. And, second,
that such content must be narrow. But consider a doppelganger ¨ who lives
in a community that uses “knee” to refer to what we call the knee, plus
the lower half of the thigh area, yet (here, mistakenly) thinks that knees
are just the joint area in the middle of the leg. Suppose that we each
undergo two pains, the first in what we each think of as our knees, the
230 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
second in the lower part of our thighs. Then the thought that we each
report by saying
The first pain was in my knee but the second was not
is one whose wide content differs, depending on which one of us has the
thought. And so if the pain itself is individuated in terms of this content,
then it is an externalist state.

About this, I think Dretske is correct. Since the sort of content that
is typically ascribed to phenomenal states is subject to precisely this sort
of point, the representational nature of phenomenal states often entails
taxonomic externalism about the phenomenal. Perhaps paradoxically,
this is particularly true of the content typically reported in the first-person,
since we tend to characterize our own states more precisely and in richer
detail using a public language than we do the states of others.

Yet contra Dretske, representationalism doesn’t strictly entail such externalism because one can individuate pains other than via this kind of
propositional content. In fact, there are at least two different ways to
do so that together constitute the basis for a response to both halves of
the dilemma that Dretske poses. First, there remains a kind of content –
vaguer, more general, and bodily – for which such Twin Earth examples
cannot be constructed (and so the first horn can be grasped). Second, we
can individuate states in terms of the systems of which they are a part, and
in the case of at least pain and presumably bodily sensations these are entity bounded. Thus, there remains a path to an individualistic scheme of
individuation for those phenomenal states that is independent of their
connections to any kind of content (and so the second horn can be
grasped).

One might wonder whether this response can be generalized in either of two ways. First, might a version of the first half of the response
also apply to the propositional attitudes themselves? Some proponents of
narrow content, such as Frank Jackson, Philip Pettit, and Stephen White,
have suggested that there is such a notion of general narrow content. Second, could a version of the second half of the response be generalized
to apply to phenomenal states in general? This would support the idea
that externalism stops with the intentional and need not infect all of the
phenomenal, some of which remains individualistic. I think that neither
of these generalizations is warranted.8
Consider the first. The notion of narrow content for states of pain and
bodily sensations is quite restricted; I have suggested that it does not apply
even to such states in general. Our usual ways of thinking about our own
states of pain and bodily sensations make use of the same public language
used to specify the content of our intentional states. Dretske is correct in
holding that phenomenal states, so specified, inherit the wide content of
the concepts employed here. Yet there remains something it is like to have
such states that can be specified more vaguely and generally that does not
make implicit commitments to how the physical or social world beyond
the individual is. Once we move to other sorts of phenomenal states,
such as those of visual experience, or to the propositional attitudes more
generally, the Dretskean point about the inheritance of width applies
so broadly that talk of narrow content appears misplaced. To claim, for
example, that the narrow content of
There is some water
is
There is some drinkable, transparent, sailable-on kind of stuff
or
There is some stuff that I use “water” to refer to
is perhaps to identify a psychological state that some doppelgangers ¨ share.9
Yet that state and the content it has is not truly narrow, since doppelgangers ¨
may differ with respect to them. The sort of content that we would need
would be something like
There is some watery stuff
where “watery stuff” refers to stuff that has the appearance of water. Even
were this individualistic (which I doubt), note that it is not something that
has the same meaning as “There is some water,” and not something that
individuals need be in position to use to characterize their own internal
states, since they may lack the concept “watery stuff.”
Whether phenomenology itself might be sufficient to determine an
individualistic form of content is something I shall discuss in more detail
in the next chapter. My point here is simply that the relationship between phenomenology and content may vary depending on the type of
phenomenal state we are considering, and this is sufficient to undermine
the first generalization, from the restricted appeal to narrow content that
I have made.

Consider, more briefly, the second generalization, one that generalizes on the appeal to entity-bounded systems. Why not simply appeal to a
range of entity-bounded cognitive systems – for belief, for perception, for
232 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
motivation, for emotion – in order to undermine Dretske’s claim that phenomenal states divorced from language cannot be individuated? There
are two reasons, perhaps familiar in light of our discussion in earlier
chapters. First, whether any given system is entity bounded or wide is not
simply “up to us,” something we invent rather than discover. Rather, that
is resolved by looking to the relevant sciences: How do they taxonomize
the kinds of system that they traffic in? Second, perception, memory, and
folk psychology all constitute cognitive systems that are not just taxonomically but locationally externalist, at least when we consider the full range
of their uses. Given this, it is plausible to view entity-bounded cognitive
systems as the exception, rather than the rule. Pain and bodily sensations are two paradigms of mental states realized by such systems. Their
assimilation to physiological systems together with the limited role that
wide content plays in their individuation, is a rare combination for cognitive states. For example, I doubt that either feature holds of all forms
of visual experience, particularly given the locationally externalist view of
perception.

6 tesee and sensory experience
In the previous section I intimated that even though Dretske’s dilemma
could be averted in at least the case of pain and bodily sensations, it retained its force against its primary target, individualistic accounts of visual
experience. I have also suggested that the TESEE view of consciousness
applies both to processes of awareness and to phenomenal states. In light
of this pair of points it seems most plausible to develop the TESEE view for
visual experience in the first instance, stepping back to consider sensory
experience and then phenomenal states more generally once we gain a
foot in the door of the phenomenal.

The TESEE view holds that consciousness is temporally extended, scaffolded, and embodied and embedded. As with the application of the
TESEE view to processes of awareness in sections 3 and 4, developing a
TESEE view of visual experience requires reconceptualizing the relevant
aspect of consciousness. Such a rethinking of the nature of visual experience is underway and has been facilitated by a more general paradigm
change in the study of vision. Traditional views of vision conceive of it as
passive, internal, and essentially in the business of generating rich internal
representations. Much of the work on vision over the last dozen years or
so within the cognitive sciences has self-consciously contrasted itself with
tradition here and conceptualized vision as active, embedded, and essentially in the business of generating action. For example, the psychologists
David Milner and Mel Goodale have reinterpreted the original distinction between the “what” and “where” visual systems in the ventral and
dorsal processing streams as systems for, respectively, perception and the
guidance of action. They remind us that “vision evolves in the first place,
not to provide perception of the world per se, but to provide distal sensory control of the many different movements that organisms make.” The
computer scientist Dana Ballard distinguishes literalist from functionalist views of visual representations, the latter of whose “principal tenet is
that the machinery of the brain has to be accountable to the observed
external behaviour, and that there are many ways to do this other than
positing literal data structures.”10
While such views stop short of reenvisioning the kind of experience
that we call visual, they make that reenvisioning possible. I shall discuss
two ways in which a rethinking of visual experience has been undertaken
recently. Both involve abandoning or significantly tempering the idea that
particular states of an individual are phenomenal in and of themselves,
and in light of this they have broader implications for our thinking about
consciousness.

The first of these views has been articulated by the philosopher Alva
Noe and the psychologist J. Kevin O ¨ ’Regan as part of theirsensorimotor theory of visual consciousness. Developed specifically as a view of visual experience, their view holds that seeing is a kind of act that involves an organism
actively exploring its environment. This activity is governed by what they
call sensorimotor contingencies, knowledge of which is gained through
active exploration of an environment, and whose acquisition constitutes
the acquisition of the relevant experience. As O’Regan and Noe say, visual ¨
experience is“the activity of exploring the environment in ways mediated
by knowledge of the relevant sensorimotor contingencies.”11
To explain this view on an intuitive level and how it departs from
traditional views of visual experience, Noe draws an illuminating parallel ¨
between visual and tactile perception. Seeing a bottle is more like tactilely
feeling a bottle than it is like taking a picture of a bottle. When you have
a bottle in your hands, you only make contact with a part of the bottle
at any given time, although you feel the bottle, not simply some part
of it. That is how you would naturally report your experience, in any
case. Moreover, you move your hands to actively explore the bottle in
perceiving it, and this interaction with the sensed environment is not a
way of taking a series of tactile snapshots of the bottle in order to infer
that it is a bottle. Rather, the active manipulation of the bottle is your
tactile experience of it. The tactile experience is not some event inside
you, but something that you undergo in your active exploration. Tactile
234 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
experience, so conceived, is temporally and spatially extended, and since
it requires active exploration of objects in the environment, it is also
clearly embodied and embedded.12
One of the strengths of the sensorimotor view is that it provides a natural way to interpret a range of cases where sensory experience itself seems
to involve or require either explicit or intended action on the part of the
subject. These include well-known cases of adaptation to left-right inverting lenses and those involving change blindness, where scene change
during saccadic motion creates stunning lapses in change detection. On
the sensorimotor contingency theory, the first of these involves a subject
learning a new sensorimotor contingency within one sense modality that
comes to be integrated with the rest of the adapting subject’s behavior.

The second not only reveals the limitations to the information that is encoded in visual representation, but also shows the importance of active
and continual sensory interaction of the surrounding environment for
complete perception.13
The account also predicts that there should be cases of sensory substitution just when alternative sensory channels preserve the same structure
of sensorimotor contingencies. This arguably is precisely what is found
in cases of remote tactile sensing and the visual experiences of users of
tactile visual sensory systems (TVSSs). The best known of the latter of
these use a camera to feed visual information into cutaneous stimulators
attached to the subject’s back, stomach, finger, or forehead, where tactilely stimulated, blind subjects report visual experiences. On the sensorimotor contingency theory, what subjects learn through their practice
in actively controlling the camera is a new series of tactile sensorimotor
contingencies, each of which is isomorphic to those that the visual system
would normally develop.14
Critical to the success of these TVSSs in producing reported visual
experiences in the blind is the ability of the subject to control the
movement of the camera. This makes sense on the sensorimotor theory, since what is critical to visual experience, on that view, is establishing
or maintaining sensorimotor contingencies, not simply receiving or preserving information that codes for visual features of the environment.

(For readers with CAVE – Complete Audio-Visual Environment – virtual
reality experience, note the experiential difference when you walk with
the virtual reality control, as opposed to when you follow someone else
holding the control.) The reported visual experience of TVSSs are, to be
sure, incomplete vis-`a-vis those using their eyes – for example, subjects do
not report seeing objects as colored. But this can be explained in terms of
the limitations to the isomorphism between the visual information that
the subject controls through the camera and the tactile stimulation she
receives on her skin. The relevant (and surprising) finding is that there
is any visual experience reported at all.

Likewise with remote tactile sensing more generally. Tactile sensations
are usually felt at a particular location in the body, but they can also be
felt in objects that extend beyond the body, typically in (and through)
objects to which the body is reliably connected. On the sensorimotor
theory, and TESEE views more generally, this is because sensory experience is a matter of embodied and embedded agents doing things in the
world. While the body is a critical mediator for that action, it forms only a
contingent boundary for sensory experience that can be, and sometimes
is, transcended. Blind people experienced in the use of a cane feel objects in the world, not the cane itself; bicyclists can feel the flatness of a
tire while they are riding, and without touching the tire itself; and experienced hockey players feel the puck on the end of their sticks. Just as in the
case of visual perception using TVSSs, here the phenomenology requires
practice and is more restricted than that gained through regular tactile
stimulation. In particular, the sensations are chiefly spatial in character,
concerning the position, size, texture, and shape of what is felt, and do
not correspond to the full range of bodily sensations. On this view, tactile
sensations are felt at a bodily location, despite the fact that it is in the
brain where they are registered, because the body is systematically linked
to the brain as a matter of physiology. When the body becomes similarly
causally linked to other features of the world, at least some of those felt
sensations can be transferred to those features.

A second way in which a TESEE view has been developed is through
Susan Hurley’s attack on the equation of perception with input (and action with output). Hurley’s alternative idea is that perception and action
are better thought of as forming dynamic cycles. In the previous chapter,
I briefly mentioned Hurley’s caricature of the traditional view of the mind
as a sort of sandwich in which cognition is the filling. Her conception of
perception and action as forming dynamic cycles is one of her positive
alternatives to the traditional characterization of perception and action.

On the traditional view, perception is input and the cognitive architecture of the organism is conceptualized in terms of what Hurley calls
vertical modules:
Each vertical module performs a broad function, then passes the resulting representations on to the next. Within the perceptual module, information about
locations, color, motion, and so on, is extracted from inputs by various parallel
236 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
streams of domain-specific perceptual processing. The representations produced
by the various streams of input processing converge and are combined by perception. The unified result is sent on to cognition, the central module that interfaces
between perception and action.15
The chief puzzles about visual experience on this view are where, when,
and how consciousness of particular features of visual experience come
about, and how they are unified to form the seamless experience that,
for the most part, we typically have.

In challenging this division between perception and action, Hurley
introduces the idea of horizontal modules, content-specific layers that loop
“dynamically through internal sensory and motor processes [as] well as
through the environment.” There are several features of horizontal modules relevant to our rethinking of visual experience. The first is that they
are dynamic in that they involve continuous feedback between perception and action. For this reason, any process that they govern must be
conceptualized as temporally extended, rather than simply as a series
of temporal atoms, and as embodied in an active agent. The second
is that there is no barrier to such modules being either entirely internal to an organism, or extending partly into that organism’s environment and so locationally externalist. Perception does not occur first,
with perceptual inputs being processed “centrally” and then instructions
passed off to action. Rather, the many systems engaged in perceptual
processing, including in the production of the “what it’s like” of experience, cut across the input-output distinction. As with the sensorimotor
contingency theory, on Hurley’s view there is a “there” to sensory experience, but sensory experience is not properly conceived as a type
of internal event, or a property of some specific internal state of the
organism.16
There are several affinities between the views of O’Regan and Noe¨
and Hurley. Like the sensorimotor contingency theory, Hurley’s views
of perception challenge the traditional way of thinking of visual experience as some sort of internal event that is then monitored or processed
further in some other way to give rise to consciousness. And like that
theory again, Hurley’s view makes sense of a range of actual and hypothetical experiments concerning perceptual experience, intention, and
action. These include some of those that O’Regan and Noe also discuss ¨ –
including the left-right inversion prism experiments of James Taylor
and Paul Bach-y-Rita’s studies of TVSSs – but also Ivo Kohler’s classic
experiments with blue-left and yellow-right inverting goggles and cases
of asymmetrical bodily and perceptual neglect.17
Particularly relevant is Hurley’s discussion of the spatial inversion
experiments that Taylor performed using the mathematician Seymour
Papert as a subject. In these experiments, the subject was fitted with leftright inverting goggles, and then trained on a range of tasks that required
moving his body through the actual (uninverted) world. Taylor reports
that Papert adapted to the wearing of goggles fitted with these lenses to
the extent of being able to ride a bicycle with them on, and also readily
adapted to the removal of the goggles, even while riding the bicycle. As
Hurley recounts, to perform successfully on such tasks requires calibrating a range of cognitive systems, including those for motor control and
for proprioceptive feedback and control, for now we have a subject acting in the world, not simply recording information about it visually and
reporting that information. To the adapted subject, the world appears
the right way up, and his performance on a range of spatial tasks suggests
that his adaptation is not simply visual but proprioceptive, intentional
(in the sense of concerning the agent’s intentions), and motoric as well.

What has adapted is the whole subject, or at least cognitive systems that
cut across the perception-action divide of traditional views of perception.

One conclusion that Dretske draws in his argument for global externalism can be expressed by saying that visual experience is metaphysically
determined in part by the thoughts and language that we use to describe
it. We can draw a similar moral from left-right inversion cases: that visual
experience itself is metaphysically determined in part by what one does.

More specifically, visual experience lies in the coordination and integration of visual“input” and behavioral“output,”in the exploitation of visual
information for the direction of behavior.

Hurley also considers a variation on the actual experiment that places
the subject in “Mirror Earth,” an environment in which there are leftright reversals that are, in turn, reversed by the left-right inverting lenses.

This scenario parallels Ned Block’s“Inverted Earth”thought experiment,
which Block uses to challenge externalist, particularly representationalist,
views of the nature of consciousness. What is distinctive about the Mirror
Earth thought experiment that Hurley offers is that, as with the left-right
inversion experiments, it involves a “where” rather than a “what” system.

As such, this Mirror Earth case allows – indeed, requires – the subject’s
exploration and manipulation of things in his environment. Since the
inverting lenses correct only for the worldly inversion as it is perceived
visually, further inversions are required if the subjects are to remain in
the same internal states through their respective explorations of their
environments. As Hurley points out, unlike the case of Inverted Earth,
238 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
which involves color inversion, this case of Mirror Earth requires that
motor output and proprioceptive feedback be systematically inverted in
order to have a case in which we have two individuals identical in their
intrinsic, physical properties.18
Part of Hurley’s point in considering the dynamic Mirror Earth variant
on the actual left-right inversion experiments is that it is in fact very
difficult to satisfy the assumption that an individual on Mirror Earth can
be a duplicate of an individual on Earth, since the requisite inversions in
the dynamic case seem to require changes in the subject himself. It is with
this Mirror Earth case in mind that I want to turn to some broader issues
about consciousness and philosophical methodology in the next section.

7 individualistic residues
Both the sensorimotor contingency theory and the dynamic cycles conception of perception-action exemplify how a TESEE view of visual experience can be developed. Together with representationalist views of visual
experience of the type that we have seen Dretske articulate, they provide
a basis for challenging much that has been taken for granted about visual experience that has suggested an individualistic view of it. I think
that the root assumptions at play here are that (a) particular states are
phenomenal in and of themselves, and that (b) phenomenal properties
are intrinsic properties of the states that have them, or (at least) of the
subjects of those states. The systemic view of taxonomy and individuation
introduced in Part Two provides a general reason to be skeptical about
(a), and the TESEE view of visual experience provides a positive framework that either does without (a) or tempers its significance. Insofar as
particular visual experiences are phenomenal, they are part of an embodied system as it dynamically interacts with a particular environment
and with an agent’s motoric, intentional, and proprioceptive capacities.

The rejection of (b) amounts to a rejection of “qualia,” or at least one
significant feature of them, but it is important to see that the TESEE view
is not eliminativist about visual experience, as other critiques of qualia
have been. There are phenomenal properties that we have first-person
access to, just as there is mental content to which we have such access.

But in both cases, these properties are not what we might have thought
they were. In particular, they are externalist, rather than individualistic,
in nature.19
What of the TESEE view and the remaining phenomenal states, those
of pain and bodily sensations? In section 5, I argued that Dretske’s
argument for global externalism was weakest in the case of these sorts
of phenomenal states. This is because their representational character is
not necessarily subject to the social deference that drives taxonomic externalism, and they are realized in entity-bounded systems, and so are
not subject to an appeal to locational externalism. These points make it
prima facie less plausible to apply the TESEE view to these kinds of phenomenal states across the board, even if many of the representational
characterizations we naturally give to such states follow those of visual experience and are at least taxonomically externalist. This constitutes one
sort of individualistic residue that remains once we push externalism as
far as we can, from the intentional to the phenomenal.

But there is another such residue, a sort of legacy of a philosophical tradition heavily populated by thought experiments. Philosophical
discussions have made it seem easier than it in fact is to articulate an individualistic conception of phenomenal states, and correspondingly made
externalist views appear more counterintuitive than they in fact are in
part because of their reliance on what can and can’t be conceived in certain kinds of thought experiments. For example, a familiar line of attack
on materialist views of phenomenal states is based on the claim that one
can conceive of the possibility of either inverted or absent qualia. The
paradigm case discussed in such arguments is that of color experience
and its inversion or absence. If all the physical facts about an individual
are fixed yet it is possible for that individual to have either inverted or no
color experience at all, then physical facts (about an individual) do not
determine all of that individual’s properties.

The classic response to such arguments, one that opens the door to
the sort of argument that we have seen Dretske make for global externalism, is to point to the causal (and so, for some, conceptual) connection
between qualitative states and the first-person beliefs that they generate.

As the philosopher Sydney Shoemaker says, to think that absent qualia
are possible is “to make qualitative character irrelevant both to what we
can take ourselves to know in knowing about the mental states of others
and also to what we can take ourselves to know in knowing about our own
mental states.” And qualia severed from first-person knowledge of them
under at least some circumstances constitute some sort of conceptual
confusion. It is for this reason that Shoemaker holds that while inverted
qualia are possible, absent qualia are not. There are two points to make
about the dialectic here.20
First, such thought experiments themselves presuppose both (a) and
(b), for they hold, ex hypothesi, all physical or functional facts true of an
240 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
individual while varying the phenomenal state: Green is the phenomenal
state present rather than red (or nothing), or pain is present in one
individual while it is absent in her physical or functional duplicate. Insofar
as the response that Shoemaker offers shares these assumptions, it too is
problematic.

Second, it is easy to radically underdescribe inverted and absent qualia
thought experiments, and misleading to draw substantive conclusions
on the basis of such underdescription. This is just the sort of point that
Hurley has made against Block’s appeal to Inverted Earth. Such thought
experiments take us so far, but only so far, in telling us something about
the nature of the mind and how we can and should conceive of it.21
8 global externalism and the tesee view
While I have rejected Dretske’s argument for global externalism, one
might wonder about how great the distance is between global externalism
and the TESEE conception of consciousness. The appeal to the preceding
arguments of Parts Two and Three shares in Dretske’s representationalist
strategy of arguing for an externalist view of consciousness on the basis
of assuming externalism about intentionality.

There are several important differences between global externalism
and the TESEE view of consciousness, the most significant of which
concerns the universality and necessity of the corresponding externalist
claims. If I understand the representationalist position shared by Dretske,
Lycan and Tye correctly, it holds that global externalism is necessitated
once one allows an externalist foot in the door of intentionality. As we
will see in the next chapter, such a view seems to be shared by recent defenders of “narrow phenomenology,” such as Terence Horgan and Brian
Loar, for they aim to defuse such a global externalism with a “global
internalism” about both phenomenology and intentionality.

By contrast, the TESEE view of consciousness, like the more general
externalism of which it is a part, is inherently pluralistic. It allows that individualism may be correct about certain mental states – pain is an example
that I have given at several points – but that there is no barrier to developing an externalist view of the full range of mental states, intentional
or conscious. The TESEE view aims primarily to show that individualism
is not a constraint on a psychology or cognitive science of any specific
sort of mental state, including the full range of conscious states. As a
consequence, it implies that a certain internalist picture of cognition has
held us captive, and seeks to replace that picture with another vision of
cognitive processing. Given this, the chief ground for preferring the externalist vision is not any a priori argument from the purported nature of
intentionality to claims about the nature of consciousness. Rather, these
concern the general theoretical virtues of the externalist view, such as its
range of application and overall integral character.

A second difference between global externalism and the TESEE view
is that the TESEE conception takes locational externalism much more
seriously than does global externalism. In part because of this, the TESEE
conception is more vulnerable to the charge of “changing the subject” in
offering an expanded view of consciousness. But rather than allow this to
lapse into a dispute over what words mean I have suggested that the attractiveness of the TESEE view lies primarily in its scope and integrity. If the
charge against the TESEE view is that it changes the subject by adopting
a distinct view of what consciousness is, then the corresponding charge
against existing views is that they offer a contracted view of consciousness.

Such a view makes it difficult to see how entwined consciousness is with
our everyday mental life and the range of cognitive processing that we
engage in.

A third and subsequent difference between global externalism and
the TESEE view of consciousness is the sensitivity of the latter to developments within the cognitive sciences themselves. There has been a recurring tension throughout Parts Two and Three between the naturalistic
deference to explanatory practice in the cognitive sciences that is central
to the argument of the book as a whole and the recognition that the
cognitive sciences are predominantly individualistic in methodology and
outlook. It is in part because of this pair of points that I remain skeptical
of global externalism. Its endorsement requires viewing current and past
explanatory practice in the cognitive sciences as quite radically mistaken,
even about consciousness. Instead, on the TESEE view, there are what
we might call philosophical excesses that fall out of the individualistic
mindset of tradition – we might include here the belief in qualia, as well
as the idea that the first-person perspective is necessarily internalist – but
there is no compunction in giving individualism its due. It is just a more
limited due than one might have thought.

In the next chapter, I explore some recent philosophical views that
attempt to present a robust articulation of consciousness within an individualistic framework. At their heart are some proposals about the relationship between intentionality and phenomenology.

10
Intentionality and Phenomenology
1 the relationship between intentionality
and phenomenology
Traditionally, postbehaviorist philosophy of mind and cognitive science
has proceeded on the assumption that intentionality and phenomenology can most profitably be treated independently or separately from one
another. The intentional and the phenomenal have often been viewed as
the two fundamental categories of the mental within the philosophy of
mind, with more specific types of mental states falling under one or the
other of them. Belief and thought are paradigms of the intentional, and
pain and bodily sensations paradigms of the phenomenal. Even when this
divide between the intentional and the phenomenal has not been treated
as a mutually exclusive categorization scheme for thinking about the constituents of the mind, intentional and phenomenal aspects of particular
types of mental states remain distinguished and treated in separation
from one another. Terence Horgan and John Tienson have called this
general position separatism.

1
These forms of separatism about the intentional and the phenomenal
likely have no single cause. For some, separatism makes sense because
intentionality is thought to be significantly more tractable than phenomenology. “Look,” one might say, “figuring out how the mind works is
really hard. Consciousness is a complete mystery. But we at least have some
inkling about intentionality and mental representation. So let’s work that
out first.” Hence, the explosion of work on causal, informational, and
teleological theories of content, and the attention that the individualismexternalism debate has generated over the past twenty-five years. For
242
others, separatism is driven by viewing a divide-and-conquer strategy in
general as more efficient in dealing with difficult-to-understand phenomena. And there are some who simply think that the intentional and the
phenomenal are metaphysically quite distinct, so that carving the mind
at its joints requires separatism. Extending the Horgan and Tienson terminology, I shall call the former type of positions pragmatic separatism and
the latter-most position metaphysical separatism.

Pragmatic separatism implies a research strategy that can be adopted
independent of one’s stance on metaphysical separatism. Pragmatic separatism amounts to a two-part gamble. The first assumes that parsing
the mental world into the intentional and the phenomenal provides the
basis for conceptual and empirical advances in what we know about the
mind. This gamble has gone hand-in-hand with the classic computational
theory of mind and traditional artificial intelligence, which have chiefly
modeled intentionality independent of considerations of phenomenology. The second gamble is to assume that treating intentionality as a
unified phenomenon, such that one can theorize about it and explore
it in both the mental and nonmental realms, will turn out to have much
the same benefits. This gamble has generated informational and teleological accounts of intentionality, which have assimilated mental states to
mechanistic detectors (such as thermostats) and bodily organs (such as
hearts and kidneys).

Over the last decade or so, these gambles have been challenged, and
separatism of both kinds has been rejected. As consciousness of consciousness has increased, a number of philosophers have advocated a
central role for the phenomenal in our conception of the mental, and in
our conception of the intentional in particular. For example, John Searle
has defended the connection principle, the principle that “all unconscious
intentional states are in principle accessible to consciousness,” using this
principle to cast doubt on the existence of many of the kinds of mental representations posited within cognitive science. Galen Strawson has
claimed allegiance to the widespread view that what he calls “behavioral
intentionality can never amount to true intentionality, however complex
the behavior, and that one cannot have intentionality unless one is an
experiencing being.” That is, no matter how complicated a creature’s
behavior, unless that creature has consciousness all attributions of intentionality are mere “as if” intentionality, not the real McCoy. Both of these
views appear to make the existence of phenomenology in a creature a
prerequisite for intentionality, at least “original” or “real” intentionality.

In doing so, they have brought a focus on human minds – rather than,
244 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
say, animal minds or computers – as the paradigmatic loci of intentional
states.2
Some recent views go further than this in suggesting more specific
and foundational roles for phenomenology vis-`a-vis intentionality. Brian
Loar has argued that there is a form that intentionality takes – subjective
intentionality, psychological content, intentional qualia, or phenomenal
intentionality – that is psychologically pervasive. It is distinct from, and in
certain respects more primitive than, the kind or kinds of intentionality
that have been discussed in light (or perhaps the shadow?) of the externalist arguments of Putnam and Burge. Loar thinks that such intentionality
is narrow, and in part this is because he views phenomenology as being
individualistic. In Loar’s view, there is not simply a general, presuppositional connection between intentionality and phenomenology. Rather,
there is a form of intentionality that is thoroughly phenomenal and that
is manifest as the phenomenal content of a range of particular mental
states.3
Terence Horgan and John Tienson have taken a similar path. They
argue for a two-way inseparability thesis: that intentional content is inseparable from the phenomenal character of paradigmatic phenomenal states
(for example, pain, visual experience), and that phenomenal character
is inseparable from the intentional content of paradigmatic intentional
states (for example, propositional attitudes). In addition, they defend
what they call the phenomenal intentionality thesis: that there is a pervasive
kind of intentionality determined by phenomenology alone. Like Loar,
Horgan and Tienson argue that this intentionality is narrow, and that in
important respects it is more fundamental than wide content.4
While I think that even the general views typified by Searle and
Strawson are problematic, in this chapter, I shall focus on the more
specific proposals made by Horgan and Tienson and the views of Loar.

Both the inseparability and phenomenal intentionality theses seem to
me false, and even were the latter true, the significance that Horgan
and Tienson attach to it misplaced. Pinpointing the problems with the
Horgan-Tienson position will shed some light, I hope, on the limitations
of Loar’s more wide-ranging discussion and the broader issues that their
shared position and its defense raise.

2 dimensions of the inseparability thesis
One legacy of the attachment that many philosophers of mind had to
the intentional during the 1980s was the articulation of various forms of
representationalism with respect to the phenomenal through the 1990s.

Fred Dretske, William Lycan, Michael Tye, and Gilbert Harman have all
defended versions of representationalism about phenomenal states. The
basic idea of such representationalist views is to treat phenomenal states
as a type of intentional state, to analyze or understand the experiential in
terms of the representational. A key strategy of representationalists has
been to point to the transparent or diaphanous character of experience
and our reflection on it. When I engage in introspection on the character
of my experience, I find that it is thoroughly intentional, so thoroughly
so that it is hard to distinguish any purely qualitative, nonintentional
remainder of the experience. My on-line reflection on my current visual
experience, for example, seems to me to yield only what it is I am currently
looking at (books, a computer screen, a telephone, a coffee cup, and so
on), what is usually taken to be the content of my visual experience. Thus,
representationalism serves as a basis for either the rejection of qualia,
or their subsumption under the putatively better understood notion of
intentionality.5
Because of the recent prominence of the intentional and of representationalist views of experience, the two halves to Horgan and Tienson’s
inseparability thesis are not viewed as equally in need of justification.

Representationalists accept, of course, the idea that the intentional pervades the phenomenal, as Horgan and Tienson acknowledge. Thus, it is
the second half of their thesis – the claim that paradigmatic intentional
states, such as beliefs and desires, have an inseparable phenomenal character – that requires more by way of justification, at least in the dialectical
tenor of the times.

There are several dimensions along which versions of the inseparability thesis can vary that make for stronger and weaker views about the
relationship between intentionality and phenomenology. Consider three:
(a) quantificational range: Are there just some mental states of which
the thesis is true, or is it true of all mental states?.

(b) modal intensity: Are the intentional and phenomenal merely coincident, physically necessitated or nomologically linked, or conceptually related?
(c) grain of determinateness: At how specific a “level” does the inseparability thesis hold? At the least specific level, it would apply to the
properties being intentional and being phenomenal. At the most
specific level, the thesis would apply to specific mental states (for
example, attitude plus content), such as believing that there is a
246 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
red tomato in front of me here and now, and having a specific,
reddish, roundish visual sensation.

Versions of the inseparability thesis that are strong on any of these
dimensions are implausible, not only given Horgan and Tienson’s other
commitments, but independently. Or so I shall argue.

3 deflating the inseparability thesis
Consider these dimensions to the inseparability thesis in reverse order.

Grain of determinateness. Few (if any) intentional states have a specific
phenomenal character without which they cannot have the wide content that they have. This is clearest in the interpersonal case, and one
reason for finding both pragmatic and metaphysical separability theses
plausible is that we can generalize about, for example, propositional attitudes in a robust manner without delving into the phenomenology that
(let us suppose) accompanies those states. What an arbitrarily chosen
pair of people share phenomenologically when they both entertain the
thought that George Bush is president of the United States is anyone’s
guess. Intuitively, people can share this thought despite speaking different languages, and sharing few substantive beliefs or opinions about
either George Bush, the presidency, or the United States, all of which
typically impact on how it feels, what it is like, to entertain that thought.

Phenomenological comparisons are also notoriously under strain in
crossspecies cases. Moreover, the finer the grain of determinateness to
the experiences, the greater the problem here.

But this is also true intrapersonally, even if the variation here is not in
general as great, in part because we are creatures of habit mentally as
well as behaviorally. It is easy to fall into mental ruts, where the recurring
phenomenology is part of the rut. Most pointedly, one and the same
intentional state can be realized by a person on two distinct occasions and
have a phenomenology at all on only one of them. Clearly this is true in cases
where an intentional state is conscious on only one of those two occasions,
assuming (for now) that phenomenology presupposes consciousness. But
it is also true even when both occurrences are conscious occurrences.

Horgan and Tienson claim that “[i]f you pay attention to your own
experience, we think you will come to appreciate”the truth of their claims
about the intentional and the phenomenal. In the spirit of Horgan and
Tienson’s appeal for a reader to “pay attention to your own experience,”
I have just done the decisive experiment: I thought first that George
Bush is president of the United States, and had CNN-mediated auditory
and visual phenomenology that focused on one of his speeches. I then
took a short break, doodled a little, wandered around the room, and
then had a thought with that very same content and ... nothing. Or at
least nothing distinctly Bush-like, as in the first case. I just drew a blank,
realized my coffee was finished, and moved on. To be honest, I am not
sure whether the drawing a blank or the phenomenal feel of realizing
my coffee was finished was the phenomenology that accompanied the
thought that George Bush is president of the United States, or whether
I was mistaken in some more basic way about what my phenomenology
was, or about what thought I was entertaining.6
However, there is nothing unusual or weird about this, although I
don’t claim that everyone will find that they have the same results when
they attempt their own replication of the experiment. (It is instructive,
however, to try this out on a class of students, and note some of the wild
variation in what is reported. And things would no doubt get worse in
this respect were we to leave the sanctity of the philosophy classroom.)
Some, no doubt, will report as Horgan and Tienson themselves do. But
do these different results show that I was mistaken about what I thought,
or that I mischaracterized or just missed my phenomenology? No, phenomenology is sometimes like that, tricky to coax out, difficult to map
to states with specific content, even fickle or uncooperative. And not attached unwaveringly to intentionality, at least at a relatively fine-grained
level of determinacy.

Thus far, I have considered just one specific thought in arguing for the
perhaps extreme-sounding conclusion that a thought can be entertained
by one person on two occasions and have a distinct phenomenology on
only one of them. Part of what I want to suggest is that even when mental
states have a certain prominence to them – their content is easily articulated, they are “before the mind’s eye,” they are shared by lots of people –
the notion of their having a distinctive phenomenology can remain puzzling. When we turn to mental states that are less prominent in these
respects, the puzzlement deepens. I remember from time to time that I
need to repair the spare tire for the car, continue to plan to spend less
time watching the seemingly endless hockey finals, and occasionally wonder about stranger things, such as whether metabolic systems must be
living. Sometimes these mental episodes are separated by months or by
years, and I am certainly in no position now to make a comparison of their
phenomenology. But even as mental life is going by it is difficult to know
just what the phenomenology of these mundane and not so mundane
248 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
mental states is. This is not skepticism about phenomenology per se, but
about the idea that our first-person access to it can be unproblematically
granted at a relatively fine grain of determinateness.

Modal intensity. This brings me to the sense in which phenomenology
cannot be separated from intentionality. As I have intimated, Horgan and
Tienson employ what I shall call the methodology of imaginative evocation
in motivating and discussing the inseparability thesis. That is, they provide possible scenarios that we are invited to imagine in order to convey
some idea of the sort of thing that the phenomenology of intentional
states is, why it exists, and why the inseparability thesis is true. But this
methodology, despite its increasing deployment in thinking about consciousness, is inherently unsuited to making even a prima facie case for
anything but the modally weakest versions of the inseparability thesis,
namely, that phenomenology and intentionality are coincident in some
range of cases. To establish modally stronger theses through thought experiment they would have to show that we cannot have intentional states
without a corresponding phenomenology (or phenomenology without
intentionality).

We might think, however, that their methodology issues at least a challenge to those who would deny the inseparability thesis: Given that their
examples putatively point to a general feature of intentional states, and
their inability to conjure mental states without a corresponding phenomenology, the separatist must describe an occurrent, intentional state
that has no phenomenology at all. Yet even if we accept these discussions
as shifting the burden of proof in this way (and I am not sure that we
should), there are several problems here.

First, as I have indicated, I do not myself seem to have any problem in
identifying occurrent intentional states that lack a phenomenology (distinct from their intentionality) or, more accurately, whose phenomenology I feel in no special position to identify with any degree of certainty.

Representationalists such as Gilbert Harman report similar abilities. Since
I trust the reports of Horgan and Tienson (or rather, I trust them no less
than I trust my own erstwhile introspective attempts), it seems that the
right conclusion to draw is that there can be differences in what the
methodology of imaginative evocation produces in this particular case.

The further conclusion that these differences are a result of one’s different theoretical starting points is tempting. Such a conclusion would be
devastating for the methodology that Horgan and Tienson use.7
Loar employs the same methodology, putting particular emphasis on
a thought experiment that involves thinking of an isolated brain that
has just the same phenomenal experience as you when you are having a
particular visual experience (say, seeing a lemon). Loar says he “will be
content if you grant at least a superficial coherence to the thought that
my isolated twin-in-a-vat has visual experiences exactly like mine.” But it
is difficult to grant even this if your view is that brains need to be both
embodied and environmentally embedded, and actively so, in order to
provide the basis for any visual experience at all.8
As we saw in the previous chapter, precisely such a view has been recently articulated and defended by Susan Hurley, J. Kevin O’Regan, and
Alva Noe. For someone who thinks that embodiment and embeddedness ¨
are essential features of visual experience, the thought Loar invites us
to entertain is no more and no less conceivable than is the thought that
there is a box filled only with air that has just the visual experience that I
am having at a particular moment. Those who think that mere air could
instantiate mentality – call them airheads – are able to conceive something that those with this view of the relationship between experience,
embodiment, and embeddedness cannot.

Loar himself considers a version of the objection that phenomenology
is a product of theory rather than a reflection of the underlying mental
reality (of intentional qualia). He says:
Theory does have a bearing, it is true. But theory does not create the phenomenology. From a neutral position there is a certain phenomenology of perceptual experience. What is missing from the neutral position is a conception of the nature
of what is thereby presented.9
The bearing that theory has, on Loar’s view, concerns how the phenomenology is interpreted, not whether there is a phenomenology there
to be interpreted. Yet precisely this latter issue is raised by the version of
the objection being pressed.

Second, the modally strongest version of the inseparability thesis is vulnerable to the conceivability of momentary zombies, individuals who nearly
always have a phenomenology that accompanies their intentionality, but
who sometimes (perhaps due to hardware noise) fail to have a phenomenology. Momentary zombies have a phenomenology just like ours,
except occasionally there is a gap in it, and they are momentarily zombies.

Momentary zombiehood is much easier to concede than full-blooded
zombiehood, and surely it is plausible with respect to at least some intentional states (consider, again, the propositional attitudes). If momentary
zombies are possible, then it is possible for there to be particular intentional states without an accompanying phenomenology. But I also think it
250 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
is plausible that we are momentary zombies, perhaps due to informationprocessing bottlenecks and other limitations of our consciousness, with
respect to at least some of the intentional states that Horgan and Tienson
appeal to. I find this particularly plausible with regard to the example of
what Galen Strawson has called understanding-experience, being the experience of hearing “someone speaking non-technically in a language one
understands,” and which I sometimes find I have, and sometimes not. In
any case, the general point is that modally strong versions of the inseparability thesis are particularly vulnerable to relatively tame versions of
some standard thought experiments.10
Quantificational range. If one concedes that there are dispositional intentional states, such as belief and desire, then the scope of the inseparability thesis needs to be restricted at least to occurrent intentional states,
or to dispositional states when they are occurrent. But does the thesis
need to be restricted further, not just to occurrent states but to those
occurrent states of which one is conscious? One reason to think so is that
if we think of occurrent states at a given time as those that govern our
behavior at that time, those of which we are conscious at that time will be
a proper subset of our occurrent states. But it is not clear that occurrent
states of which we are not conscious at a given time have any more of a
phenomenology than do nonoccurrent states. I noticed a short while ago
that the room was getting dark and that I should turn on a desk lamp; I
noticed more recently that I have been squinting at the papers scattered
on my desk in the enveloping dark. It is plausible to think that my wanting to continue reading guided my squinting behavior although there
was no phenomenology of that occurrent state prior to my reflecting on
my behavior. (How could there be?. I was not aware of this aspect of my
behavior, and it came as a surprise to me to realize just what I was doing.) This suggests that there are at least two “levels” of intentional states
for which there is no phenomenology, the purely dispositional and the
merely occurrent.

Horgan and Tienson explicitly restrict their thesis of the phenomenology of intentionality to intentional states when they are conscious. But
one wonders what this amounts to in light of the following passage:
The full-fledged phenomenal character of sensory experience is an extraordinarily rich synthetic unity that involves complex, richly intentional, total phenomenal
characters of visual-mode phenomenology, tactile-mode phenomenology, kinesthetic body-control phenomenology, auditory and olfactory phenomenology, and
so forth – each of which can be abstracted more or less from the total experience
to be the focus of attention.11
On this conception, phenomenology outstrips attention. On one reading, one that equates attention with consciousness, there is phenomenology of which one is not conscious. (But how then do you tell what its
content is?)
Alternatively, if Horgan and Tienson are equating consciousness with
phenomenology, they are saying that we only attend to a portion of our
conscious experience. But what is the status of the phenomenal content of
that unattended portion of our conscious experience? Does it exist, and
if so, how do we know its nature (since, by hypothesis, we do not attend
to it)? If we do not know the phenomenal content, then it is plausible to
think that such states have no more specific phenomenal content than
do dispositional states.

The point here is that the phenomenology of intentionality begins to
look more restricted in the range of states it applies to at any given time
than one might initially think: The dispositional, the merely occurrent,
and the unattended all seem to be precluded. If the inseparability thesis is
true, then it seems that it is true of a much more restricted set of states than
simply all intentional and all phenomenological states. In light of that,
the thesis loses a lot of the punch that it packs vis-`a-vis traditional views
of the mind that operate on the assumption that there is no necessary or
deep connection between the intentional and the phenomenal.

A different sort of problem in the scope of the thesis arises in Loar’s
discussion of phenomenal intentionality and intentional qualia. Loar
builds up a case for phenomenal intentionality by considering perceptually based concepts, then generalizes to recognitional concepts, spatial
concepts, and socially deferential concepts. But apart from the special
case where we reflect on such concepts and their instances we do not,
in our everyday experience, have any phenomenology of these concepts,
any more than we have any phenomenology of the individual phonemes
or distinctive features that make up the stream of speech we have auditory
experience of. The stream of consciousness is not, without special prodding, segmented into constituents such as concepts. It seems primarily in
the hands of philosophers that our experience can become segmented
and particularized, in much the way that it was atomized in the hands of
that master introspectionist, Wilhelm Wundt.12
This reference to Wundt may remind us that neither introspection
nor phenomenology is simply a matter of turning one’s mind inward and
reporting what one finds. What one finds in one’s own experience will
depend in part on what one is looking for, the background perspective
that one brings to this first-person task.

252 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
4 phenomenal intentionality
So far I have not argued that the inseparability thesis is false, but that
there are three dimensions of strength – scope, modality, and determinateness – on which it rates lowly. The point here is to deflate (not refute)
the inseparability thesis, for surely only a skeptic about the phenomenal
would refuse to concede that versions of the thesis weakened on each of
the forgoing dimensions are true. Along the way I have raised, in passing,
some doubts about the suitability of the methodology on which Horgan,
Tienson, and Loar rely in gesturing at what the phenomenology of intentionality is. Rather than develop these doubts here directly I shall turn to
consider phenomenal intentionality itself and what its proponents claim
about it. Again, the chief point will not be to show that such a property
does not exist, but that the most plausible way of understanding it makes
it unlikely that what its proponents claim about it is true.

Horgan and Tienson characterize phenomenal intentionality as a
“kind of intentional content, pervasive in human life, such that any two
possible phenomenal duplicates have exactly similar intentional states
vis-`a-vis such content.” Although this sounds stipulative, it is not, since
Horgan and Tienson continue by arguing for the thesis through imaginative evocation. As I noted in the previous section, this style of argument
does not seem well suited to the modally strong conclusion they seek, except insofar as it shifts the burden of proof to those who deny phenomenal intentionality. Yet it remains open to skeptics here to concede that
there can be a sort of phenomenal intentionality that is nonconceptual
but balk at the claim that the same is true of the conceptual realm. For
although ex hypothesi phenomenal duplicates share all their phenomenal
states, we are to show, not assume, that they share cognitive structures
that are genuinely intentional, such as concepts or beliefs.13
As part of their bridge from phenomenology to intentionality, Horgan
and Tienson distinguish between “two ways of thinking about truth
conditions: as determined wholly by phenomenology, and as determined
in part by items in the experiencer’s environment that satisfy the experiencer’s phenomenology.” The former of these, they argue, are narrow
and more fundamental than the latter. In their discussion, through imaginative evocation, they invite each reader to compare him or herself to
both a Twin Earth doppelganger ¨ and a “Cartesian duplicate.” The latter of
these has thoughts purporting to refer to someone named “Bill Clinton,”
but these lack reference altogether since there is no thing at all that
satisfies that putative reference for a Cartesian duplicate. Here it seems
that Horgan and Tienson allow that some phenomenal duplicates (for
example, those in no environment) may have mental states that have
no wide truth conditions and so no wide intentionality at all. But if at
least some phenomenal duplicates differ in that one has concepts with
ordinary (wide) satisfaction conditions, while the other does not, then
the defender of phenomenal intentionality must have available a way of
articulating the intentionality that such duplicates share that is independent of their wide intentionality. Whether phenomenology alone suffices
for intentionality given the complete severance to wide intentionality, as
in the case of Cartesian duplicates or brains-in-a-vat, might reasonably be
questioned. A more developed account of something like “phenomenal
intentionality” could silence doubts here.14
Brian Loar provides an account that purports to do the trick. To
bridge from phenomenal identity to intentional identity he appeals to
(i) brains in vats that (ii) share perceptually based concepts and (iii) share
all other concepts in virtue of their sharing their conceptual roles. As
Loar notes, in effect, (i) is required to ensure that any shared intentionality does not hold in virtue of shared (or similar) environments, and
so is narrow; (ii) provides a base case that Loar takes externalists to be
committed to in virtue of the phenomenon of failed perceptual demonstratives (and the inadequacy of representationalist accounts of it); and
the extension in (iii) appeals primarily to another resource, conceptual
roles, that Loar takes externalists to view as shared across contexts, no
matter how radically different those contexts may be. I want to put aside
concerns about (i) for now and concentrate on (ii) and (iii).15
Loar’s view here is programmatic and sketches a large-scale view of
phenomenal intentionality, rather than presenting detailed analyses for
any concept that putatively has phenomenal intentionality. My comments
are correspondingly cast. The idea of starting with individual concepts,
rather than phenomenal experience in its fullness, is a good one prima
facie, for part of the problem with sensory experience as a whole is that
it must be articulated ultimately in terms of a range of concepts, and
many of these are conceded by nearly everyone as being externalist, as
having wide content. This seems true even when the articulation we are
interested in is done from the first-person perspective. Begin, then, with
concepts whose phenomenal intentionality (and its nature) is not in serious dispute, and then constructively build a full account of experience
as having phenomenal intentionality.

I have already flagged one problem with this approach, however: It
seems to fragment the actual phenomenology we have, and so to be
254 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
at best a philosophical analysis rather than a description of it. Suppose
that we put this aside, and suppose that we simply grant, for now, that
there are perceptually based concepts that are individualistic. How do
we constructively build from here? After discussing perceptually based
concepts, including “recognitional concepts” that “purport to pick out,
perceptually, kinds and properties rather than individuals,” Loar considers concepts that seem neither paradigmatically narrow nor wide, including the general concepts of physical objects and spatial relations. Here
he argues that these contain a recognitional component or aspect, and
so can be assimilated to recognitional concepts, which he has argued
to have phenomenal intentionality. While Loar concedes that this is not
true of socially deferential concepts – which have paradigmatically wide
content – he argues that their phenomenal intentionality derives from
the conceptual roles they play in the systematic internal economy of the
individual.16
There are thus two distinct paths to phenomenal intentionality: via
assimilation to perceptually based concepts (paradigms of the recognitional), and via assimilation to the logical connectives (paradigms of the
Conceptual Roley). These paths are very different from one another. One
concern is whether they in fact converge. That is, what grounds are there
for thinking that they determine the very same kind of property, phenomenal intentionality? This question seems to me to need a nonstipulative
answer for Loar’s program to be successful. Unlike Horgan and Tienson,
Loar explicitly rules out the possibility that this unifying feature is the
availability of phenomenal intentionality to introspection, for he wants
conceptual roles to determine phenomenal intentionality independent
of its relationship to “an introspective glance.” Indeed, in light of this
concession, and independently, one wonders what makes intentionality
determined solely by conceptual roles phenomenological. What is the
phenomenology of the concept “and,” one wonders?17
There is a parallel here with wide content that might be drawn. Why
think that “environmentally-determined” content (for example, that of
water, `a la Putnam) and “socially-determined” content (for example, that
of arthritis, `a la Burge) are examples of a single kind of content, wide
content? There are, however, two important dissimilarities between this
pair of factors, the physical and social environments, and those determining phenomenal intentionality. First, one might plausibly (even if not
definitively) make the case that environmentally determined content of
these is really an instance of socially determined content, in that the key
feature of Putnam externalism is the pattern of social deference that it
identifies in the use of language. Second, and short of this, these “paths
to externalism,” while distinct, are not independent in that they share key
elements, such as the idea of a social division of labor between regular
folk and experts and that of individual knowledge as being incomplete
or partial.

A final general question: If phenomenology determines a kind of intentionality (albeit via two distinct paths), what is phenomenology’s relationship to wide content? Given the diaphanous character of much of our
introspective experience, a point (as we have seen) upon which representationalists have seized, it seems implausible to think that our everyday
phenomenology is never of, or never leads us to, intentionality that is
wide. I suspect that Loar, Horgan, and Tienson would concur. If that is
so, then there is nothing special about the path from phenomenology
to individualism, for there is also a path from phenomenology to at least
some kind of externalism. We should consider this issue more fully by
turning explicitly to the focus on twin cases, and to Loar’s appeal to the
brain in a vat.

5 individualism and phenomenal intentionality
Loar’s view, like that of Horgan and Tienson, moves from claims about the
phenomenology of perceptual experience to a conclusion about its (phenomenal) intentionality. As we saw in the previous chapter, Fred Dretske
has argued that even conscious perceptual experience is externalist, and
a reminder of the dilemma that Dretske poses is useful in understanding
a challenge facing those, such as Horgan, Tienson, and Loar, who deny
this. What are perceptual experiences? If they are or involve conceptual
or thoughtlike entities, then those experiences inherit their width from
that of the concepts or thoughts they involve. But if perceptual experiences are completely divorced from conceptual or thoughtlike entities,
then perceptual states are unknowable, even by their bearers.

In terms of this “wide or unknowable” dilemma posed by Dretske,
defenders of phenomenal intentionality attempt to grasp the first horn
by articulating concepts that are not externalist. This is a strategy that
Colin McGinn has also pursued in demarcating the limits of externalism,
arguing that perceptual content in general is not what he calls strongly
externalist, that is, dependent on nonmental features of a subject’s environment. Central to McGinn’s argument is the imagined case of Percy and
his doppelganger ¨ . Percy is behaviorally disposed to respond to round things
in round-thing appropriate ways, and so is said unproblematically to have
256 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
an internal state that corresponds to the concept round; Percy’s duplicate, by contrast, is behaviorally disposed to respond to square things in
round-thing appropriate ways. The question is whether Percy’s duplicate
has the concept round or the concept square.

McGinn thinks that an externalist is committed to the latter, since
square things are the distal causes of the relevant internal state, and
externalists individuate mental states by such external causes rather than
by internal features of an organism. Yet the intuition that Percy’s duplicate
is a creature that misperceives square things as round is strong, and so,
according to McGinn, only an individualistic view of the case will do.

Here is a case where perceptual content is individualistic. It seems to
both Percy and his duplicate that they are both seeing a round thing, and
this shared seeming is what explains their shared behavioral dispositions.

Hence, there is a need for an account of the constituents of perceptual
contents that is individualistic. The argument here is similar to Loar’s
chief reason for appealing to phenomenal intentionality: cases of failed
perceptual demonstrative reference.18
Such pair-wise twin comparisons may be a first step in articulating a
conception of phenomenal intentionality via the claim that there are at
least some narrow concepts. Yet one needs to be able to generalize from
them to reach a conclusion about any pair of physical twins, which is
required to show that the corresponding concepts, and thus phenomenal
intentionality, are individualistic. In the remainder of this section I shall
argue for a contestability to what we can imagine in twin cases that poses
a problem for this generalization, and so for this putative link between
individualism and phenomenal intentionality.

In discussing a variant of McGinn’s example, Martin Davies implicitly
defends the view that a generalization from particular twin cases to arbitrary twins will fail, since it is relatively easy to find examples where it
seems more plausible to characterize the twin’s concepts in terms of our
ordinary notion of (wide) content. More telling, in my view, is Davies’ suggestion, following Fricker, that it may be most plausible to refrain from
ascriptions of content at all. Suppose, for example, that Percy’s twin is
a brain in a vat, in an internal state identical to the one that Percy has
when he sees round objects, but which is caused by square objects, and
that Percy’s twin (not ever having been embodied at all) has no behavior
at all. In such a case, we have no basis to ascribe even behavioral dispositions to Percy’s twin. It seems to me very hard to ascribe a specific content
to Percy’s twin in such a case without already supposing that only what’s
“in the head” determines content. Thus, what ascriptions one is prepared
to make turn largely on one’s prior theoretical commitments regarding
the individualism-externalism debate.19
If this is true, then defenders of phenomenal intentionality have seriously underestimated the task before them, for they have been content to
find relatively few cases in which perceptual content is (plausibly) shared
by doppelgangers ¨ , and then simply supposed that the generalization from
such cases is unproblematic. But consider the range of possible duplicates there are for any given individual. There is Rex and there is his
doppelganger ¨ T-Rex on Twin Earth. But there is also brain-in-a-vat Rex,
entirely virtual Rex, Rex the happy android, Rex the purely immaterial
substance, and multiperson Rex, whose phenomenal life is the fusion of
half-lives of two other individuals. In each case, we can imagine Rex’s phenomenal mental life being present in some radically (or not so radically)
different circumstance.

Or can we? Can we really imagine a purely immaterial substance having
exactly the same phenomenal life as regular embodied and embedded
Rex here on Earth? As I intimated in section 3, we may conceptualize
phenomenology not simply as the result of passive experience and active
introspection but as the active exploration of one’s environment through
one’s body. Given that, whatever it is we are imagining in these cases, it is
not a scenario in which the phenomenology remains constant across the
two scenarios. In fact, if one adopts such a view of at least the phenomenology of perceptual experience, as I think is plausible, then it is difficult to
imagine disembodied minds having the corresponding phenomenology
at all. In this respect, to draw on a Wittgensteinian example, comparing
Rex and disembodied Rex is like comparing the time on Earth with that
on the sun. Worse, comparing disembodied Rex and his differently situated but equally disembodied duplicate is like comparing the time it is
on two places on the sun’s surface.20
This is to flip around a response that physicalists have made to an
objection based on the conceivability of zombies: That in fact they are not
conceivable, or their conceivability (if it implies possibility) presupposes,
rather than indicates, the falsity of physicalism. Here I am suggesting that
the conceivability of phenomenal duplicates itself presupposes, rather
than indicates, the narrowness of phenomenal intentionality, by assuming
that embodiment does not go to the heart of phenomenal experience.

Loar, Horgan, and Tienson seem to me to adopt a misleading view of
what phenomenology is, of how it is merely contingently or extraneously
both embodied and embedded, and so make the task of imagining the
phenomenal experience of radically different individuals appear easier
258 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
than it in fact is. But the more basic point is that phenomenology itself is
a contestable phenomenon, and what one can and can’t imagine about
it inherits that contestability.

Thus, the claim that phenomenal duplicates share all phenomenal
states is more problematic than it initially appears. We can come at this
point in another way that brings us back to my initial discussion of the
three dimensions to the inseparability thesis in sections 2 and 3. If we
allow that at least some phenomenal experience is the active exploration
by an embodied agent of its environment, then there are far fewer possible
phenomenal duplicates of any given individual than one might initially
suppose, since such duplicates are constrained by having to have suitably
similar bodies and environments. Given that, the focus on brains in a vat
is misplaced, and will tell us little about phenomenal intentionality.

But should the proponent of phenomenal intentionality adopt this
concessive view of phenomenal experience, whereby at least some such
experience is that of an essentially embodied agent? Neither Loar nor
Horgan and Tienson are as explicit as one might like about this issue,
and different things that they say suggest different answers here. Consider
what Horgan and Tienson say about the thesis of phenomenal intentionality. In arguing for the narrowness of phenomenal intentionality through
imaginative evocation, they seem to reject the concession, suggesting that
all phenomenal intentionality is narrow. Yet the inseparability thesis itself
posits a necessary connection (of some type) between phenomenology
and ordinary wide intentional states, suggesting that they may be happy
with the concession. This would mean, in turn, that the quantifier in
the thesis of phenomenal intentionality (“there is a kind of intentionality ...”) should be understood at face value as an existential quantifier.

In either case, there is a problem that can be expressed as a (somewhat
complicated) dilemma.

Consider whether ordinary wide intentional states have a phenomenology. If they do not, then while the claim that phenomenal intentionality is narrow remains general in scope, the inseparability thesis loses its
quantificational range, since Loar, Horgan, and Tienson all concede that
wide intentional states exist. By contrast, if they do have a phenomenology (as the inseparability thesis prima facie suggests), then either that
phenomenology is narrow or it is wide. Given that the first half of the inseparability thesis has been endorsed by proponents of representational
accounts of phenomenology as part of their phenomenal externalism,
as Horgan and Tienson recognize, and that both halves of the thesis are
concerned with intentional states as they are ordinarily conceived, such
phenomenology would seem to be wide. Certainly, when I describe my
current visual phenomenology – in terms of the books, paper, walls, and
computer screen I am currently looking at – it seems to me that my experience is not merely “as of” a world beyond my body but it is in fact so. The
intuition that drives both Horgan and Tienson’s “intentionality of phenomenology” thesis and phenomenal externalism – that at least much of
our experience seems to be experience of the actual world – together with
respect for the link between phenomenology and first-person reports of
its content, suggests that there is such a thing as wide phenomenology.

But then, clearly, the claim that phenomenal intentionality is individualistic implies that the thesis of phenomenal intentionality does not apply to
all phenomenology. And so the inseparability thesis has a more restricted
quantificational range and a weaker modality than one might initially
think.

The remaining option, that ordinary wide intentional states have a
narrow phenomenology might seem obviously the right thing to say dialectically, but it is also fraught with problems. Not only does it sever the
relationship between the first-person perspective and phenomenology,
but it makes little sense of those aspects of phenomenology that at least
seem – from both first- and third-person perspectives – to be bodily in
nature. For example, both haptic perception and proprioception are dif-
ficult to make sense of for the case of immaterial entities, and I think
they are almost as problematic for material entities, such as brains in vats
or Cartesian duplicates, that have no body at all. As I sit in my chair I
feel a pressure exerted on my lower back by the back of the chair, and
there is a certain feel to my body when I flex the muscles in my leg. But
how would these feel to a being without a body, even a being that was
molecule-for-molecule to me from the neck up? And, picking up on the
grain of determinateness dimension to the inseparability thesis, what reason is there to think that these would have the same feeling that they have
in me? Try as I may, I find these questions very hard to answer without
simply assuming that they must feel just as they feel in my own case. I
suspect that I am burdened by my externalist commitments, and proponents of the individualistic view of phenomenology may find it easier to
make sense of these cases than do those hampered by externalism. But
if so, this reinforces my more general concern that the method of imaginative evocation generates views of phenomenology that are subject to
philosophical contamination.

To sum up this part of the argument: There may be aspects to phenomenology that are individualistic, but, more importantly, there are
260 Thinking Through and Beyond the Body
aspects that likely are externalist. Critically, some cases of perceptual experience, a general category that plays a central role in both the arguments of Loar and of Horgan and Tienson, appear to fall into the latter
category. Again, this is not to say that there is no truth to the claim that
phenomenal intentionality is narrow, but to suggest that it is a claim true
in a significantly more restricted range of cases than its proponents have
thought.

To have come this far, however, is to be in a position to comment on
the further claim that phenomenal intentionality is more fundamental in
at least certain respects than wide content. Minimally, this claim will have
to be hedged in ways that correspond to the restricted domain in which
phenomenal intentionality is narrow. But if externalism is true of the
phenomenology of at least some perceptual content, as I have suggested,
then given the centrality of this case to the conception of phenomenal
intentionality more generally, we may wonder what content remains to
this claim of “basicness.”
6 how to be a good phenomenologist
The fruitfulness of applying a divide and conquer strategy to the intentional and the phenomenal can be, and has been, reasonably questioned.

In this chapter, I have been concerned primarily with recent views that
go further than such questioning and make specific proposals about the
relationship between the intentionality and phenomenology of particular mental states. In particular, I have focused on the inseparability thesis
that Horgan and Tienson have articulated, and the general conception
of phenomenal intentionality that they share with Loar, as well as Loar’s
own way of further articulating that conception. There are certainly other
possible ways to articulate the relationship between intentionality and
phenomenology. Because I have not tried to show that the views of
Horgan, Tienson, and Loar suffer from some deep, general, flaw, I do not
take the argument of this chapter to express any overarching skepticism
about such work on these two pillars of the mental. However, there are
several general problem areas that can be marked “fragile” for now for
those making alternative proposals.

Past attempts to defend or chalk out an individualistic perspective on
the mental have typically focused on intentionality. The main concern
about such positions is with the notion of narrow content itself. Because
the chief proposals for articulating that notion – the narrow function theory of Stephen White and Jerry Fodor and the narrow conceptual role
semantics of Ned Block and Brian Loar – are generally acknowledged as
failures, one hope has been that the renewed attention to the phenomenal would provide the basis for a reinvigorated expression of the narrow
content program. But it seems that the notion of phenomenology itself is
as contestable between individualists and externalists as is that of intentionality. If this is true, then the idea of reviving narrow intentionality via
an appeal to phenomenology inherits that contestability.21
Perhaps the initial surprise is that phenomenology itself should remain somewhat mysterious. In the good old days, when the phenomenal
was neglected for the intentional, intentionality was thought to be more
theoretically loaded, subject more to the grinding of particular axes, than
phenomenology, in part because of the immediacy, directness, and firstperson intimacy of the phenomenal. Recall Horgan and Tienson’s claim
that “[i]f you pay attention to your own experience, we think you will
come to appreciate” the inseparability of the intentional and the phenomenal. Yet such attention and what it reveals are more contestable
than one might initially think.

In mentioning Wilhelm Wundt in passing at the end of section 3,
and so alluding to the introspectionist tradition in early experimental
psychology to which Wundt was central, I have implicitly suggested that
some of the problems in thinking about phenomenology parallel those
that Wundt faced in thinking about the nature of introspection. If the
advice on how to be a good introspectionist early in the twentieth century
was “Don’t listen to the psychologists,” then the corresponding advice on
how to be a good phenomenologist early in the twenty-first century might
be “Don’t listen to the philosophers.” And while it is not all the advice
one could hope for, it might be advice enough for now.

262
part four
THE COGNITIVE METAPHOR IN THE
BIOLOGICAL AND SOCIAL SCIENCES
263
264
11
Group Minds in Historical Perspective
1 group minds and the cognitive metaphor
in the biological and social sciences
There are two strands to our thinking about where the mind begins and
ends, and the role that the individual has in demarcating that boundary.

First, individuals are paradigmatic subjects or bearers of mental states:
They are the things, perhaps the only things, which literally have minds.

Minds are where, perhaps only where, people are. Second, individuals
serve as some sort of boundary for the mind. Minds are located inside
individuals, and we do not need to consider the body or the extracranial
world in theorizing about the nature of minds. The argument of Parts Two
and Three has been that this second strand to our thinking about the
relationship between individuals and minds is mistaken. For the most
part, this rejection of the mind as bounded by the individual has gone
hand-in-hand with the acceptance of minds as belonging to individuals.

In Part Four, this latter view is reconsidered. I shall take seriously the
idea that individuals are not the only kind of thing that has a mind. In
particular, I focus on the idea that groups can have minds. Doing so will
take us beyond the cognitive to both the biological and social sciences.

For it is in these other parts of the fragile sciences that the idea of a group
mind has a rich history, a history appealed to in a number of contemporary discussions. In this chapter, I consider the history, and in the next
the contemporary revivals of what I shall call the group mind hypothesis.

The idea that there are group minds will strike many as either an
ontological extravagance or an outright absurdity with which neither
biologists nor social scientists need concern themselves. Yet this group
265
266 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
mind hypothesis was prominent both in social psychology and social theory in the late nineteenth century and in the study of social insects and
community ecology in the early part of the twentieth century. It was defended by many of the most influential thinkers in these fields and gained
support from the range of resemblances between at least some groups
and individuals. Moreover, contemporary defenses of the group mind
hypothesis can be (and have been) expressed as part of more systematic
views that are reshaping the ways in which parts of biology and the social
sciences are conceptualized and practiced.

For example, expressed as the idea that there may be group-level cognitive adaptations, the group mind hypothesis forges a link between evolutionary psychology, based on the claim that the mind is subject to natural
selection in much the way that the body is, and recent work on the levels
of selection, which has become pluralistic and endorsed the claim that
natural selection operates at multiple levels, including that of the group.

And when expressed in terms of the place of institutions and cultural
practices in directing whole styles of cognition, the group mind hypothesis finds application both in anthropology and in the social studies of
science. Taking such claims seriously will enable a discussion of some
deep and interesting issues, such as the sense in which cognition is social, the relationship between evolution and cognition, and the interplay
between culture, evolution, and sociality.

The group mind hypothesis itself can be understood in two different
ways. First, it can be interpreted literally as saying that groups have minds
in just the way that individuals have minds. On this view, groups are a sort
of higher-order individual and function as such in biological or social
theory. Groups may not have minds as rich as our own, much as we might
think animals have just some subset of the full range of psychological
states that we have. But however restricted be their minds in scope and
richness, groups are mind-laden entities of some kind. Alternatively, the
hypothesis can be viewed as an instance of what I shall call the cognitive
metaphor, the idea that we metaphorically extend our conception of mind
from our paradigmatic individuals to things – in this case groups – that
are not individuals. On this view, groups are sufficiently like individuals in
some respects that it proves useful or even inevitable that we treat them as
if they had a psychology, as if they were mind-laden entities, when in fact
they are not. They have minds by courtesy, in virtue of our application of
a cognitive metaphor to them.

The literalist interpretation makes most direct sense of the appeal to
certain groups of organisms as superorganisms in the biological sciences,
and some human social groups (the crowd, an army, the nation) as manifesting a variety of individual-level properties. The metaphorical reading
locates the group mind hypothesis among other instances of the cognitive metaphor within the biological and social sciences. These range
from the view of genes as selfish or competitive and cells as recognizing,
remembering, preferring, and seeking certain other cells or molecules
within the biological sciences, to ascriptions of institutions and human
social practices as rational or friendly and corporations as morally and
legally responsible.

Each of these interpretations is helpful in making sense of the uses to
which the group mind hypothesis is put in the fragile sciences, and the
differences between them is not as sharp as one might initially suspect.

Hence, I shall rely on both of them over the next pair of chapters and will
not enter into any discussion of which is the correct way to understand
the group mind hypothesis.

2 two traditions
In order to articulate a thesis that can be understood in these two ways,
consider the following as a statement of the group mind hypothesis:
Groups of individual organisms can have or can be thought of as having minds in
something like the way in which individual organisms themselves can have minds.

The literalist can be seen as removing the “can be thought of” caveat
and sharpening the “something like” in this statement of the group mind
hypothesis, while the proponent of the cognitive metaphor interpretation
places emphasis on these softening aspects of the hypothesis.

The group mind hypothesis was held by many of the founders of social psychology and the social sciences more generally, including William
McDougall in the former and Emile Durkheim in the latter. The view
of human social groups acting in ways that were guided by their distinctive mental characteristics and activity was widespread at the turn
of the twentieth century in thinking about society and its foundations.

All such views, which I will refer to as forming part of the collective psychology tradition of thought, were developed in the broader context of
reflecting on the relationship between individuals and the societies that
they constituted. Those in the collective psychology tradition typically
defended some sort of nonreductionist view of this relationship. Despite
their otherwise diverging interests and orientations, these theorists were
committed to a view of the communal or collective aspect of psychology as
268 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
autonomous and separable from both physiology and the experimental
psychology that derived from it. The psychology of collectives was emergent from and thus not reducible to the psychology of the individuals in
those collectives and was to be studied as such.

The group mind hypothesis has an independent origin in foundational work in ecology and on the social insects in the first twenty years of
the twentieth century. The idea at the core of what I shall call the superorganism tradition in evolutionary biology is that in certain groups of living
things – in particular, in colonies of Hymenoptera – it is the group rather
than the individual organism that lives in those groups, that functions as
an integrated unit, having many of the properties that individual organisms possess in other species. Individual bees, ants, and wasps function
more like organs or (parts of ) bodily systems in those species. Colonies
are independent, self-regulating groups organized to achieve specific biological goals – such as food collection and distribution, nest construction
and maintenance, and reproduction – via dedicated behavioral strategies, where some of these strategies and the functions they perform can
properly be thought of as psychological or mental. Since the members
of these colonies often lack any or all of these goals and the accompanying strategies, these strategies and goals are emergent properties of the
colony, in much the way that a group mind was thought to be emergent
from individual minds in the collective psychology tradition in the social
sciences. The Harvard entomologist William Morton Wheeler is arguably
the key figure in the superorganism tradition.

The collective psychology and superorganism traditions, as I am construing them, each extend over some fifty or so years, and receive their
most crisp and influential expressions, respectively, shortly before and
shortly after the turn of the twentieth century. Authors working within
each of these traditions are diverse both in how they introduce the idea
of a group mind and what they are motivated by. The work within the
two traditions that seems to me of most interest in discussing the contemporary revival of the group mind hypothesis shares with that revival
a common explanationist commitment that might be characterized as
follows. Certain sorts of groups themselves have the ability to behave or
act as unified, integrated units, and these actions are properly or best
explained by positing a group mind. It is the group that behaves or acts,
and the cause of this behavior or action is, in some sense, the mind of
the group. I shall use this commitment to explanationism to help bring
out aspects of both traditions of relevance to contemporary claims about
group minds or group-level cognitive adaptations.

Both of these traditions postulate minds as emergent properties of
groups of organisms. Within these traditions, minds are group-level traits.

Yet there is a difference between the traditions on this issue important
enough for our later discussion to mark with some further terminology
now. In the collective psychology tradition, a group mind is what I will
call a multilevel trait, since the mind is claimed to exist at both the level
of the group and at the level of the individuals comprising the group. By
contrast, in the superorganism tradition, a group mind is a group-onlytrait,
in that it is claimed that it is only groups of social insects, not individual
members of those groups, which possess a mind.

Consider a nonpsychological illustration of the distinction between
multilevel and group-only traits, adapting an example suggested to me
by the biologist Michael Wade involving the fire ant (Solenopsis geminata).

Individual fire ants have the ability to sting small predators when they
are threatened, and this stinging action is often effective in deterring
such predators. Fire ants can also coordinate their individual stinging
behavior by emitting pheromonal signals, and this coordinated stinging
repels larger predators that attack the ant colony. The ability to sting is
a multilevel trait in that it is a trait that both individuals and groups can
possess. The capacity to deter large predators (or defend the nest) by
stinging, however, is a group-only trait, a trait that only groups of fire ants
possess.

In the next two sections, I shall discuss each of these traditions in some
detail before moving, in sections 5 and 6, to some critical analysis that
I hope sheds light on both. These traditions represent both insight and
confusion. Part of my aim will be to distinguish discovery from disease.

3 the collective psychology tradition
The collective psychology tradition has its roots in post-Commune
Parisian and French social thought, lasting roughly from 1870 to 1920.

Aspects of the tradition have been the subject of a number of detailed
professional historical studies. The tradition was largely motivated by and
focused on two sweeping, related social changes: a heightening in the visible actions of politically disenfranchised or marginalized individuals in
groups, including industrial strikes and peasant uprisings, and the increased activity of socialist and anarchist political organizations. These
two social changes were certainly related, and the collective psychology
tradition conceptualized their relationship in a particular way: as two
manifestations of the very same phenomena, the rise of the crowd.1
270 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
Although there are works that foreshadow the dark picture of the
crowd painted within the collective psychology tradition, the tradition
itself begins with the historical accounts of the French Revolution and
the Paris Commune by Hippolyte Taine in the mid-1870s, and reaches
an apotheosis in 1895 with the publication of the best-known work in the
tradition, Gustav Le Bon’s La Psychologie des foules, translated into English
simply as The Crowd. Authors in the tradition include Scipio Sighele and
Pasquale Rossi in Italy and Gabriel Tarde, Emile Zola, Henry Fournial,
and Emile Durkheim in France. The collective psychology tradition significantly shaped theories of “mass psychology” and political groups in
the early twentieth century.2
The above mixture of lawyers and criminologists, historians and anthropologists, novelists and social theorists here suggests that although
authors in the collective psychology tradition often invoked the name
of science, theirs was not simply a distant, academic perspective on new
social phenomena. Rather, the collective psychology tradition actively in-
fluenced how the very phenomena it studied was perceived and acted on
by those in political power. It was as much constituted by and appealed to
the popular imagination as by and to scholarly research. A number of the
works in the tradition became instant and long-term national bestsellers,
and their authors were consulted by a range of political authorities about
how best to deal with “the crowd” as a political entity.

The importance of the concept of a crowd, its unifying force for understanding contemporary social life in France in the last quarter of the
nineteenth century, and why the psychology of crowds provides the key
to understanding social upheaval, are brought out clearly in the early
pages of Le Bon’s The Crowd. Near the outset of his Preface, after linking
individuals and their abilities to the “genius of the race,” Le Bon says,
When, however, a certain number of these individuals are gathered together in a
crowd for purposes of action, observation proves that, from the mere fact of their
being assembled, there result certain new psychological characteristics, which
are added to the racial characteristics and differ from them at times to a very
considerable degree.

Organized crowds have always played an important part in the life of peoples,
but this part has never been of such moment as at present. The substitution of
the unconscious action of crowds for the conscious activity of individuals is one
of the principle characteristics of the present age.

The concept of the crowd is important to making sense of the social and
political climate, claims Le Bon, because the action of crowds has come to
replace that of individuals in the public sphere. The “crowd” that Le Bon
is interested in is not simply a gathering of individuals, however: It is an
organized crowd or a psychological crowd that exercises this heightened
influence over the direction of history. As such, crowds are not simply
aggregations of individuals, but something more. When such a crowd
exists,
The sentiments and ideas of all the persons in the gathering take one and the same
direction, and their conscious personality vanishes. A collective mind is formed,
doubtless transitory, but presenting very clearly defined characteristics. ...It [the
organized crowd] forms a single being, and is subjected to the law of the mental
unity of crowds.

3
This putative law claims that crowds destroy the individuality of those
that belong to them, psychologically unifying and homogenizing them
so that they act as one. We shall return to consider this law shortly. The
point to note for now is that the key to understanding the behavior of
crowds, something that we can all observe, is their underlying psychology,
something to be discovered. It is a putatively empirical or observational
study of the mental life of the crowd that is provided by the collective
psychology tradition.

Le Bon’s focus on a special type of gathering of individuals, one in
which an organized or psychological crowd is formed, however, is only apparent, as both the rest of his introduction and Part III of The Crowd make
clear. Having stated that his time is the era of crowds, Le Bon elaborates
by discussing the ways in which the “popular classes” have entered into
political life, and the increased “power of the masses” via labor unions,
parliamentary assemblies, and electorates. Understanding the psychology
of crowds is crucial to ameliorating the effects of these political changes,
and to controlling the masses within the existing political framework because such groups are themselves organized crowds. What we might call
gatherings represent but one type of crowd, but their psychology is also
the psychology of a diverse variety of collectivities, “crowds,” many of
which need not be aggregated in space and time as gatherings are.

Whether there is such a kind of thing as a crowd in this broad sense, a
kind that could be the object of scientific study and generalization, particularly of psychological study and generalization, requires closer scrutiny.

The term “crowd” within the collective psychology tradition encompassed
small and large gatherings (for example, mobs), associations constituted
chiefly by membership (for example, political parties), and institutional
abstractions (for example, electorates). All of these are social collectivities, but very different sorts of collectivities. The idea that each has a
272 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
psychology, a set of underlying mental dispositions and traits, let alone
that all share a common psychology, seems doubtful.4
By contrast, the idea that there might be general rules about social
control that can be formulated and exercised on a variety of levels, and
that these can be uncovered by understanding the “psychology of crowds,”
does provide an arena in which a broad, unified concept of crowds may
operate. Thus, we can use our crowd psychology, claims Le Bon, to see
why an indirect tax on consumer goods will be more readily accepted by
“the crowd” than will a direct tax on income; to select and influence a
jury in a trial; or to counteract the illegal acts of an angry mob.5
As several authors have noted, although Le Bon borrowed heavily from
earlier authors in what I am calling the collective psychology tradition,
his emphasis on the practical political consequences of “understanding crowds” shows a greater debt to Machiavelli’s The Prince than to the
nascent social science to which he explicitly gestures. Indeed, The Crowd
became extremely influential within French military circles prior to the
outbreak of the First World War, and a number of Le Bon’s subsequent
books placed less emphasis on the danger posed by the crowd than on
delivering advice on how to regiment and control groups of people in
order to extract the best from them.6
As might be expected, the collective psychology tradition drew on developing psychological views of the individual, particularly on what have
been called irrationalist theories of individual psychology invoked to explain individual deviance and breakdown. The real key to understanding the psychology of crowds was to recognize the ways in which such
a psychology was diametrically opposed to the psychology of individuals
in everyday life. The fundamental juxtaposition, which we have already
seen in passing in the quotes I have given from Le Bon, was between the
rational, conscious, and controlled individual, and the irrational, unconscious, and potentially uncontrollable crowd.7
The historian Susanna Barrows has pointed to the debt that the collective psychology tradition owed to Jean-Martin Charcot’s work on hypnosis and suggestibility as a rising form of irrationalism about individual
behavior. Hypnosis provides one mechanism by which an individual can
be changed from a thinking, rational, conscious agent to an unthinking,
irrational, unconscious agent. Forming a part of an organized crowd,
claims Le Bon, constitutes another way of bringing about such a transformation in an individual. This contrast appeals to the emotionality of
individuals in a crowd, as opposed to their rationality as individuals in everyday life. Le Bon cites the sentiment of invincibility, the contagiousness
of sentiments, and suggestibility as the three features of individuals that
cause crowds to have the psychology they do.8
The attribution of a heightened level of emotion in crowds, and the
contrast between rational individuals and emotional crowds, allowed
the crowd to be characterized in terms of dominant social dichotomies.

The psychology of the crowd was described as both feminine (rather than
masculine), and primitive (rather than civilized), ascribing to crowds the
putatively inferior minds of women and savages. This identification of
crowd psychology, manifesting and reinforcing a form of democraphobia
in the late nineteenth century, was seized on in the fascistic appropriations
of theories of mass psychology in the early twentieth century, including
in the work and thought of both Benito Mussolini and Adolph Hitler.9
This brief summary suggests three components at the core of the collective psychology tradition: (i) a deep mistrust and fear of crowds; (ii) a
way of understanding their psychology that drew on and reified existing
gendered and racialist thinking; and (iii) a self-image of thinkers from
diverse intellectual backgrounds forging a new science, that of the psychology of the crowd, of real practical import. As some of my comments
about Le Bon suggest, however, alongside this overarching framework in
which crowds were viewed negatively and pessimistically, there was also
a more enthusiastic view of what only crowds, not individuals, could accomplish, a view that built on perhaps only (iii) above.

This optimistic strand to the collective psychology tradition extended
from roughly 1895 until 1920 and was particularly prevalent amongst
some of the most influential participants in the emergence of both psychology and the social sciences, particularly sociology and anthropology.

Wilhelm Wundt’s Volkerpsychologie ¨ (discussed briefly in Part One), Emile
Durkheim’s collective representations, and William McDougall’s group
mind each constituted the basis for conceptualizing groups of individuals
in a more positive light. Collectively they represent attempts to theorize
about the products of group actions as cultural achievements. The processes leading to these achievements remain conceptualized as the underlying psychology of the group, and as such were viewed as irreducible
to changes wrought on an individual. But this group mind was no longer
dark, destructive, and to be feared. Rather, its formation was crucial to
diverse social accomplishments, ranging from military victories to the distinctive progressive political organizations associated with the established
and emerging democracies within Europe.10
It was within this more optimistic strand within the collective psychology tradition that one finds a vision of group psychology as both
274 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
a meliorative and celebratory project. In the work of McDougall and
William Trotter written self-consciously in the shadow of the First World
War, groups constitute a natural environment for the development of
basic human instincts, the foremost of which is gregariousness. It is thus
important that humans form the right sorts of group so that this positive
instinct can be properly nourished and play a role in directing individuals into constructive rather than destructive behavior. This conception
of the group mind gave its study within social psychology and the social
sciences a sense of importance and urgency in making a difference to the
directions in which society as a whole were to take.11
These two strands to the collective psychology tradition – its original,
pessimistic view of the group mind and its later, more encouraging view –
both need to be kept in mind as we consider other developments of
the group mind hypothesis. For the group mind has often been viewed
exclusively through either a negative or a positive lens.

4 the superorganism tradition
Unlike the collective psychology tradition, the superorganism tradition
has not been well canvassed by professional historians. The chief discussions of this tradition are to be found in brief historical precursors or
afterthoughts in broader reviews by contemporary biologists, such as that
on social insects by Edward O. Wilson and on group selection by David
Sloan Wilson. As such, these are very much internal histories, told by those
who form part of the research lineage whose history is recounted.12
The apparent intricate social harmony and organization of the “social
insects” – the Hymenopteran wasps, bees, and ants, as well as the termites –
has been invoked as a model for moralizing about human society for
centuries. Unsurprisingly, it is these social insects that have been taken
as paradigms within the superorganism tradition, a tradition central to
the biological sciences from roughly 1900 until 1950. Rather than viewing itself as intermeshed with and building on existing common-sense
beliefs about group behavior, as did the collective psychology tradition,
the superorganism tradition set itself apart from prescientific, anecdotal reports on and claims about the groups on which it focused, insect
colonies. Their systematic study, however, remained linked to a wider
understanding of prosocial life.

The earliest work in this tradition that utilized the concept (even if
not the name) of the superorganism was in plant ecology, where there
was an early recognition of the various levels at which living systems
were organized. Ecology was founded as a science studying communities of organisms, and early in its history Frederic E. Clements introduced the idea that the key to understanding changes in communities of
plants over time was to view those communities themselves as complex
organisms. These complex organisms themselves formed plant-animal
communities or biomes, and both complex organisms and biomes were
viewed as more than the sum of their individual parts. Clements treated
biomes as subject to developmental regularities, whereby the succession
of biomes could be viewed as moving from immature to mature states,
something that could be measured in terms of species numbers and diversity. This is the beginning of the treatment of populations of organisms
as having a physiology. This physiological, organismic view of populations came to play a crucial role in the Chicago school of ecology headed
by Warder Clyde Allee, especially in the experimental work of Thomas
Park.13
Ecological work in this broader tradition was in part inspired by observation of the ways in which individual organisms, both within a species and
between species, operated in harmony with one another, from mere coexistence to active cooperation. This observation, made initially in plant
communities, also motivated similar developments in animal ecology.

Although research in both plant and animal ecology covered a wide range
of forms that sociality and community took across the living world, it was
the special form of social organization found in the social insects that
became the focus of the superorganism tradition itself.14
I have already said that perhaps the most central figure in the superorganism tradition as it developed with this focus on the social insects
was William Morton Wheeler, professor of entomology at the Museum
of Comparative Zoology at Harvard University from 1908 until his retirement in 1933. Wheeler’s career extended over a fifty-year period, and
his publications included many popular articles as well as a dozen books,
including the influential Ants (1910), Social Life Among the Insects (1923),
and The Social Insects (1928).15
Wheeler’s 1911 essay “The Ant-Colony as an Organism” developed the
idea of thinking of an insect colony as a higher-order organism, and his hilarious, insightful 1920 essay “The Termitodoxa, or Biology and Society”
introduced the term “superorganism” to describe such a colony. In the
earlier essay, Wheeler had defined an organism functionally as anything
that has the capacities for nutrition, reproduction, and protection, and
in the latter essay he correlates these with “castes” in termite societies:
respectively, workers, “the royal couple,” and soldiers.

276 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
Edward O. Wilson has implied that Wheeler’s defense of his thesis that
the ant colony is literally an organism follows readily from the breadth of
Wheeler’s functional definition of an organism. In fact, Wheeler actually
places little weight on the definition and concentrates instead on showing
that ant colonies share a wider range of features with paradigmatic organisms, such as individuality and regeneration. Wheeler’s deepest motivation for defending the idea of colonies as superorganisms derives from
and in turn further stimulates his sustained interest in the sociality of
organisms in general and of certain species of organism in particular.

Wheeler concludes “The Ant-Colony as an Organism” with some brief
comments about what he calls “the problem of the correlation and cooperation of parts,” saying
If the cell is a colony of lower physiological units, or biophores, as some cytologists
believe, we must face the fact that all organisms are colonial or social and that one
of the fundamental tendencies of life is sociogenic. Every organism manifests a
strong predilection for seeking out other organisms and either assimilating them
or cooperating with them to form a more comprehensive and efficient individual.

Wheeler suggests that colonies provide a more experimentally tractable
system for exploring this problem than do individual organisms. This, in
turn, presupposes that there is one and the same problem about colonial
and organismic life, and that it may have been solved in one and the same
way.16
We can express this problem in two ways, one suggested by Wheeler’s
name for it, the other by his putative solution, “egoistic altruism.” As a
problem of the parts, we might see this as the problem of why and how an
individual, whether it be a colony or an individual organism, manages
to coordinate its parts harmoniously, given their own organismic character. Conversely, the idea of egoistic altruism – of cooperating in order to
benefit one’s own self – suggests not a problem of parts but of wholes, of
why and how it is that individual units, each satisfying Wheeler’s threepronged functional characterization of organisms, come to form larger
such units. So expressed, this approximates the problem of altruism, the
problem of explaining how phenotypes that differentially benefit individuals other than their bearer could have evolved through a process of
natural selection.

Although the superorganism tradition has maintained a focus on the
forms of sociality within the social insects, it has also shared Wheeler’s
interest in sociality in general, often with the social insects serving as a
paradigm for thought. Wheeler himself adapted his trichotomy between
nutritive, reproductive, and protective organismic functions from their
role in defining the organism and in characterizing castes within termite
colonies, to serving as the basis for distinguishing three forms that “true
societies” could take, depending on which of these functions predominate in the emergent social behavior. Corals and higher vascular plants,
in which a colony is formed asexually by reiterated budding, exemplify
a nutritive society, the social insects a reproductive society, and flocks and
herds of birds, mammals, and fishes, in which unrelated individuals act
together for protection, a defensive society. For Wheeler, such eusocial
groups both benefit the individuals that participate in them and, since
Wheeler thinks of them as types of superorganisms, they also benefit
themselves. Since there are two levels of adaptedness, the individual organism and the superorganism, there are two recipients of evolutionary
benefit.17
This concern with the form and levels of sociality within the superorganism tradition has been guided by a pluralistic view of the level at which
natural selection operates, that is, the view that natural selection can operate on a range of biological entities, from genes and cells to organisms
and groups. Group selection has been viewed as the most problematic
part of such a pluralistic view. Although I do not want to enter into substantive discussion of the debate over the agents of selection here, note
briefly two paths for exploring the interplay between group selection and
the conception of sociality within the superorganism tradition.18
First, consider the path from the superorganism tradition to a conception of sociality via the appeal to group selection. The extension of
Darwinian natural selection to at least groups of organisms that are themselves organisms, superorganisms, makes perfect sense, since the natural
selection that takes place between such groups is a form of competition
between individuals. Since group selection has been traditionally invoked
principally to explain the origins and evolution of sociality, within the superorganism tradition sociality itself is a natural feature of individual organisms, one that arises from the process of group selection. Here group
selection promotes sociality.

Second, consider a more direct connection between the superorganism tradition and the naturalness of individual sociality, and its implications for thinking about the “levels” at which natural selection operates.

For superorganisms there is a clear sense in which the opposition between
individual and group interest that has been taken as constitutive of the
classic problem of altruism does not exist. The competing interests of individual organisms within a superorganism have played to a draw, much
278 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
as one might think that they have in the case of individual cells within an
organism. Thus, the very existence of sociality is deemed unproblematic
or natural. Superorganisms are just those groups of organisms that have
overcome Wheeler’s “problem of the coordination and cooperation of
parts,” where the parts are individual organisms. Individual organisms
that are part of superorganisms have, in effect, eliminated or minimized
within-group selection. This suggests that in superorganisms the force
of natural selection between groups should be greater than that within
groups. Thus, if the sociality of individuals within superorganisms is to be
expected, so too is the strength of group selection, which is just selection
between groups. Here sociality promotes group selection.

The group mind hypothesis goes beyond a defense of the superorganism in that it postulates the emergence not simply of a novel individual but
one with a mind. Yet so far nothing I have said about the superorganism
tradition bears on the attribution of mental properties to superorganisms,
and thus on the concept of a group mind. Indeed, explicit endorsement
of the group mind hypothesis has been less pronounced in, and the hypothesis itself has been more peripheral to, the superorganism tradition
than to the collective psychology tradition. This has been so for at least
three related reasons.

In the first place, there has been a greater concentration on defending the integrity of the concept of the superorganism itself, introduced
as a novel scientific concept for understanding ecological and social organization, particularly that found in eusocial insect colonies. The collective psychologists, by contrast, devoted little attention to defending “the
crowd” as a legitimate, scientific construal of human groups – perhaps,
as I have implied above, less attention than they should have. Moreover,
for those like Clements who adapted the superorganism concept to make
sense of plant communities and biomes, even if populations were understood as having something like an ontogeny and a physiology, there was
little motivation to ascribe distinctly psychological functions to their objects of study. Even for someone like Wheeler, the superorganism concept
primarily allowed one to treat insect colonies via a form of social physiology, not psychology. Thus, with attention focused on whether insect
colonies were organisms at all, and an emphasis on adapting a physiological rather than a psychological methodology, the question of whether
they were organisms with minds became secondary.

Second, the predication of mental or psychological characteristics to
individual animals has generally been more circumspect than it has been
to individual humans. This has constrained the readiness with which
those characteristics could be extended to groups of animals. Particularly
for those setting out to go beyond folklore about the social insects and
engage in systematic scientific study of them, C. Lloyd Morgan’s canon –
never invoke a higher-level mechanism when a lower-level mechanism will
do – has loomed large. Both the behaviorist tradition within psychology
and the developing ethological tradition associated with Konrad Lorenz
and Nikko Tinbergen offered accounts of animal behavior that, in their
different ways, minimized appeals to the mind (as opposed simply to
internal brain physiology). These traditions thus created a climate in
which psychological attribution to animals was circumspect. When one’s
focus was animals whose individual members might be thought to have
minds in only some trivial sense, these tendencies of cautious mental
attribution were amplified. If insect societies were to have a group mind,
then not only would they constitute a new entity, the superorganism,
but this entity would itself have emergent properties of a kind that its
constituents lacked. In terms that I introduced at the end of section 2,
minds within the superorganism tradition are group-only, not multilevel
traits, and this fact about them contributed to making endorsement of the
group mind hypothesis circumspect within the superorganism tradition.

Third, as we have seen, collective psychologists readily helped themselves to the developing notion of unconscious mental processes in individuals to explain the behavior of crowds and how they produced
something like group personality traits: They were fickle, foolhardy,
emotional, irrational. For collective psychologists, the group mind was
the seamy and steamy emotional underbelly of human nature, reducing
complex and rich psychological processes and traits to simpler and more
impoverished ones. But no such processes or traits could be invoked
within the superorganism tradition without a charge of anthropomorphism being laid. This left those in the superorganism tradition with more
limited resources for explaining the mechanisms through which a group
mind could have evolved or operated, and truncated the list of human
mental characteristics that could be literally or even metaphorically ascribed to animal societies.

Given the evolutionary and functional motivations for positing superorganisms, it is no surprise to find that the sorts of psychological properties that were postulated within the superorganism tradition were those
that served some identifiable biological function in the relevant species.

These include the perceptual and communicative abilities involved in
gathering information about food sources and the motoric capacities to
utilize resources and avoid predators and dangers in the world. Some
280 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
of these abilities, such as the ability of the bee colony to locate distant
sources of nectar and regulate the relative number of foragers and hive
workers in accord with the richness of the source, or the ability of the termite colony to rapidly repair damage to its nest, manifest both some level
of intentionality and a degree of concern over the integrity of the colony.

In short, the behaviors of at least some groups is such that it seems directed at self-preservation, where the self here is a colony, and the means
of achieving that goal is cognitive.

I have already intimated that both the collective psychology and superorganism traditions embody some confusions. It is to one of these
that I turn next, the confusion between the group mind hypothesis and
quite a distinct thesis about the nature of individual minds, the social
manifestation thesis.

5 group minds and the social manifestation thesis
As a way of introducing this confusion, let me begin with William
McDougall’s critical dissent from a reductionist claim made by Herbert
Spencer. In defending a reductionist view of social groups, Spencer had
introduced an analogy between how emergent properties of groups of
physical entities, such as stable geometrical forms and crystallization, and
those of social groups could be understood. To Spencer’s claim that the
“structure and properties of a society are determined by the properties
of the units, the individual human beings, of which it is composed,”
McDougall says,
the aggregate which is a society has, in virtue of its past history, positive qualities
which it does not derive from the units which compose it at any one time; and in
virtue of these qualities it acts upon its units in a manner very different from that
in which the units as such interact with one another. Further, each unit, when it
becomes a member of a group, displays properties or modes of reaction which
it does not display, which remain latent or potential only, so long as it remains
outside that group. It is possible, therefore, to discover the potentiality of the
units only by studying them as elements in the life of the whole.

McDougall’s continuation of this passage reexpresses his view in terms
that make its location within the collective psychology tradition more
explicit, as follows:
That is to say, the aggregate which is a society has a certain individuality, is a true
whole which in great measure determines the nature and the modes of activity
of its parts; it is an organic whole. The society has a mental life which is not
the mere sum of the mental lives of its units existing as independent units; and
a complete knowledge of the units, if and in so far as they could be known as
isolated units, would not enable us to deduce the nature of the life of the whole,
in the way that is implied by Spencer’s analogies [to stable geometrical forms and
crystallization].19
Melded together here, in both of the halves of this long passage, are two
quite distinct ways in which one might develop the general nonreductionist view of the relationship between society and the individual that
we have seen was characteristic of adherents to the collective psychology
tradition.

First, there is the idea that groups have properties, including mental
properties, which their individual members do not have, and which are
not reducible to the properties of those members. This emergentist view
of group properties, together with the further assumption that some of
these properties are psychological, entails a version of the group mind
hypothesis that postulates group psychological traits. These traits, while
in a strict sense multilevel traits (such as being angry or irrational), are not
actually possessed by the individuals in the corresponding social group
prior to or simultaneous with their forming that group. In this sense, these
group psychological properties are something other (or more) than the
properties of those individuals. Thus, they are more like group-only than
multilevel traits.

Second, there is the idea that individuals have properties, including
psychological properties, that are manifest only when those individuals
form part of a group of a certain type. This is what I shall call the social
manifestation thesis. Precisely how this sits with the group mind hypothesis
is far less clear, since it makes a claim about the character of individual
minds, and it would seem that any group properties relevant to this claim
could be and indeed would likely be nonpsychological in character.

For example, suppose that individual people become angry or aggressive in certain ways only when they form a certain type of group (for
example, a crowd). Then, unless they do so only because the crowd itself has a specific psychological profile, there is no need to posit group
psychological properties, and so no role for the group mind hypothesis.

Moreover, insofar as the social manifestation thesis does lead to the group
mind hypothesis, it does so only via the first view above, and so there is no
independent path from the social manifestation thesis to the group mind
hypothesis. It could still be true, of course, that there are important senses
in which group behavior cannot be reduced to or be derivable from that
of the individuals within it, even if what explains that behavior are the psychological states of individuals of whom the social manifestation thesis is
282 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
true. These points together suggest that the nonreductionist motivation
undergirding the collective psychology tradition, especially in its latter,
more optimistic phase from 1895 to 1920, does not lead indelibly to the
group mind hypothesis.

These two views, the group mind hypothesis and the social manifestation thesis, are logically independent. Clearly, the social manifestation
thesis could be true without entailing the group mind hypothesis if group
minds did not exist. Conversely, the group mind hypothesis could be true
without entailing the social manifestation thesis if the relevant groups
were comprised of individuals that did not have minds at all. We will return to further explore the relationship between the social manifestation
thesis and the group mind hypothesis in the next chapter.

6 collective psychology, superorganisms,
and socially manifested minds
Shifts between the group mind hypothesis and the social manifestation
thesis are common in the collective psychology tradition. But I also want
to make the perhaps initially puzzling proposal that those in this tradition
in fact have a primary preoccupation with the social manifestation thesis.

Although they often express their views in ways that suggest an explicit
endorsement of the group mind hypothesis, the broader context in which
their views are developed makes the social manifestation thesis a more
plausible interpretation of what they mean. I shall provide support for
this view by discussing a few representative quotations from the work of
Wilhelm Wundt and Gustav Le Bon.

For example, consider the chapter headed “Mental communities” in
Wundt’s Outlines of Psychology. Here Wundt focuses on the importance of
the environment, especially the social environment, both to the development of the child and to the sorts of properties that are significant for
individual consciousness. This focus is appropriate if the social manifestation thesis is one’s primary concern. But Wundt says, strikingly, that
these social interconnections have just as much reality as the individual consciousness itself. In this sense we may speak of the interconnection of the ideas
and feelings of a social community as a collective consciousness, and of the common
volitional tendencies as a collective will.

20
The first of Wundt’s claims here, and the chapter in general, supports
some version of the social manifestation thesis, even if his second claim
expresses a version of the group mind hypothesis.

We see the same shift in Le Bon’s The Crowd, which, as we have seen,
attempted to delineate the psychological characteristics of crowds and
their degrading effect on individual human cognitive performance.

Le Bon says
Whoever be the individuals that compose it, however like or unlike be their mode
of life, their occupations, their character, or their intelligence, the fact that they
have been transformed into a crowd puts them in possession of a sort of collective
mind which makes them feel, think, and act in a manner quite different from
that in which each individual of them would feel, think, and act were he in a state
of isolation.21
This is a version of Le Bon’s law of the mental unity of crowds, a view that
the sociologist Clark McPhail has called the transformation thesis, since it
is a thesis about how individuals are transformed when they belong to a
crowd. As such, clearly this is a view about the abilities and proclivities
of individuals, and should be subsumed under the social manifestation
thesis. Le Bon’s “law” implies the group mind hypothesis only if individuals are transformed because a group mind is formed, or a group mind
is a consequence of this transformation. Each of these is a further claim,
however, one for which no further argument is given. This is, in part,
because Le Bon himself has not distinguished the two theses in the first
place. If Le Bon’s chief concern is with how the capacities and abilities
of individuals are changed when they form a crowd, as I have been suggesting, then talk of group minds is a confusing (even if vivid) way of
expressing something like the social manifestation thesis.22
Prima facie, there is less room in the superorganism tradition for this
sort of melding of the social manifestation thesis with the group mind
hypothesis, chiefly because of the more circumspect and limited appeal
to psychological properties at all within it. For the social insects, recall
that the group mind is posited as a group-only trait, and at least in this case
there are no individual minds to have socially manifested, psychological
properties. In the case of plant communities and plant-animal biomes, as
I have already noted, there is a more circumscribed tendency to endorse
either the group mind hypothesis or the social manifestation thesis at all.

There is in the superorganism tradition, however, a shift between two
views that parallel our two theses, between a nonpsychological version
of the social manifestation thesis, and the claim that certain communal
groups are (literally) superorganisms. In addition, in at least places it
is the former of these that captures the heart of work in the superorganism tradition, even when language that suggests the superorganism
284 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
conception predominates. For example, although Clements and Shelford
postulate the biome as a living entity in its own right, the primary concern of their book as a whole, and the guiding idea of early ecology more
generally, is that animals and plants exert a ubiquitous, mutual influence
on one another. By virtue of this influence that exists between individual
organisms, each is able to act in ways that it could not otherwise act. This
is a behavioral or physiological version of the social manifestation thesis,
and is independent of the postulation of communities or biomes as superorganisms. Likewise, at the core of Allee et al.’s review of the social
insects is a discussion of both “the division of labor between individuals
composing the group and the integrative mechanisms that give unity to
the group,” both of which concern properties of and relations between
individuals. Individuals take on these properties only in the “true social”
insects. While Allee et al. take this to support the postulation of superorganismic status for the group, this is clearly a further claim, one that was
particularly pronounced in the contributions of Alfred Emerson to the
Chicago school’s approach.23
I suspect that it is likely a fruitless endeavor to attempt to defend the
idea that one or the other of these ideas is overall more fundamental
within the superorganism tradition, for each of them was drawn on and
developed for different purposes. My chief point here is that expressions
that suggest something like the group mind hypothesis should not always
be taken at face value, and that thinking about the ways in which groups
serve as a crucial context for the manifestation of individual capacities,
including cognitive capacities, may more adequately take one to issues at
the heart of the both traditions.

7 from the past to the present
In the previous section, I said that the superorganism tradition is motivated in large part by the observation of a variety of forms of social
harmony in the living world. Peaceful coexistence and cooperation are
viewed as constituting natural relationships between individual organisms, and there are mutual benefits gained by individuals through these
forms of social organization. The social manifestation thesis and the
group mind hypothesis represent the foundation of two different ways to
develop a scientific account of this observation.

The social manifestation thesis places an emphasis on an individual’s
abilities and dispositions, albeit those manifest in particular social contexts. Here whether an individual belongs to a group of a certain kind
becomes important to understanding that individual’s psychology, but
there is no need to posit psychological properties of groups themselves.

The group mind hypothesis, by contrast, does look to levels of organization larger than the individual in identifying the subjects of psychology,
claiming that groups themselves have minds. To many, this will seem to
involve a more far-reaching revision to our ideas of what minds are, and
what can possess them.

The argument in this chapter, particularly in the previous section,
has been that many putative expressions of the group mind hypothesis,
particularly those in the collective psychology tradition, are in fact better
characterized as expressions of something like the social manifestation
thesis. If this is correct, then, given the distinction between these two
theses, there is a real issue as to whether the group mind hypothesis does
form a central part of either the collective psychology or superorganism
traditions. If the social manifestation thesis more accurately captures both
traditions, then contemporary defenses of the group mind hypothesis are
misconceived if they are viewed as revivals of lost traditions of thought.

I shall argue, in the next chapter, that there is an additional layer of
misconception in such a construal of the group mind hypothesis. This is
because its contemporary putative expression is also better construed as
an expression of the social manifestation thesis.

12
The Group Mind Hypothesis in Contemporary
Biology and Social Science
1 reviving the group mind
In the previous chapter, I suggested that the group mind hypothesis could
be understood either literally or metaphorically. Expressions of the group
mind hypothesis, both in the collective psychology and superorganism
traditions and in contemporary discussions, often lend themselves to the
literalist interpretation, although I argued in the previous chapter that in
fact many of these are better understood as somewhat confusing attempts
to state a version of the social manifestation thesis. I shall begin by briefly
looking at contemporary views that appear to express the group mind
hypothesis, and then raise questions about how they are best understood,
and what notion of mind they draw on.

David Sloan Wilson has been a key advocate of the group mind hypothesis in the biological sciences, casting his advocacy in terms of the
notion of cognitive adaptations and locating it within his broader defense of group selection and group-level adaptations. Group-level adaptations are species-specific phenotypes, including behaviors, that evolved
because they conferred a selective advantage on their bearers, that is, on
the groups of organisms that have them. In extending the notion of a
group-level adaptation to cognitive phenotypes, Wilson says,
Group-level adaptations are usually studied in the context of physical activities
such as resource utilization, predator defense, and so on. However, groups can
also evolve into adaptive units with respect to cognitive activities such as decision
making, memory, and learning. As one example, decision making is a process
that involves identifying a problem, imagining a number of alternative solutions,
evaluating the alternatives, and making the final decision on how to behave. Each
of these activities can be performed by an individual as a self-contained cognitive
286
unit but might be performed even better by groups of individuals interacting in
a coordinated fashion. At the extreme, groups might become so integrated and
the contribution of any single member might become so partial that the group
could literally be said to have a mind in a way that individuals do not, just as brains
have a mind in a way that neurons do not.

Examples of group-level cognitive adaptations that Wilson cites here are
foraging and resource allocation strategies in bee colonies, as discussed by
David Seeley, human group decision making, and what Herbert Prins has
called “voting behavior” in buffalo herds in deciding in which direction
to move.1
As the passage above indicates, part of Wilson’s argumentative strategy involves showing that cognitive or psychological processes are no
exception to the general phenomenon of group-level adaptation. Wilson
himself identifies his defense of the group mind hypothesis as a revival
of an idea prominent in the foundations of the social sciences. What he
finds problematic about “early views of the group mind in humans” is
that they “were usually stated in a grandiose form and without attention
to mechanisms, similar to naive group selectionism in biology during the
same period.” His revival of the group mind hypothesis within a sophisticated group selectionist framework is a remedy to at least the latter of
these problems.2
The group mind hypothesis has received a more cautious and circumscribed defense within the social sciences, where intimations that
groups can think, decide, remember, or cognize more generally are typically hedged in ways that invite the metaphorical interpretation of the
hypothesis. For example, in her How Institutions Think, the anthropologist Mary Douglas urges a reconsideration of the contributions of Emile
Durkheim and Ludwig Fleck to the foundations of sociology, particularly
their treatment of institutions and social groups “as if they were individuals.” Recognizing “a tendency to dismiss Durkheim and Fleck because
they seem to be saying that institutions have minds of their own,” Douglas
attempts to “clarify the extent to which thinking depends upon institutions” through a discussion of Durkheim’s priority of the social over the
individual and Fleck’s notion of a thought collective.3
Likewise, in attempting to demarcate cultural psychology as a distinct
field, Richard Shweder introduces the idea of intentional worlds that
individuals share, taking cultural psychology to be the study of such
worlds. But Shweder is, like Douglas, wary of understanding such a study
as implying that social structures in and of themselves have minds, apart
from the intentionality that individual agents have. In both cases we need
288 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
to move beyond the attribution of in-the-head representations to individuals in order to do full justice to the complexity of social and cultural
phenomena, and this is done through making cognitive attributions to
entities larger than the individual.4
David Sloan Wilson has recently extended his thinking about the group
mind hypothesis to understand the nature of religious ideas and social
organizations. In doing so, he bridges between the biological and social
sciences, a trademark of some of his earlier work. Wilson’s basic idea is
to see society and particular social structures as organisms, with religion
being one of the culturally evolved adaptations that maintain this social
organism over time. Again locating his views against the background of
his multilevel theory of selection, he says
If the individual is no longer a privileged unit of selection, it is no longer a
privileged unit of cognition. We are free to imagine individuals in a social group
connected in a circuitry that gives the group the status of the brain and the
individual the status of the neuron.5
While Wilson considers religion as a group-level adaptation, his expression here is interestingly neutral between a literal and a metaphorical
reading of the group mind hypothesis.

Critical to determining the plausibility of the group mind hypothesis, on either the literal or metaphorical understanding, is some further
discussion of what it means to have a mind at all.

2 on having a mind
A common reaction to the group mind hypothesis, at least among many
working biologists and social scientists, is that it has no real empirical
content because mindedness, the property of having a mind, is so vague.

This view of the group mind hypothesis is, no doubt, facilitated by the
ubiquity of the cognitive metaphor in describing biological and social
processes. But I suspect that this view also reflects an ignorance of and
an insensitivity to the conceptual work necessary to articulate what it is
to have a mind. Regarding this latter point, I think we can make some
progress.

In order for some entity to have a mind it must possess at least some
psychological properties (states, processes, dispositions). Rather than attempting to offer a definition or analysis of what a psychological property
is, let the following incomplete list suffice to fix our ideas. There are classical faculties, such as perception, memory, and imagination; processes
or abilities that are the focus of much contemporary work in the cognitive
sciences, such as attention, motivation, consciousness, decision making,
and problem solving; and common, folk psychological states, such as believing, desiring, intending, trying, willing, fearing, and hoping. But what
is it to possess one or more of these?
Whatever else is involved in having a psychological property, it surely
turns largely on how one is physically structured. In particular, one must
have a physical structure that realizes or implements that property (state,
process, disposition). If we put this together with the standard view of
realization discussed in Part Two, to possess a psychological property is to
contain what I called an entity-bounded system or systems that realize processes that generate or physically constitute that property (state, process,
disposition). For at least our paradigms of cognitive agents – intact, fully
functioning, normal human beings – I have argued that we need a more
general concept of realization, what I called the context-sensitive view,
which allows that the systems that realize cognition can extend beyond
the boundary of the individual. Replacing the standard with the contextsensitive view of realization gives us the following account of what it is for a
paradigm cognitive agent, A, to possess or have a psychological property:
A possesses psychological property (state, process, disposition) P just if A either
physically contains an entity-bounded system or systems, or is part of a wide system
or systems, that realize the processes that generate or physically constitute P.

So when Tom feels pain, he has that property by virtue of physically containing a nociceptive system that generates that feeling. When he believes
that snow is white, it is by virtue of being part of a folk psychological system
that extends beyond his own head.

This account does not tell us why it is A – rather than, say A plus or
minus bits of the physical world (including bits of A) – that possesses a
given psychological property. Rather, we start with paradigm cognitive
agents and attempt to explain what it is for them to possess psychological
properties. For the most part, both in common sense and in the cognitive
sciences, individuals rather than their parts or larger units of which they
are a part leap out at us as the bearers of psychological properties. It is Tom
who feels the pain or has the belief, and not Tom’s nociceptive system
or the folk psychological system at large. In passing, I have suggested
that this is because we physically contain at least the core realizations of
our mental states (even if not their total realizations), and are the locus
of control for the actions that result from those states. There are special
cases, such as those of split-brain patients being tested under special
290 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
conditions, or when people have specific neural deficits, where it may
be compelling to attribute (say) folk psychological states to entity-bound
systems themselves, and we might view the group mind hypothesis as
implying the need to consider something like wide systems as the subjects
of such states.

Clearly, in considering the idea that other kinds of entities, such as
groups, might have minds, we need to attend more closely to the issue of
just which entity it is that possesses psychological properties than in the
case of individuals. In particular, I have been arguing that at least historically many of the claims about group minds and group psychology are
best understood as making a claim about the role of groups in regulating,
developing, or disabling individual minds. In moving from individuals to
groups as putative bearers of psychological properties we need to ensure
that the multilevel or group-only traits we are ascribing are not better
understood simply as individual-level traits.

There is a second complication as we move from paradigm cognitive
agents to groups as putative cognitive agents. We do not simply instantiate
a few psychological properties but many, and these encompass a diverse
range of states, processes, and dispositions. Following my discussion of
folk psychology in Part Three, I shall say that in virtue of that we possess
full-blown minds. But I know of no defense of the group mind hypothesis that has claimed that groups have full-blown minds. (Talk of “group
consciousness,” for example, is nearly always talk of an aspect of the consciousness of individuals.) That is clearly science fiction, not borderline
science, in the league of Attack of the Killer Tomatoes rather than, say, the
Gaia Hypothesis. Moreover, there would seem to be little explanationist
motivation for adopting the full-blown group mind hypothesis.

As is the case in striving to make sense of the idea of animal minds
or of artificial intelligence, we should probably start with something less
than full-blown minds in trying to understand what group minds might
be. Consider, then, in light of our account of what it is to have or possess a
psychological property (state, process, disposition), the notion of minimal
mindedness:
X has a minimal mind just in case X has at least one psychological property (state,
process, disposition).

Given that we have full-blown minds, the group mind hypothesis and
minimal mindedness together entail that groups either literally have at
least one of the psychological properties that intact, functioning individual human beings have, or can usefully be treated as if they do. At least
the literalist reading is quite a strong and striking thesis about groups,
and seems the right way to understand the group mind hypothesis insofar as it has formed part of the collective psychology and superorganism
traditions. Where discussion of “the group mind” concentrates on just
one psychological process or ability, as it often does, I will refer to that as
the focal process or ability.

Can a group literally have a minimal mind? I want to argue first that the
most obvious reasons for saying “yes” or “no” won’t do, and that resolving
even this question is more difficult than it may initially appear.

Consider a problem with one “obvious” reason for answering “yes.”
It isn’t sufficient for a group to have a minimal mind for that group to
engage in some action that is caused by psychological processes. For if
those processes take place entirely in the heads of the individuals in those
groups, then the action can be explained adequately without positing a
group minimal mind. This implies that socially distributed cognition, at
least considered as a multilevel trait, does not entail even a group minimal
mind. For example, consider the (by now familiar) action of navigating a
navy vessel, which requires a complex social and mental division of labor,
or decision making in medical diagnosis. In these cases, the social context is integral to the way in which individuals process information and
cognize. If, despite this, it remains true that every psychological process
or ability that causes and thus explains the acts that constitute the navigation of a navy vessel, or that leads to a medical diagnosis, belongs to an
individual member of the group, then there is no group minimal mind
in addition to these minds. The statement “the crew saw the oncoming
ship and decided to change direction” might be made true simply by
individual-level psychological facts, together with other, nonpsychological facts about social organization. Thus, those who grant the existence of
group actions but think that psychological processes and activities are essentially individual-level (and so neither group-only nor multilevel) traits,
could deny the existence of even group minimal minds. Such a position
might be attractive to one who held the social manifestation thesis.6
As an aside, note how this points to an important disanalogy between
spatially organized neurons in someone’s head, and socially distributed
agents in some larger system, an analogy that we have seen David Sloan
Wilson make and that has been mentioned by others in conversation and
correspondence. Individual neurons do not perceive (but fire in response
to a stimulus), remember (but transmit information about the past), or
plan. By contrast, individual agents do all of these things, and these are
just the sorts of properties attributed in socially distributed cognition.

292 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
This suggests that the clearest cases that exemplify group minds will be
those that involve group-only, rather than multilevel traits. For in identifying a cognitive process found only at the group level, we preempt
the objection that the social manifestation thesis suffices to capture the
phenomenon being explained. Group-only cognitive properties can be
posited for human social groups, but as I implied in the previous chapter,
they are clearest in the case of superorganismal colonies.

Consider the claim that beehives have the focal ability of planning to
acquire honey from a given source. The action of the beehive is systematic,
structured, and predictable, and involves the coordination of hundreds
or thousands of bees. Putting together the group mind hypothesis, the
notion of minimal mindedness, and the account of what it is to possess a
psychological property, we have the following
A beehive possesses the psychological property of planning to acquire honey from
a given source just if that beehive either physically contains an entity-bounded
system or systems, or is part of a wide system or systems, that realize the processes
that generate or physically constitute such planning.

In this case, the entity-bounded systems are the individual bees that participate in the process of planning to acquire honey from the given source.

But since it is implausible to think that any single bee does this planning
(so little brain, so little time ... ), such planning, if it exists, must be a
group-only cognitive process.

Turn now to the objection that entities that never have full-blown
minds – minds in much the sense that we have minds – cannot possess any
psychological properties. Prima facie, some groups seem able to initiate
actions or behaviors – such as collecting food, steering a steady course
north, or building a school – that would be explained by positing underlying psychological processes and abilities were those actions performed
solely by individual agents. This is true even if those individual agents lack
full-blown minds, as is the case with current robotic and computational
systems. We readily and typically speak, for example, of a chess program as
knowing that you are about to take its bishop, of deciding to castle early,
of trying to dominate the center of the board, of remembering where
your Queen is. It may be that the best way to view these attributions is
as metaphorical, but it seems to me that a literal understanding of them
is not ruled out simply because we do not think of those programs as
complete psychological agents, agents with full-blown minds.

Consider the case of a person who has lost a range of her psychological
functioning, perhaps permanently. Suppose that significant parts of her
visual system, her memory, and her language abilities are impaired in
ways that limit what states we can plausibly attribute to her. Still, there
are likely to be clear cases where she literally tries to do something (such
as reach a glass or find the words to ask where your children are), or
knows or decides to do something. In short, she might be literally, and
not just metaphorically, minimally minded. And if individual agents can
have minimal minds, then so too can groups.

3 minimal minds, consciousness, and holism
Construing the group mind hypothesis in terms of the notion of a minimal
mind brings with it more specifically philosophical concerns. In implying that a minimal mind could lack consciousness, doesn’t this construal
of the group mind hypothesis stop short of giving us the real cognitive
McCoy, leaving us only with ersatz minds? And by suggesting that there
could be a group mind with a solitary psychological state, doesn’t it likewise trade real for mere “as if”intentionality and cognition? While I think
that both of these implications hold, I don’t see them as problematic for
this way of construing the group mind hypothesis.

In effect, we could see each of these objections as placing a putative
constraint on the types of minimal minds that can exist without full-blown
minds: Minimal minds must be conscious, and minimal minds must be
holistic, respectively. Consider the latter of these first.

Mental processes and states in general are, I think, instantiated in clusters, and so are, in some sense, holistic. That seems to be true both of
individual and group minds (compare the characterization of artificial
minds above). Thus, I see no problem in group minimal minds satisfying
some version of the holism constraint. Since my characterization of minimal mindedness allows for the possibility of a minded entity with just one
psychological state, it is not compatible with one predominant view of
the holism constraint in the philosophy of mind. On this view, holism is
an a priori constraint on psychological attribution. But I reject this view of
the constraint. Rather, the constraint is empirical in reflecting the way in
which psychological states and processes cluster. This clustering should
be viewed as underwritten by homeostatic mechanisms and constraints
that determine the ways in which these properties are realized in the
actual world.7
The consciousness constraint, however, would make the group mind
hypothesis implausible, since the claim that groups have consciousness
has been central to neither of the collective psychology and super-
294 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
organism traditions, nor in their contemporary revivals. Indeed, at least
those in the collective psychology tradition have often tried explicitly to
distance themselves from such claims. For example, William McDougall
devotes an early chapter of The Group Mind to criticizing those in the
German idealist tradition who talk uncritically of “the consciousness of
the group” as something more than the consciousness of each of the
members of the group. Recall also the affinity between the collective
psychology tradition and the postulation of unconscious processes in
individuals.8
In Part Three, I distinguished between six mental phenomena that
have been considered as exemplifying consciousness, classing these as
processes of awareness (higher-order cognition, attention, and introspection and self-knowledge) and phenomenal states (pain, bodily sensation,
and visual experience). While some groups might be thought to manifest
something like processes of awareness – for example, consider quorum
sensing in bacteria as a form of self-awareness – none plausibly instantiate
phenomenal states.

This can be readily accounted for within the framework I have introduced in this chapter. If the chief motivation for positing a group mind
is explanatory, and we start with the notion of a minimal mind and add
specific focal abilities as they seem justified, then we would expect to
find paradigmatic intentional states (including processes of awareness)
among the constituents of the group mind, but not the “what it’s like”
of mental life. This reinforces two negative themes from Part Three: that
“consciousness” is not the name of a unitary mental phenomenon, and
the intentional and phenomenal aspects to the mind are not inseparably
bound together.

Interesting in this regard is the status of emotions, which one might
well think of as straddling the putative divide between intentional and
qualitative states. Emotions are psychological states that are typically
about something – they have intentionality or mental content – but there
is also something phenomenally distinctive about them: there is something it is like to have them. Both McDougall, and before him, Le Bon,
considered the ways in which emotions such as fear and panic can be
properties of groups that degrade the abilities of the individuals in those
groups via the sympathetic responses of individuals to one another’s reactions. If this is to be consistent with the denial of group consciousness,
then these group emotions must be nonqualitative, even though the emotions in individuals that give rise to them (the “sympathetic responses”)
need not be. The same would also have to be true of the “positive”
emotional traits of a group mind, those which, claims McDougall, emerge
from highly organized human societies, and which lead to heightened
individual abilities.

4 the contemporary defense of the group
mind hypothesis
I have noted that David Sloan Wilson’s recent revival of the group mind
hypothesis draws on his defense of group selection in evolutionary biology. I will eventually turn to some of the complexities to the relationship
between these two views, but first I want to examine Wilson’s views in light
of our discussion so far in this and the previous chapter.

It is in his paper“Incorporating Group Selection into the Adaptationist
Program: A Case Study Involving Human Decision Making” that Wilson
develops his views of the group mind hypothesis most fully, and it is the
“case study” part of that paper on which I will concentrate in what follows.

Wilson’s focus here is on the literature on human decision making, particularly on human decision making in groups, and this case study review
is intended primarily to support the idea that human decision making has
evolved both by individual selection and by group selection. He begins
by distinguishing two ways
in which human decision making can evolve to maximize the fitness of whole
groups. First, individuals might function as independent decision makers whose
goal is to benefit the group. This is the way we usually think about altruism (Sober
and Wilson [1998]). Second, individuals might cease to function as independent
decision makers and become part of a group-level cognitive structure in which the
tasks of generating, evaluating, and choosing among alternatives are distributed
among the members of the group. ... At the extreme, the role of any individual
in the decision-making process might become so limited that the group truly
becomes the decision-making unit, a group mind in every sense of the word.

Wilson illustrates the second of these alternatives with an example of decision making about food sources in honey beehives, going on to suggest
that although “we should not expect group-level cognition in humans
to resemble the social insects in every detail,” human social groups can
be said to constitute what he calls adaptive decision-making units. In the
framework proposed in this chapter, we can see Wilson here as positing
the existence of minimal minds in groups of animals, including humans,
where the focal psychological ability is decision making.9
It should be clear that it is only the second of Wilson’s alternatives that
represents the sort of emergentist view of group psychological properties
296 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
that I outlined in the previous chapter as part of the collective psychology
and superorganism traditions, and only in “the extreme” would such a
view support the group mind hypothesis. Insofar as the first of the alternatives Wilson presents states a view about psychology at all, it expresses a
version of the social manifestation thesis. Individuals have a psychological
character that confers benefits on the group as a whole, and do so only
because of properties of that group, such as having a high proportion of
altruists, or imposing severe social costs for nonaltruists.

Wilson continues by discussing the second of these alternatives, equating it with the idea that groups are adaptive decision-making units, and
focusing on an assessment of the performance of group and individual
decision making. This discussion is aimed largely at offering support for
the idea that human decision making evolved in part by group selection. But before turning to that claim, and in light of the discussion in
this chapter so far, it is worth asking whether the phenomenon to be
explained by an appeal to group selection concerns the character of individual decision making or that of group decision making. Wilson seems
to imply that it is both when he says if “human cognition is a product of
group selection, we should expect individuals to be innately prepared to
easily ‘hook up’ with other individuals to form an integrative cognitive
network.” There is the formation of an integrative cognitive network, and
the innate preparedness of individuals to form such networks. But it is
only the former and not the latter of these that is directly relevant to the
group mind hypothesis, rather than to the social manifestation thesis.10
Much the same general point can be made about Wilson’s application
of the group mind perspective to understand religion. At the outset,
Wilson says that he aims to “treat the organismic concept of religious
groups as a serious scientific hypothesis” and that his “purpose is to see
if human groups in general, and religious groups in particular, qualify
as organismic in this sense.” But he needs two things to be true if this
project is to lead to a defense of the group mind hypothesis.11
First, it is not just religious groups but religious ideas or something
appropriately psychological that must be adaptations (to get the mind in
“group mind”). Second, this psychology must attach not simply to the individuals in religious groups but to the groups themselves (to get the group
in “group mind”). Much of what Wilson says about the functionality and
adaptedness of religious groups could be true without either of these assumptions being true. That is, religious groups could be viewed as organismic in nature, and be subject to natural (group) selection, even though
the processes that drive selection are either individual-level psychological
or group-only nonpsychological processes. Moreover, it may be plausible
to think that some of these individual-level psychological processes, such
as those that produce feelings of devotion, of a deep sense of commitment, or of Godly love, pretty much require social groups with the features
that religious groups have. If that is so, then we have a view more accurately characterized by the social manifestation thesis than by the group
mind hypothesis.

Let us return to the examples of integrated cognitive networks and decision making. We have already seen that both the collective psychology
and superorganism traditions had an emergentist view of the nature of
groups (and thus group minds): Groups are more than the sum of the
individual parts, and having a group mind is more than having a group
of individuals with minds. If Wilson is to keep with this aspect of these
traditions, then it follows that the integrative cognitive networks that he
postulates must be something more than individuals being innately prepared to hook up with one another. Likewise, for his multilevel property
of decision making: Having a minimal mind with this focal ability must
be more than having individual members with this focal ability.

In some trivial sense, a club makes a decision (say, by majority vote)
about whom will be their next president simply by each of the members
publicly expressing a decision on this matter. Even though the decision
here is distinct from those of the individual voters – since individuals by
themselves cannot elect a new leader – if there is a group mind here it
is nothing over and above the minds of individuals. Given the independence of the group mind hypothesis and the social manifestation thesis,
there must be something more to having a group mind than there being
individuals with socially manifested psychological characteristics. There
is a problem for Wilson’s views here, at least construed as reviving the
group mind hypothesis.

With respect to human decision making, he would seemingly need
to show that this functions at the group level by individuals relinquishing their own decision-making activities. For it is only by doing so that
he could point to a group-level psychological characteristic that is, in
the relevant sense, emergent from individual-level activity. Now those
in the collective psychology tradition, and especially those writing from
1870–1895, did think that this happened. Yet they claimed that it typically led to a degradation of individual abilities. Crowds, for example, had their own psychological character, one that involved the transformation of autonomous individuals into members of madding crowds.

Wilson must distance himself from this aspect of the collective psychology
298 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
tradition – and does so in his discussion of Irving Janis’s more recent
concept of groupthink – since he aims to defend the view that groups are
adaptive decision-making units, that is, units that have properties that promote fitness. Thus, he must look for ways in which collectivities confer
benefits. But if those benefits are nothing more than benefits to individuals, then collective behavior would seem to be explained by an individual,
not a group, psychology. If individuals can simply enhance their own individual decision making by forming groups of a certain character, then
we may have the beginnings of an interesting argument for the social
manifestation thesis, but are no closer to the group mind hypothesis.12
Thus far, I have argued that the group mind hypothesis has been run
together with the social manifestation thesis not only in the collective psychology and superorganism traditions, but also in David Sloan Wilson’s
revival of those traditions within contemporary biology. Finally and more
briefly, I turn to the recent social sciences to explore whether such confusion exists there as well. As I have mentioned, Mary Douglas’s How
Institutions Think aims, in part, to call attention to Ludwig Fleck’s neglected notion of a thought collective, and examining Fleck’s own views
and their (belated) reception is revealing.

Fleck introduced the terms Denkstil and Denkkollektiv in a 1935 book,
finally translated and published as Genesis and Development of a Scientific
Fact. Part of the excitement about that book within the social studies of
science community, and a chief reason for its eventual translation, was its
anticipation of much that was ushered in to the study of science following
Thomas Kuhn’s The Structure of Scientific Revolutions. For Fleck, science is
always practiced within the confines of a thought collective,“a community
of persons mutually exchanging ideas of maintaining intellectual interaction,” with its own thought style. These provide the framework in which
“facts” are determined, and alternative thought collectives may represent
different and incompatible sets of facts. In short, Fleck is seen as anticipating some of Kuhn’s most influential ideas – that of a paradigm, of the
dependence of phenomena on paradigms, and the incommensurability
between successive paradigms. More generally, in ascribing a central role
to social dimensions to theory construction, hypothesis testing, and scientific change, Fleck made an early, decisive break from the positivist
view of science that Kuhn’s Structure called into question twenty-five years
later.13
As condensed as this summary is, one can note immediately that
thought collectives are not group minds but the social context in which individual minds function. In Kuhn’s foreword to the English translation of
Fleck’s book, he says that his own struggles with the book cluster around
“the notion of a thought collective,” saying that “a thought collective
seems to function as an individual mind writ large.” Although Kuhn does
not come straight out and say that the basic problem with the notion is
that collectives do not have thoughts, even if they are crucial to the having
of thought, this seems clearly one of the problems that Kuhn himself has
with the notion.14
If we turn to Douglas herself, what she sees as important in Fleck (and
in Durkheim) is the idea that“true solidarity is only possible to the extent
to which individuals share the categories of their thought.”Both Fleck and
Durkheim “were equally emphatic about the social basis of cognition.”
She concludes her monograph by saying that
Durkheim and Fleck taught that each kind of community is a thought world,
expressed in its own thought style, penetrating the minds of its members,
defining their experience, and setting the poles of their moral understanding. ... individuals really do share their thoughts and they do to some extent harmonize their preferences, and they have no other way to make the big decisions
except within the scope of institutions they build.15
What each of these expressions points to, and contrary to the title of
Douglas’s book, is not “how institutions think,” but how individuals think
(only) within institutional frameworks. Again, this is in keeping with the
social manifestation thesis, rather than the group mind hypothesis.

We have been led to the social manifestation thesis both by reflection on our two traditions and their contemporary revivals in the biological and social sciences. So I round out this chapter with some further thoughts on that thesis that reach back to earlier discussions in
Boundaries.

5 the social manifestation thesis
The social manifestation thesis says something significant about the nature of cognition and its relation to individuals, but it is important to be
clear about what is significant here. It says that some psychological states
of individuals are manifested only when those individuals form part of a
social group of a certain type. Both the “social” and “manifestation” parts
of the thesis require further explanation.

One way of understanding this pair of notions is in terms of the idea
that individuals have their psychology transformed through social membership. We have seen that this view has been thought of as playing a
300 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
central role within the collective psychology tradition, where the relevant social groups were “crowds.” Yet there are different ways to think
about individuals, cognition, and this process of transformation.

First, we may take an individual as a self-contained bundle of psychological dispositions, with membership in a crowd temporarily causing
some of these – the irrational, the unconscious, the emotional – to be
manifested, and those of the rational individual to remain merely dispositional. Here an individual’s social circumstances play a triggering
role in the expression of preexisting psychological dispositions. They do
not themselves bring about any new dispositions in individuals, just the
manifestation of dispositions already latent in the individual. What are
transformed are the dispositions that are manifested.

Second and alternatively, we can think of individuals who are normally
constituted by psychologically rational states as acquiring a new, distinct
set of psychological dispositions when they become part of a crowd. On
this view, the social circumstances change not simply what dispositions
become manifested, but what dispositions an individual has. Thus, being
part of a crowd brings about a more radical form of transformation of the
individual than is suggested by the triggering view. What is transformed
is the dispositions themselves.

These two kinds of transformation that social circumstances can bring
about in an individual contrast in roughly the way in which memory and
learning do in common sense thought. In the case of memory, our social
circumstances may cause us to manifest something we already have inside
of us, something that we already know; in the case of learning, those
circumstances change the knowledge structures that we have. The role
of the environment in memory is epitomized as the asking of a question,
while in learning it is the giving of instruction.

Despite this sort of difference, both of these conceptions of the social
manifestation thesis are continuous with the individualistic tradition of
thinking about psychological states that has been the focus of earlier parts
of Boundaries. This is because, on these views, an individual’s psychology
itself can (and should) still be understood in abstraction from that individual’s social environment. In neither of these cases do the psychological
dispositions themselves become social, that is, become constituted by the
social circumstances in which they are manifested. Both views draw on a
conception of the role of social circumstances in cognition akin to that
held by strong nativists (Chapter 3), whereby cognition is internally richly
structured antecedent to, and independent of, social circumstances. And
they both accept a view of (psychological) dispositions as always being
intrinsic to the bearer of the disposition. In Chapter 6, I argued that the
very idea of intrinsic dispositions sat uneasily with the prima facie existence of wide realizations of an individual’s properties. In effect, the argument there claimed that properties and their realizations are either both
individualistic or both wide, and thus that the width of the realizations
for at least some psychological properties implied that those properties
(including dispositional properties) were not individualistic. In light of
this, the idea of an individualistic but socially manifested property is an
unstable hybrid.

This places some conceptual stress on individualistic understandings
of the social manifestation thesis, pushing us instead toward a view of
it as positing psychological states that are socially constituted and so externalist in nature. This would make the thesis suitable for offering a
general characterization of the externalist view of psychology, which depicts cognitive processes as themselves intrinsically social in nature. In
Chapter 8, I introduced such a view of memory, cognitive development,
and folk psychology as a way of providing a more concrete idea of how
integrative synthesis should proceed in the psychological case. There I
was chiefly concerned to show how to generalize the wide computational
approach that I defended as a view of computational cognitive science
to noncomputational approaches within psychology, and to indicate the
sorts of questions and issues that arise on the resulting, externalist view
of psychological inquiry.

This interpretation of the social manifestation thesis thus provides
a middle ground between an individualistic psychology and the group
mind hypothesis. In contrast to individualism, the externalist psychology
demarcated by the social manifestation thesis views psychological states as
both taxonomically and locationally embedded in broader social systems.

In contrast to the group mind hypothesis, it does not ascribe psychological states themselves to entities, such as the group, the community, or the
nation, larger than the individual and to which the individual belongs. On
this view, while the individual is not a boundary for psychological theorizing, psychology does posit individual-level, rather than group-level, traits.

We can put this the other way around. Socially manifested psychological
traits are properties of individuals, but since they occur only in certain
group environments, they cannot be understood in purely individualistic
terms.

I like to think that this is just what recent advocates of group mind
thinking, such as Mary Douglas and David Sloan Wilson, have themselves
had in mind. If so, then the externalism about the mind articulated in
302 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
Parts Two and Three provides a framework for further explorations of
the phenomena to which they have called attention.

6 the cognitive and the social
The evolutionary and cultural conditions that give rise to psychological states have been recognized in a number of approaches to cognition,
such as evolutionary psychology and explorations of social intelligence in
the framework of the Machiavellian hypothesis. The social manifestation
thesis suggests, however, that cognition and sociality are more intimately
connected than even these research programs allow. For example, research on the Machiavellian hypothesis has been focused on the role of
social complexity in producing mental complexity in the individual. It
is largely devoted to exploring the forms that both types of complexity
take and the relations between them. But if cognition itself is social, as
the social manifestation thesis implies, not simply a product of the social,
there will be a deeper connection between forms of (say) group living
and intelligence. Research programs that attempt to isolate and then explain individualistic modules for intelligent cognitive performance will
not go far enough in articulating the social and cultural dimensions to
cognition.16
The social manifestation thesis should also lead us to rethink some of
our ways of thinking about the “levels” at which selection operates. For
example, it has been common within debates over the agents of selection
to contrast individual-benefiting traits that evolve by individual selection
with group-benefiting traits that evolve by group selection. Furthermore,
at least in the hands of those who think that the “selfish gene” is the unit
of selection, the latter has been discounted altogether. But this putative
dichotomy becomes less compellingly exhaustive once we consider traits,
including psychological traits, which benefit individuals because those
individuals are members of groups of a certain type. In this sort of case,
individual-level and group-level traits are intrinsically woven together, and
natural selection is not sufficiently fine-grained to distinguish between
properties that, despite being distinct, are reliably coinstantiated and
homeostatically reinforcing.17
Concentration on the social manifestation thesis in an evolutionary
context thus may direct us to think about ways in which individual and
group selection can be mutually reinforcing processes, rather than conceived of primarily as forces that are opposed in evolutionary change. An
important species of case in which they work in the same direction is one
in which socially manifested traits are selected at the level of the individual, while group-level traits, whether psychological or nonpsychological,
are selected at the level of the group. This would be a sort of coevolutionary process in which there is a mutually reinforcing causal loop between
socially manifested psychological traits and group-level traits. This possibility suggests that, although the social manifestation thesis and the
group mind hypothesis are distinct views, they may be most interestingly
defended together.

7 from group minds to group selection
I have mentioned that David Sloan Wilson’s views of group minds are
tied to his defense of group selection. I want to conclude the substantive
part of this chapter by arguing that it is unlikely that there is any easy
argumentative flow between claims about the kinds of minds there are
and the types of selective processes that operate in nature.

There are two basic reasons for this. First, the level at which selection operates and the level at which its products, adaptations, are characterized are not as tightly connected as has typically been supposed. In
particular, selection could take place at the group level but produce adaptations at the individual level. Thus, arguing from the existence of group
selection on cognitive traits does not imply the group selection of group
minds. Conversely, pointing to group-level cognitive adaptations does not
entail that these arose through a process of group selection. Group selection even on groups of minimally minded individuals doesn’t itself make
minimally minded groups of individuals any more plausible than it does
groups of minimally minded individuals with certain dispositions and
abilities. Second, the failure to distinguish the group minds hypothesis
from the social manifestation thesis, and the resulting missing discussion
of the relationship between the two, represents a crucial hiatus in arguing
from group selection to group minds.

This pair of points, and the complexities and possibilities they introduce, can be seen in Wilson’s discussion of group minds. Wilson recognizes both individual- and group-level traits as possible outcomes of a
process of group selection, a view implicit in the claim that altruism, an
individual-level trait, could evolve by group selection. He argues that if
group selection were the sole selective force shaping the psychological
features of individuals and groups, then we would expect to find individuals whose decisions benefit the group (for example, altruism), and/or
adaptive group decision making (for example, honey bee foraging). To
304 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
put it slightly differently, group selection might lead either to individuals
whose nature would support the social manifestation thesis or to group
minds (or even both). But since Wilson doesn’t explicitly distinguish the
social manifestation thesis from the group mind hypothesis, he fails to
consider the idea that traits of individuals that would support the former,
at least when produced by group selection, sometimes or always lead to
traits of groups that exemplify the latter. That is, missing here is any discussion of the relationship between socially manifested individual traits and
the group-level cognitive adaptations. When Wilson does turn to discuss
the factors that regulate group decision processes, these turn out to be
nonpsychological characteristics of groups (for example, social organization, leader control) that could simply be construed as effecting whether
and how certain individual-level characteristics are manifested.18
A corresponding problem arises in Wilson’s sketch of what one would
expect to find if individual selection were the sole process acting on
individuals. He says,
If group selection can truly be ignored as a factor in human evolution, we should
expect individuals to be highly adaptive as autonomous decision-making units,
capable of performing the full range of activities from framing the problem, to
generating alternatives, to evaluating the alternatives, to making final decisions.

When individuals exist as members of groups, we should expect them to use
others as sources of information, but only in ways that increase the individual’s
relative fitness within the group.19
Here Wilson rests on the assumption that selection at a given level – in
this case, that of the individual – will produce certain traits at that level.

But suppose that the social manifestation thesis is true: Certain psychological properties are manifest only when individuals form a group of a
certain type. And suppose that these evolve through a process of individual selection. Must such traits promote autonomous decision making?
One reason to think not is that what kinds of trait evolve in such a case will
depend largely on the structure and internal dynamics of the group itself.

For example, if the group is one in which autonomous decision making
is punished, and shared, partial, and contributory decision making promoted, then it is more likely that these will be the socially manifested
psychological traits that evolve, even if there is only individual selection.

Thus, Wilson’s claim above linking selection at a level with a certain kind
of agency is mistaken.

Moreover, one could envision these social structures as diminishing the
completeness and autonomy of individual decision making so radically
that full decision making appears as a group-only trait. If this happened,
then we would have a group mind (with respect to decision making)
evolving through a process of individual selection. Wilson and Sober’s
own discussion of the Hutterites, a religious sect that has lived in relatively small communities in North America for almost two hundred years,
prominent in Wilson and Sober’s influential Behavioral and Brain Sciences
paper, suggests to me something like this interpretation, whereby a process of within-group selection shifts the balance of decision making from
individual to group. The more general point here is that taking the social
manifestation thesis seriously complicates any argument from the character of natural selection to the character of the minds it produces.20
Two final complications concerning the relationship between group
selection and group minds seem worth mentioning. First, there are very
few, if any, established hypotheses about which individual-level psychological processes and abilities are the product of evolution by natural
selection. Part of the problem here is the lack of consensus about how
to characterize human and animal minds in the first place. In addition,
there are doubts about each of the following: whether any of the processes
and abilities so characterized are plausibly viewed as cognitive adaptations
(versus by-products of other adaptations) at all; supposing that some are,
about which these are; and supposing that some particular process or
ability evolved, how it is to be characterized.

To take a classic example, there is a lively debate over whether social
reasoning constitutes a well-defined psychological unit – something like a
module – or whether the appropriate unit is better construed as a generalpurpose reasoning module that can be applied to the social domain, or
as a pragmatic reasoning module, or in some other way altogether. The
same seems to me true of most postulated psychological units – including
memory, language, and emotion. This is not to express skepticism about
whether there are cognitive adaptations, but to report a view of the state
of our knowledge here, despite (or perhaps because of) recent work that
makes some progress here.21
Second, there is the general issue of the role of cultural selection in
producing minds like ours and those of our recent ancestors. I have elsewhere followed Elliott Sober in viewing cultural selection as a family of
views, each of which extends or generalizes one or more of the three
conditions typically considered necessary for natural selection to occur:
phenotypic variation, related fitness variation, and heritability. We may
simply extend the concept of a phenotype to include cultural traits; in
addition, we may consider fitness to have something more than a strictly
reproductive dimension; and finally, we may conceptualize heritability as
306 Cognitive Metaphor in Biology and Social Science
cultural in nature. The members of this family of views constitute views
of cultural selection that increasingly depart from traditional natural
selection.22
My hunch is that these forms of cultural selection, particularly those
that involve more rather than less departure from traditional natural
selection, are likely to have been instrumental in shaping up the kinds
:of minds that we beasts have. Given the demonstrated effectiveness of
cultural group selection in shaping at least some behaviors, cultural selection needs to be factored in at both the individual and the group level.

If that is right, then our exploration of the relationship between group
selection and group minds must include these cultural varieties of natural
selection.23
8 groups, minds, and individuals
I began the previous chapter by saying that I would seriously consider
the idea that groups can have minds. While I have not argued that idea
is mistaken, I have suggested that much of what proponents of the group
mind hypothesis want to say about the mind can be expressed within the
parameters of the externalist view of the mind that I have developed in
Parts Two and Three. This involves reconceptualizing where the mind
begins and ends, in ways that both build on but also depart from our
sciences of the mind. But it does not require that we replace the individual
as the locus of cognition, as the subject of mental states, with some larger
unit, such as the group.

This deflationary view of appeals to group minds in the biological and
social sciences has been developed within a framework that both provides some constructive tools for thinking about group minds, as well as
a few conjectures, guesses, and hunches about where some of the complexities to thinking about the relationships between groups, minds, and
individuals lie. I have argued that we should approach the question of
whether cognition is a group-level trait in any particular case by identifying the focal processes or abilities, and so to some extent forego the
more exciting-sounding question of whether “group minds” or “group
consciousness” really exist. In the last few sections I have voiced a suspicion about general appeals – to the level at which selection occurs, or to
the kinds of characteristics that we find in individuals – as the basis for
defending the group mind hypothesis. But this, together with the overall deflationary message of Part Four, should not be taken to imply my
skepticism about whether group minds exist.


There can be no group-level focal cognitive processes and abilities
without the activities of individuals, and in at least some cases those individuals are cognitive agents, agents with minds. In articulating a view
of the mind, however, in which the social embeddedness of the individual makes a crucial difference to the kind of mind that that individual
has, I hope to have arrested the thought that the dependence relations
here flow simply from “higher levels” (the group, the social) to “lower
levels” (the individual, the cognitive). The minds that individuals have
are already the minds of individuals in groups.

